
				


				
# bcgk_sqlite
BCGKDATA				
1.Politicians not born in present day India: 				
L.K.Advani ,Manmohan Singh ,Sonia Gandhi ,Prakash Karat(Born in Burma) ,Karan Singh(Born in France)				
2.Foreign born/Foreigners as Congress Presidents: 				
George Yule ,William Wedderburn ,Alfred Webb ,Henry Cotton ,Annie Besant ,Nellie Sengupta ,				
Abul Kalam Azad(Born in Mecca) ,Sonia Gandhi 				
3.Countries with Fiscal year 1st April to 31   March: 				
India ,Japan,Canada ,South Africa ,Qatar 				
4.Indian Rhodes Scholars: 				
Girish Kannad ,Deepak Nair,Montek Ahluwalia,AftabSeth,Prabhat Patnaik ,Shalini Randeria(1st Indian Woman Rhodes scholar),Lovraj Kumar & A.K.Datta(1st Indians Rhodes Scholars) 				
5.Indian leaders assassinated: 				
Gandhi ,Lalit Narain Misra ,Indira ,Rajiv ,Beant Singh				
6.High courts not in Indian state Capitals: 				
Kerala,Orissa,UP,,Uttaranchal,Chhatisgarh ,Assam(Manipur,Meghalaya,Nagaland,Tripura,Mizoram,Arunachal Pradesh),Gujrat ,Madhya Pradesh ,Goa 				
7.Gauhati High court caters to: 				
Assam ,Arunachal ,Nagaland ,Manipur ,Tripura .Meghalaya ,Mizoram 				
8.Deputy PMs: 				
Patel,Desai,Charan Singh,Jagajivan Ram,Y.B.Chavan,Devi Lal,Advani 				
9.Ramananda Sagar TV Serials: 				
Vikram aur Vetal ,Ramayan,Shrikrishna ,Alif Laila,Sai Baba 				
10.Defeated Presidential Candidates: 				
Sanjiva Reddy ,H.R.Khanna ,Krishna Aiyer ,Ram Jethmalani ,T.N.Shesan ,Lakshmi Shegal 				
11.Gulf Rupee(introduced by India) was in use in the following 				
Gulf countries: 				
Oman ,Qatar ,Bahrain ,Kuwait,UAE 				
12Currency notes in circulation before 1972(20 rupee notes in 1972,50 rupee notes in 				
1975, 500 & 1000 rupee notes in 1996)printed  in that order: 				
5,10,100,1,2 				
13. Cultural Capital of India: VARANASI 				
Power  Capital of India  : KORBA(Chhatishgarh) 				
14.Wisden Cricketers of the century: 				
Bradman ,Sobers ,Jack Hobb ,Shane warne ,Viv Richards 				
15.Personalities born and  died on the same day: 				
Shakespeare ,Prophet Mohammad ,Dr.B.C.Roy ,Swami Ramatirth(Ram Badshah) 				
16.Moonbows found at: 				
Cumberland falls Kentuky 				
Zambia and Zimbawe border(Victoria falls) 				
17.Detergent also known as "All and Omo": 				
Surf				
18.Mace fighters of Mahabharat war: 				
Shalya ,Bhim ,Duryodhan ,Abhimanyu 				
19.Amitabh,s Honorary degrees:				
Leicester University honoured him even before Delhi University, and he was				
happy France decided to confer the Legion of Honour on him.				
20.Oxford of the East: 				
Poona.				
21.Which city in India was referred by Mahatma Gandhi 				
as "Evergreen City of India": 				
Trivandrum				
22:Sherwoodias(Sherwood college,Nainital): 				
Amitabh ,Kabir Bedi,Dalip Tahil ,Manekshaw ,Somnath Sharma				
23. Vishnu's Sword: Nandaka				
24. Vishnu's bow :Sharanga				
25.Heart beat: :				
Smaller animals have faster heartbeats. This is evident within				
species as well, as the young beat their hearts faster than the adults.The Gray Whale's 				
heart beats 9 times per minute, Harbour Seal 10 when diving, 140 when on land,				
elephant 25, human 72, sparrow 500, shrew 600, and hummingbird 1,200 when				
hovering. Earth worm has got no heart. 				
Fish:  Two chambered heart 				
Amphibia and reptiles: Three chambered heart 				
Mammmals,birds and Crocodiles: Four chambered heart 				
26. NASIK:   Traditionally Nashik was known as the Gulshanabad meaning the city of				
roses. The "Wine Capital of India", or the "Grape City", as it is popularly known.				
27. Biggest functioning Hindu temple in the world: 				
Srirangam temple can be easily termed as the  (it's termed as biggest "functioning"				
because Angkor Wat is the biggest but non-functioning Hindu temple in the world).				
28.Garuda is the national symbol of: Indonesia  &  Thailand				
29.River Sarayu is known as(or a tributary) of: 				
River Ghagra 				
30.Ayodhya means: The word ayodhya is Sanskrit for "not to be warred against". 				
In Faizabad distt. of UP				
31.Allahabad:1. The name was given to the city by the Mughal Emperor Akbar in 1583. 				
The "Allah" in the name does not come from Allah as God's name in Islam but from the				
Din-Ilahi, which was the religion founded by Akbar. In Indian alphabets it is spelt				
"Il_h_b_d": "il_h" is Arabic for "a god" (but in this context from Din-Ilahi), and "-_b_d"				
is Persian for "place of".				
2. The city is known as Prayag (Sanskrit for "place of sacrifice" and is considered to be				
the spot where Brahma offered his first sacrifice after creating the world).				
3. Because solar events in Allahabad occur exactly 5 hours and 30 minutes ahead of				
Greenwich, the city is the reference point for Indian Standard Time. 				
32.Nathdwara is a town in Rajasthan state of western India. It is located on the Banas 				
River in Rajsamand District, just north of Udaipur. This holy town is famous for its 				
temple of Krishna which houses the Shrinathji, a 12th century idol (murti) of Krishna. 				
The idol was moved in the 17th century from Govardhan hill, near Mathura, to 				
protect it from the Mughal emperor Aurangzeb's campaign against Hindu 				
worship in his empire. 				
33.  Mayapur: Near Nabdwip,WB, world headquarters of the International Society for 				
Krishna Consciousness (ISKCON). 				
34.Dwarka: The legend says that Krishna renounced war in Mathura for the greater good 				
(and hence the name Ranchodrai) and founded (and settled in) Dvaraka.Dvaraka was a 				
planned city, on the banks of Gomati River. This city was also known as Dvaramati, 				
Dvaravati and Kushsthali. 				
35.BADRINATH:1. Badri refers to a berry that was said to grow abundantly in the area, 				
and nath refers to Vishnu. Legend has it that Goddess Lakshmi took the form of the 				
berries to protect Lord Vishnu from the harsh climate during his long 				
penance.Badrinath has also been eulogised as Bhu Vaikunta or earthly abode of Lord 				
Vishnu. Many religious 				
2. The mountains around Badrinath are mentioned in the Mahabharata, when the 				
Pandavas are said to have ended their life by ascending the slopes of a peak in 				
western Garhwal called Swargarohini - literally, the 'Ascent to Heaven'. Local 				
legend has it that the Pandavas passed through Badrinath and the town of Mana, 4 km 				
north of Badrinath, on their way to Swargarohini. There is also a cave in Mana where 				
Vyas, according to local legend, wrote the Mahabharata 				
36.Vrindavan: The Govind Deo (Govindaji) Temple was once a magnificent seven 				
storeyed structure built in the form of a Greek cross. It is said that the Emperor Akbar 				
donated some of the red sandstone that had been brought for the Red Fort at Agra, for the 				
construction of this temple. Built at the astronomical cost of one crore rupees in 1590 by 				
his general Man Singh, the temple combines western, Hindu and Muslim architectural 				
elements in its structure. 				
37.Sringeri :located in Chikmagalur district in the Indian state of Karnataka, is the site of 				
the first matha established by Adi Shankaracharya. It is located on the banks of the 				
river Tung_. The name Sringeri is derived from Rishyashringa-giri, a nearby hill that 				
is believed to have contained the hermitage of Rishi Vibhandaka and his son 				
Rishyashringa. When Adi shankar was walking by the Tunga river, he saw a cobra with 				
a raised hood, providing shelter from the hot sun, to a frog about to spawn. Impressed 				
with the place where natural enemies had gone beyond their instincts, he stayed here for 				
twelve years. 				
38.Destruction of Temples: 				
Somnath destroyed and rebuilt six times over a span of 1000 years. 				
Mathura Keshav Dev temple destroyed in 1661 CE. 				
Benares Vishvanath temple destroyed in 1669 CE. 				
Koneswaram temple in Trinkomalee destroyed in 17th century. 				
Buddhas of Bamyan destroyed in 2001 				
Ram Janmabhoomi Ayodhya temple destroyed in 1528. 				
Multan Sun Temple destroyed in 1000 CE.  				
39.Dhansukodi: (Abdul kalam's place) Dhanushkodi at the Confluence of Mahodadhi (Bay 				
of Bengal) and Ratnakara (Indian Ocean). Hindu myth says that at the request of 				
Vibeeshana, brother of Ravana and ally of Rama, Rama broke the Sethu with one end of 				
his bow and hence the name Dhanushkodi, Dhanu meaning Bow and Kodi meaning end.  A 				
series of rocks and islets found in a line are shown as remnants of the ancient Setu also 				
called as Rama's Bridge. 				
40.Gaya:. Situated on the banks of Falgu River . Lord Vishnu killed Gayasur, the holy demon 				
by using the pressure of his foot over him. This incident transformed Gayasur into the 				
series of rocky hills that make up the landscape of the Gaya city. 				
According to Ramayana, when Lord Rama came to Gaya along with Sita for pitrupaksha (or to 				
perform pindadanam), Sita cursed the Falgu River following some disobedience on the part of 				
the river. The mythology states that on account of this curse, Falgu River lost its water, and the 				
river is simply a vast stretch of sand dunes. 				
41.Coimbatore: Situated on the banks of the Noyyal river, Coimbatore is also known as 				
Koneyammanputhhur, which means "birth-place of the Goddess" (KoniAmman) 				
42. Personal TV's (PTVs) on every seat on every aircraft in their fleet. 				
Kingfisher Airlines, along with Cathay Pacific, Singapore Airlines, Middle East 				
Airlines, Emirates and Virgin Atlantic. 				
43.  Famous buildings/Railway stations designed by: 				
1.Howrah rly station: Halsey Ricardo 				
2.Sealdah rly. Station: Walter Glanville 				
3.Madras Central rly. Station: Henry Irwin 				
4.Victoria Terminus: F.W.Stevens 				
5.Victoria Memorial: William Emerson 				
6.Charbag rly Station: J.H.Hornimen 				
7.Anand Bhavan, 				
Muir College (Allahabad University): William Emerson 				
8.Writer's Building: Lyons 				
9.Tinmurti House:Robert Torr Russell 				
10.Vivekananda Memorial:S.K.Achari 				
11.Architect of Red fort(Delhi): Ustad Ahmed Lahwari 				
12.Architect of Howrah Bridge: Sir Bradford Leslie 				
13.Architect of Bahai(lotus temple)temple:Fariborz Sahba 				
14.Designer of "TITANIC": Thomas Andrews 				
44.  Amrita devi, a member of the Bishnoi tribe was killed by the soldiers of the    Maharaja 				
of Jodhpur. What was she doing at the time of her death and what did It trigger?   She was 				
hugging a tree preventing it from being cut and it started the Chipko movement.. 				
45. King Janamejaya once conducted a Snake Sacrifice at the city of Taxila in order   to 				
ward of a curse on his Grandfather Pareekshit. What event of great significance occurred here? 				
It was here that the Mahabharata was recited for the first time ever to man by 				
Vaishampayana pupil of Veda Vyasa 				
46. Pioneered the Chipko movement : Dasohli Gram Swarajya Mandali? 				
47. To eradicate the weed Parthenium: 				
A few years ago a certain insect called the Mexican Beetle was imported into Bangalore in 				
large numbers. 				
48. Sanctuary:  edited by activist Bittu Sahgal. 				
  49.   Donald Duck:  His middle name is Fauntleroy. His father's name is Quackmore. 				
            50: Jackie Chan: He made his debut as a stunt double for Bruce Lee because				
                Lee refused to jump from 30 feet for a sequence. 				
            51.  Al Capone : Who is the only real life character to appear in Tintin comics? 				
            52. Charles De Gaulle : was the target of the Jackal in the 'Day of the Jackal' 				
53. Two main components of the dowry given by Catherine Braganza to Charles 				
was the:   Moroccan city of Tangiers & Bombay 				
54. Bombay State had three chief ministers in its history. Balasaheb Kher was the first 				
Chief Minister of Bombay after India gained independence, and he was followed by 				
Morarji Desai and later Yashwantrao Chavan 				
55. Scottish civil servant Charles Kennedy built Simla's first British summer home in 				
1822, and by the latter half of the 19th century the town had become the summer capital 				
of the British Raj 				
56. First Indian Army officer to be awarded the Maha Vir Chakra 				
Lt. Col. Ranjit Rai(Sikh Regtt)became the first commanding officer to sacrifice his life 				
for independent India.. 				
57.Bombay Triumvirate:Badruin tyabji, Kashinath Telang and Pherozeshah Mehta. 				
58. The first international Twenty20 cricket match played between Australia and New 				
Zealand, Eden Park, Auckland. Australia defeated New Zealand New Zealand by 44 				
runs. 				
59. VAT was invented by a French economist in 1954. Maurice Lauré, joint director of 				
the French tax 				
60. Warren Edward Buffett :Nicknamed the "Oracle of Omaha" or the "Sage of 				
Omaha", Buffett has amassed an enormous fortune from astute investments, 				
particularly through the company Berkshire Hathaway, of which he is the largest 				
shareholder and CEO. With an estimated current net worth of around US$46 billion, he is 				
ranked by Forbes as the second-richest person in the world, behind only Microsoft 				
chairman Bill Gates.In June 2006, he made a commitment to give away his fortune to 				
charity, with 85% of it going to the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation. 				
61. Aparna made her film debut at the age of 16, when she played the role of Mrinmoyee 				
in Satyajit Ray's 1961 film Teen Kanya (Three Daughters). She then studied at Kolkata's 				
Presidency College 				
62.Suchitra Sen: She is the first Indian actress to be awarded in an international film festival 				
(Best Actress award for the movie Saat Paake Bandha in 1963 Moscow film festival 				
63.Suchitra Sen: received a Best Actress Award for the film Devdas (1955), which was her 				
first Hindi movie 				
64. Byomkesh Bakshi is a fictional detective in Bengali literature created by Sharadindu 				
Bandyopadhyay.It has also been televised in Hindi by Doordarshan by Basu 				
Chatterjee, featuring Rajit Kapoor 				
65.Youngest Swimmer: An 8-year-old Arizona boy,  Braxton Bilbrey, of Glendale  is the 				
youngest swimmer to cross the channel from Alcatraz Island to San Francisco				
66.. David whitbread sported a tail for 14 years and thoroughly enjoyed the experience. Whitbread 				
was the cute devil who symbolised ''neighbour's envy'' in Onida TV ad 				
67. Karachi is located in semi-arid coastal desert area with very limited agriculture land 				
along the two small seasonal rivers, Lyari River and Malir River 				
68. The area of Karachi has been known to the ancient Greeks by many names. Krokola, 				
the place where Alexander the Great camped to prepare a fleet for Babylonia after his 				
campaign in the indus valley. 				
69. Grand Trunk Road remains a continuum that spans a distance of over 2,500 km and 				
traverses three south Asian countries: Pakistan, India and Bangladesh. It starts from Peshawar in 				
Pakistan and passes through Rawalpindi and Lahore before entering India at Wagah. Within 				
India, it passes through Amritsar, Ambala, Delhi, Kanpur, Allahabad, Varanasi and Kolkata. It 				
then enters Bangladesh and ends at Sonargaon in the Narayanganj district of that country.Within 				
India, the major portion of the road, the stretch between Kolkata and Delhi, is known as NH-2 				
(National Highway - 2), while the stretch between Delhi and Wagah, at the border with Pakistan, 				
is known asNH1.				
70. Taijitu, the traditional symbol representing the forces of Yin and Yang.Yin 				
(Chinese: _/_; pinyin: yīn; literally "shady place, north slope (hill), south bank (river); cloudy, 				
overcast") is the darker element; it is sad, passive, dark, feminine, downward-seeking, and 				
corresponds to the night.Yang (_/_; yáng; "sunny place, south slope (hill), north bank (river); 				
sunshine") is the brighter element; it is happy, active, light, masculine, upward-seeking and 				
corresponds to the day. Yin is often symbolized by water or earth, while Yang is symbolized by 				
fire. 				
71. Also known as the 'City of Balance' and the 'Education City', Doha, the host city				
of the 15th Asian Games.				
72.Arjun singh's Palace: Karwa Dam palace.				
73. Goa is also known as "Gomanchala". Gove, Govapuri, Gopakpattan, and Gomant are 				
some other names that the region is referred to in certain inscriptions and texts such as the 				
Puranas. It has also been known as "Aprant" and "Dan's Yard".Kadamba Transport 				
Corporation.				
a.Lieutenant General K.P. Candeth, who had led the successful invasion of Goa, "handed 				
over" the airport to the Indian Navy in early 1962. 				
b.Bebinca, also known as Bibik, is a dessert from Goa, India. The ingredients include 				
eggs and coconut milk. The dish is prepared and consumed during Christmas time. 				
c. Goa's legislative capital is Porvorim - the seat of the Goa assembly, which lies across the 				
Mandovi River. 				
74. The original name of Mahé, Mayyazhi, means "eyebrow of the sea".				
75.The first English translation of the Gita Govinda was published by Sir William 				
Jones in 1792. 				
76. The Hypaethral Temple:Ranipur-Jharial houses one among the four(the other three are 				
at Hirapur near Bhubaneswar, Khajurao and Bheraghat near Jabalpur)existing rare 				
monuments of Hypaethral temples ( temples without roofs meaning open to the sky) dedicated to 				
64 Yoginis in India and also some other ancient temples. 				
77. Inchudi:Inchudi a village, situated 19 km. from Balasore town is famous for the historic 				
Salt Satyagraha of 1930. It is said that here the success of mass civil disobedience against 				
Salt Laws occupied the second place in India after Dandi in Gujarat where Mahatma 				
Gandhi himself led the movement. 				
78. The organization is usually referred to simply as "ISO" It is a common misconception 				
that ISO stands for "International Standards Organization", or something similar. ISO is not an 				
acronym; it comes from the Greek word ίóïò (isos), meaning "equal". In English, the 				
organization's long-form name is "International Organization for Standardization. 				
79.Somnath Temple: Sardar Vallabhbhai Patel, then Home Minister & the first Deputy Prime 				
Minister of India took a pledge on November 13, 1947 for its reconstruction. It was completed 				
on December 1, 1995 and President of India, Dr. Shankar Dayal Sharma dedicated it in the 				
service of the nation.  In 1951 Dr. Rajendra Prasad, the first President of India, who 				
performed the Jyotirling-Pratishthapan ceremony of the new Temple. 				
80.Indian Express: In 1948, Ram Nath Goenka partnered with Lala Deshbandhu Guptato 				
of Daily Tej Limited to publish Indian News Chronicle, an English daily, from New Delhi. 				
After the demise of Guptato, the daily was bought by Ram Nath Goenka and renamed as The 				
Indian Express. 				
81. Chepauk, its first match was played February 10, 1934. This stadium is where the Indian 				
cricket team won its first ever Test victory here in 1952 againstEngland. 				
82.Vidarbh Cricket Assosiation Ground: Sunil Gavaskar scored his only one day century 				
here against New Zealand in the 1987 Reliance World Cup. 				
83. India's hockey captain K. D. Singh 'Babu' received the Helms Trophy in 1953 for being 				
the best hockey player in the world (1952) and the best sportsman of Asia (1953). This was the 				
first time an Asian was awarded the Helms Trophy - America's Nobel Prize in Sports. Ten 				
years later, in 1963, another Indian star Milkha Singh would received the Helms Trophy for 				
being the best quarter-miler in the world. 				
84. Chinnadorai Desamuthu became the youngest olympic gold medallist for India. He was 				
19 years and 272 days when India won Olympic hockey title in Helsinki . 				
85. Brahmaputra, it flows through the entire stretch of Assam. In Assam the river is sometimes 				
as wide as 10 km. Between the Dibrugarh and the Lakhimpur districts the river bifurcates into 				
two channels---the northern Kherkutia channel and the southern Brahmaputra channel. 				
The two channels join again about 100 km downstream forming the Majuli island  . 				
86. The Defense Services Staff College (DSSC) is an inter-service institution of the Indian 				
Ministry of Defence that trains officers of all three services of the Indian Armed Forces (Navy, 				
Army, Air Force) and officers from friendly foreign countries for command and staff 				
appointments. It was founded in 1905 as the Army Staff college in Deolali, and it then re- 				
located to Quetta (now Pakistan). After the partition of India and Pakistan, the Indian 				
operations relocated to its present home in Wellington Cantonment in The Nilgiris District of 				
Tamil Nadu, India. The Pakistani Operations remain in Quetta. 				
87.Established in 1949, the NDA had its origins in Clement Town near Dehra Dun; it was 				
then called the Inter-Services Wing. Old-timers who attended the celebrations recalled the days 				
when they stood in the freezing cold of January in the hill resort, outside barracks that were 				
originally built to house prisoners of war. The NDA was shifted to its present location in 				
Khadakwasla, 20 km from Pune, in 1955. 				
88. Sarnath (formerly also Mrigadava, Rishipattana, Isipatana), located 13 kilometres from 				
Varanasi, Uttar Pradesh, India, is the deer park where Gautama Buddha first taught the 				
Dharma, and where the Buddhist Sangha was founded. 				
89. Rahula (534 BC-?;) was the only son of the Buddha Siddhartha Gautama. This Pali and 				
Sanskrit name translates roughly as "chain" or "chained one," an interesting philosophical 				
contrast to Buddha, "the awakened one." It can also be translated as obstacle. Siddhartha 				
Gautama named his son Rahula in recognizing that the child could be a tie that bound him 				
to his wife Yashodhara and the comforts of the life of a householder 				
90. The hermit seer Asita journeyed from his mountain abode and announced that this baby 				
would either become a great king (chakravartin) or a great holy man. This occurred after 				
Siddhartha placed his feet in Asita's hair and Asita examined thebirthmarks. 				
91.Kondanna, the youngest, and later to be the first arahant was the only one who 				
unequivocally predicted that Siddhartha would become a Buddha . 				
92.Aishwariya Rai: Is the second Indian actress to appear on the cover of TIME magazine 				
in 2003. The first was Parveen Babi in 1976. 				
93. Pancham made his acting debut in Mehmood's Bhoot Bangla, and also featured in Pyar Ka 				
Mausam, in a comic role as Mr Popat Lal. The international album Pantera in collaboration with 				
Latin American composer, Jose Flores, 				
94. Sabarmati Ashram, also known as Gandhi Ashram, is located on the Western banks of 				
Sabarmati River, in Northern Ahmedabad. This ashram originally was established in the 				
Kochrab area of Ahmedabad in 1915. In 1917 it was shifted to the banks of Sabarmati river. 				
It also is known as Harijan Ashram, or Satyagraha Ashram. 				
95. A Letter to a Hindu was a letter written by Count Leo Nikolayevich Tolstoy in 1908 to the 				
Indian newspaper Free Hindustan. The letter sparked a relationship between Tolstoy and fellow 				
pacifist Mohandas Gandhi, who was stationed in South Africa at the time and just beginning his 				
life-long activist career. 				
96. Mani Bhavan, located at # 19, Laburnum Road in the Gamdevi precinct of downtown 				
Mumbai, acted as the focal point of Gandhi's political activities in Mumbai between 1917 and 				
1934.The mansion belonged to Revashankar Jagjeevan Jhaveri and the Mani family prior to that, 				
Gandhi's friend and host in Mumbai during this period. It was from Mani Bhavan that Gandhi 				
initiated the Non-Cooperation, Satyagraha, Swadeshi, Khadi and Khilafat movements. 				
97. Kaba Gandhi No Delo is the place where Mahatma Gandhi (Mohandas Karamchand 				
Gandhi) lived during his stay in Rajkot.Mahatma Gandhi's father, Karamchand Gandhi was 				
known as Kaba Gandhi. The words Kaba Gandhi No Delo means Kaba Gandhi's residence. 				
98. Rajiv Gandhi Prime Minister of India, Veer Bhumi, Land of Brave, A large lotus in full 				
bloom carved out of stone surrounded by 46 small lotuses to signify the years he lived; 				
rocks from all the states of India are spread around. 				
99. The Story of My Experiments with Truth (or My Experiments with Truth) - the 				
autobiography of Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (or Mahatma Gandhi) covers his life from 				
early childhood through to 1920, and is a popular and influential book. It was initiated at the 				
instance of Swami Anand and other close co-workers of Gandhi, in his mother-tongue Gujar_t_ 				
entitled Satyanā Prayogo athvā Ātmakathā, literally (My) Experiments of Truth, or Life-Story. 				
100. Mohan Jhangiani is an Indian actor.He is best known for his role as Mahatma Gandhi in 				
the 2005 Deepa Mehta film, Water. Actor Zul Vilani was the voice of Gandhi. 				
101. Bapsi Sidhwa's novel, Cracking India, (1991, U.S.; 1992, India; originally published as 				
Ice Candy Man, 1988, England), was released as the 1998 film Earth (1947 in India), 				
directed by Deepa Mehta. 				
102. Dr. Ramanna was the director of Bhabha Atomic Research Centre (BARC) for over a 				
decade. It was during this time that India carried out its first nuclear test in Pokhran in 1974, 				
codenamed Operation Smiling Buddha. 				
103:Shane Keith Warne He had an undistinguished debut, taking 1/150 (Ravi Shastri 				
caught by Dean Jones for 206) off 45 overs, and recording figures of 1/228 in his first Test 				
series. 				
104.Ganga River as in Western culture: In Rome's Piazza Navona, there is a famous 				
sculpture Fontana dei Quattro Fiumi (fountain of the four rivers), a marvelous sculptural and 				
architectural creation by Gian Lorenzo Bernini, set up in 1651. It symbolises four of the 				
world's great rivers (the Ganges, the Nile, the Danube and the Plata), representing the four 				
continents known at the time. 				
test of sight. 				
107:Pole star: Polaris, the North Star, is found by imagining a line from Merak(Pulah) to 				
Dubhe(Kratu) and then extending it for five times the distance between the two Pointers. 				
108: In Hindu astronomy the seven stars of the Saptarshi Mandal or Big Dipper or Ursa 				
Major are named as 				
Indian 				
Name 				
Kratu 				
Pulaha 				
Pulastya 				
Atri 				
Angira 				
Vasishtha 				
Marichi 				
Bayer 				
Desig 				
• UMa 				
Alioth 				
Mizar 				
Corporation. It is based in Hong Kong. STAR was set up in 1990 by Hutchison Whampoa, 				
with broadcasts commencing in 1991. In 1993 Rupert Murdoch's News Corporation 				
purchased 63.6% of STAR for over $500 million, followed by the purchase of the remaining 				
111. Notes with the portrait of Edward VIII were scheduled for release in the summer of '37. But 				
Edward's heart had its reasons and his abdication, at levels mundane, delayed the Bank's issues to 				
January 1938 when the first Five Rupee note was issued bearing the portrait of George VI. 				
112. The Gateway of India was built to commemorate the visit of King George V and Queen 				
Mary to Bombay, prior to the Darbar in Delhi in December 1911. The foundation stone was 				
laid on March 31, 1911 by the Governor of Bombay, with George Wittet's final design 				
sanctioned in August 1914. Between 1915 and 1919 work proceeded on reclamations at Apollo 				
Bunder for the land on which the gateway and the new sea wall would be built. The foundations 				
December 4, 1924 by the Viceroy, the Earl of Reading.The last British troops to leave 				
India, the First Battalion of the Somerset Light Infantry, passed through the gate in a 				
ceremony on February 28, 1948. 				
113. Prince Albert of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha (Francis Augustus Charles Albert Emanuel, 				
later HRH The Prince Consort) (26 August 1819 - 14 December 1861) was the husband and 				
consort of Queen Victoria of the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland. 				
battered cities while the government of Winston Churchill prosecuted the war.. His daughter 				
Ireland and of many other independent nations too. She became Queen on 6 February 1952. She is 				
currently the second-longest-serving head of state in the world, after King Bhumibol 				
Adulyadej of Thailand. 				
116. Edward VII and Queen Alexandra were crowned at Westminster Abbey on 9 August 1902. 				
His coronation had originally been scheduled for 26 June but two days before on 24 June, Edward 				
developed appendicitis. Thanks to the discovery of anaesthesia in the preceding 50 years he was 				
able to undergo a life-saving operation, performed by Sir Frederick Treves.. Treves was 				
117. Edward VII, mainly through his mother and his father-in-law, was related to nearly every 				
other European monarch and came to be known as the "uncle of Europe." The German Emperor. 				
On his death bed, he heard that his horse 'Witch of the Air' had won at Kempton Park. 				
118. Unto This Last is an essay on economy by John Ruskin. Gandhi adapted Unto This Last in 				
Gujarati in 1908 under the title of Sarvodaya ("well being of all"). It is also the name he gave 				
to his philosophy. Valji Govindji Desai translated it back to English in 1951 under the title of 				
Unto This Last: A Paraphrase. 				
province during the British Raj, and today is a popular holiday resort and honeymoon spot. 				
120. Bhimbetka is the largest collection of prehistoric art in India. It was discovered and 				
a Masters in International Relations from the London School of Economics and Political 				
Board for a new project of the public entrepreneur group, Res Publica. She has also 				
recently modeled for the spring-summer collection of Globus, an Indian chain of boutique. 				
She made her acting debut with the Bollywood production Dil Maange More (2004). 				
122. The "Nehru Report" (1928) was a memorandum outlining a proposed new Dominion (see 				
dominion status) constitution for India. It was prepared by a committee of the All Parties 				
Conference chaired by Motilal Nehru with his son Jawaharlal acting as secretary. 				
123.First Prime minister of Pakistan:  Liaquat Ali Khan (August 14, 1947 to Oct 16, 1951.). 				
124. Indus Water Treaty in 1960:Nehru with Pakistani ruler Ayub Khan to resolve long- 				
standing disputes about sharing the resources of the major rivers of the Punjab region. 				
the report of an analysis (Operations Review) of the Sino-Indian_war of 1962. Its authors are 				
officers of the Indian armed forces. They are Lieutenant-General Henderson Brooks and 				
Brigadier P S Bhagat, holder of a WWII Victoria Cross and commandant of the Indian Military 				
Academy at the time. 				
126.  Nayantara Sahgal (born 10 May 1927) is the second of the three daughters born to Vijaya 				
Lakshmi Pandit and her husband Ranjit Sitaram Pandit. 								
127. The Gregorian calendar is the most widely used calendar in the world. A modification of 				
the Julian calendar, it was first proposed by the Calabrian doctor Aloysius Lilius, and was 				
decreed by Pope Gregory XIII, for whom it was named, on 24 February 1582 via the papal bull 				
128. Saddam was sentenced to death on November 5 for his involvement in the Dujail 				
massacres of 1982, when 148 Shiite Muslims were killed for attempting to assassinate him. 				
129. The Konkan, also called the Konkan Coast or Karavali is the name given to a stretch of 				
rugged and beautiful section of the western coastline of India from Raigad toMangalore. 				
130. Konkan Railway had laid a 760km broad gauge route from Roha to Mangalore along the 				
western coast of India (the Konkan region). This project was substantially completed by October 				
1997 when Mr. Sreedharan was asked to take up the responsibility of construction of the 				
Delhi Metro Project. Its headquarters at CBD Belapur in Navi Mumbai and E. Sreedharan 				
as its first Chairman and Managing Director. 				
131. The Wright Flyer (often retrospectively referred to as Flyer I and occasionally Kitty 				
Hawk) was the first powered aircraft designed and built by the Wright brothers. It is 				
considered by many to be the first successful powered, piloted aircraft. 				
132. Fort Myer crash: Orville(younger) followed his brother's success by demonstrating 				
another nearly identical flyer to the United States Army at Fort Myer, Virginia, starting on 				
September 3, 1908. On September 9 he made the first hour-long flight.On September 17 Army 				
lieutenant Thomas Selfridge rode along as his passenger, serving as an official observer. A 				
few minutes into the flight at an altitude of about 100 feet, a propeller split, sending the aircraft 				
out of control. Selfridge was killed in the crash, the first person to die in powered fixed-wing 				
aircraft. 				
133. Trains halting at the same station twice The 7089/7090 Varanasi-Cochin Exp. halts at 				
Renigunta (5 minutes) after Gudur, then proceeds to Tirupati where it has a half-hour halt, 				
reverses direction and returns to Renigunta for another halt (20 minutes) and reverses direction 				
yet again to proceed to Cochin via the Arakkonam bypass. This is one of the rare trains to have. 				
134. Northernmost railway station: Udhampur. 				
The northernmost station in the Indian subcontinent is Dargai in NWFP, on a branch line 				
from Nowshera (Pakistan). 				
135.Westernmost station: Naliya, on a MG line from Bhuj. The westernmost BG station is 				
Varvala, slightly to the west of its more well-known neighbour Dwarka, on the Okha line. 				
The westernmost station on the subcontinent is Mirjawa on the Iran-Pakistan border, on the 				
Quetta-Zahidan line. However this does not seem to have a passenger service now [3/99], as 				
trains terminate at Kuh-i-Taftan, the next station towards Quetta. This is the only rail link 				
between the subcontinent and neighbouring countries. 				
136.Southernmost station: Kanyakumari. 				
137.Easternmost station: Ledo. This is on a branch line from Tinsukia. Some years ago, 				
when the network here was entirely MG, the terminus was Lekhapani, a few km to the east. The 				
BG line to Ledo actually continues up to Tirap today [2005]. There is, however, no passenger 				
station at Tirap, only a few coal sidings. The disused MG line to Lekhapani is still visible from 				
Tirap. Ledo is also the terminus of the famous Burma Road. 				
labeled the "anno Domini" (AD) era 				
and sometimes "common era" (CE). 				
138. Fastest train ever: The highest speed ever touched by a train in India is 184km/h in 2000, 				
when the LHB Alstom passenger coaches were undergoing speed trials (on the Delhi- 				
Ghaziabad route). 				
139. Highest number of halts: [3/99] The Howrah-Amritsar Exp. leads in this category with 				
115 halts. 				
140. The Narnarayan Setu bridge over the Brahmaputra at Jogighopa linking it to 				
Pancharatna (in Assam) has 18 spans, each about 120m, with 2 spans of 30.5m, for a total 				
length of 2.3km. Rail traffic has recently [2002] begun moving on this bridge. 				
141. A station inside a station On the Delhi-Kanpur route at the Hathras Junction station, one 				
can observe the MG line crossing the main BG line at right angles in the same premises. 				
However the MG station is called Hathras Road even though it is inside the yard of Hathras 				
Junction, which is the BG station. 142. Today Siliguri station (NFR) holds the distinction of 				
having three different gauges present. New Jalpaiguri (NFR) had 3 gauges present at the 				
same place: BG, MG, and NG (2'0"). 				
143. Lord Mayo, the Viceroy of India, was assassinated on 8 February 1872 at the 				
Andaman Islands, when touring his territories in HMS Glasgow; this event is recorded in both 				
the log of that ship, and William Loney's Medical Journal.The statue stood at the junction of 				
Mayo Road and Duffrin Road near the Maidan for more than ninety years, but was later 				
removed. The sculptor was Thomas Thornycroft (1815-1885). 				
2				
144. In physics, E = mc  is an important and well-known equation, which states an equivalence 				
between energy (E) and mass (m), in direct proportion to the square of the speed of light in a 				
2				
vacuum (c ). Several definitions of mass in special relativity may be validly used with this 				
equation.The equation was first derived (in a slightly different formulation) in 1905 by Albert 				
Einstein, in what are known as his Annus Mirabilis ("Wonderful year") Papers. A display of the 				
famous equation on Taipei 101 during the event of the World Year of Physics 2005. 				
145. The Chinese celebrate New Year between January 17thand February 19th. This is at 				
the time of the new moon. 				
146. The New Year in Scotland is called Hogmanay. The people in Scotland follow a ritual 				
that has a great significance. One can find barrels of tar set afire and gradually rolled down 				
the streets in the villages of Scotland. This ritual symbolizes that the old year is burned up and 				
New Year is going to begin. 				
147. The celebration of the new year is the oldest of all holidays. It was first observed in 				
ancient Babylon about 4000 years ago. 				
148.. Each of Karamchand's first two wives had daughters Maolibehn and Pankunvarbehn/ His third 				
wife had no children.Karamchand and Putlibai had four childrren Laxmidas, Rallyotbehn, Kasandas 				
and Mohandas(Mahatma). 				
149. Dr Chitra Bharucha, an Indian-born haematologist, on Monday took charge as the acting 				
chairperson of the British Broadcasting Corporation, becoming the first woman and first Asian to head 				
the giant organisation. The post of the chairman of BBC fell vacant following the resignation of Michael 				
Grade after he decided to join rival organisation ITV. 				
150. George Washington's favorite horse was named Lexington. Napoleon's favorite was 				
Marengo. 				
151. Sharks apparently are the only animals that never get sick. As far as is known, they are 				
immune to every known disease including cancer. 				
				
152. The "Caduceus":    the classical medical symbol of two serpents wrapped around a staff 				
#NAME?				
human beings. 				
153. Big Bazaar is a chain of shopping malls in India currently with 29 outlets, owned by the 				
Pantaloon Group. It works on same the economy model as Wal-Mart and has had considerable 				
success in many Indian cities and small towns. The idea was pioneered by entrepreneur 				
Kishore Biyani, the head of Pantaloon Retail India Ltd. 				
154. Motorola MING (Chinese: Moto_) is a smartphone release by Motorola aimed at the 				
Hong Kong market. MING is named for its appearance, which includes a transparent cover and 				
a 2.4" touch screen display. It is part of the moto 4 letter phones, RAZR, ROKR, RIZR, etc. 				
155. The Godrej family are the driving force behind the Grodrej Group of companies. It was 				
started by Ardeshir Godrej and his brother Pirojsha Godrej. 				
156. Unit Trust of India (UTI) was established on 1963 by an Act of Parliament. It was set 				
up by the Reserve Bank of India and functioned under the Regulatory and administrative 				
control of the Reserve Bank of India. In 1978 UTI was de-linked from the RBI and the Industrial 				
Development Bank of India (IDBI) took over the regulatory and administrative control in place 				
of RBI. The first scheme launched by UTI was Unit Scheme 1964. At the end of 1988 UTI 				
had Rs.6,700 crores of assets under management. 				
157. Godrej Sara Lee (GSL) is a joint venture company between the Godrej Group, India and				
Sara Lee Corporation, USA. It is the world's largest manufacturer of household insecticides.				
158. The oyster is usually ambisexual. It begins life as a male, then becomes a female,				
then changes back to being a male, then back to being female. It may go back and forth				
many times.				
159.Two dogs survived the sinking of Titanic, yes that's right, two DOGS survived.				
They escaped on early lifeboats carrying so few people that no one objected. Miss				
Margaret Hays of New York brought her Pomeranian with her in lifeboat No. 7, while				
Henry Sleeper Harper of the publishing family boarded boat No. 3 with his				
Pekinese, Sun Yat Sen.				
160. One of the worlds oldest breeds of dog is the Saluki. It is thought to have been				
developed in ancient Mesopotamia around 3000 B.C.				
161. Colonel Sanders (the Kentucky Fried Chicken guy in the white suit) was the				
second most recognized public figure in the world in 1979.				
163. The first living creatures that the United States ever sent into space were two				
mice, and named Benjy   & Laska, in 1958.				
164. The world's first e-mail message was sent in 1971 by Ray Tomlinson.				
165. All Uranus' satelites are named after Shakespearean characters.				
166.Ujala Blue: That's MP Ramachandran, chairman and managing director of the Rs 2 billion				
Jyothi- the man behind the magic fabric whitener brand Ujala.'By the end of 2002, Ujala, a fabric				
whitener from a company named Jyothi Laboratories (Jyothi) based in Andheri, Mumbai,				
had emerged as the market leader in the whitener segment of the Indian fabric care				
industry.				
167.Paleozoic(Silurian): Later a scorpion became first air-breathing animal.Oceans teem				
with vertebrate, jawed fish and corals.				
168. The Kalinga script: derived from Brahmi, was used for writing. Among the				
offshoots, Kalinga script had the maximum resemblance with the parent script, Brāhmī and				
later modified to Oriya script in the beginning of the second millennium. This makes				
the Oriya Script as the most unique and least distorted script among the Indic scripts.				
169. The foundation stone of Hirakud Dam was laid by Sir Howthrone Lewis, the				
then Governor of Orissa on 15th March 1946. The project report was submitted to				
Government in June 1947. The first batch of concrete was laid by Pandit Jawaharalal Neheru				
on 12th April 1948. The project was completed in 1953 and was formally inaugurated by				
Prime Minister Pt. Jawaharlal Nehru on 13th, January 1957.				
								
170. Dil Na Diya. Movie Name: Krrish (2006) Singer: Kunal Ganjawala Music Director: 				
Rajesh Roshan Lyrics: Javed Akhtar Year: 2006 Producer: Rakesh Roshan. 				
171.Chand Sifarish :The song is picturised on Kajol and Aamir Khan in the city of Delhi 				
where there are old monuments and historical places. 				
173. Ajay and Kajol have done a number of films together which include Dil Kya 				
Kare,Ishq, Pyar Toh Hona Hi Tha and the relative fiasco Raju Chacha. Main Tum 				
Aur Hum is based on a story written by Ajay Devgan himself. 174.Chand Sifarish (Shaan 				
& Kailash Kher) .,Mere Haath Main (Sonu Nigam, Sunidhi Chauhan, Aamir Khan & Kajol)* 				
,Des Rangila (Mahalaxmi Iyer),Dekho Na (Sonu Nigam & Sunidhi Chauhan),Chanda Chamke 				
(Babul Supriyo, Mahalaxmi Iyer, Master Akshay Bhagwat, Aamir Khan & Kajol)*. 				
175 French captain,Zinedine Zidane suddenly head-butted Italian defender Marco Materazzi 				
in the chest and was sent from the field. His demoralised team then succumbed 5-3 in the penalty 				
176.Kabhi Alvida Na Kehna:the script of the film has been invited to be included in the library 				
of the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences or more commonly known as the Oscars 				
.Other films that have made it to the Oscar Library are Parineeta, Salaam Namaste and Phir 				
Hera Pheri 				
177. "Rock 'N Roll Soniye"(KANK) - Shankar Mahadevan, Shaan, Mahalaxmi Iyer. Since 				
Karan Johar considers Kajol his lucky mascot, he made sure that Kajol was present in his film 				
by way of a brief appearance in the song Rock and Roll Soniye. 				
178.Item Girl: Now Bollywood has a new star - virtual 'item girl' Lady Chatterjee, created 				
by animator C. B. Arun Kumar and his team using NVIDIA Quadro workstation 				
technology. 				
179.Item Boy:Abhishek Bachchan was the first "item boy" in Rakht; Shah Rukh Khan also 				
performed an item number during the opening credits of Kaal. 				
180. History of item numbers:Karishma Kapoor:1994 - Sexy Sexy - Khuddar . 				
Urmila Matondkar:1998 - Chamma Chamma - China Gate --- also feautured in Moulin 				
Rouge .2002 - Aa Hi Jaiye - Lajja . 				
Malaika Arora Khan & Shahrukh Khan:1998 - Chaiya Chaiya - Dil Se.2005 - Kaal 				
Dhamaal - Kaal . 				
Shilpa Shetty:1999 - Maine Aai UP Bihar Lootne - Shool,2000 - Ladki Mast Mast Aila Re - 				
Jung . 				
Sushmita Sen:2000 - Mehboob Mere - Fiza . 				
Aishwarya Rai:2001 - Ishq Kameena - Shakti ,2005 - Kajra Re - Bunty aur Babli. 				
Shamita Shetty:2002 - Sharara Sharara - Mere Yaar Ki Shaadi Hai ,2002 - Chori Pe Chori 				
- Saathiya . 				
Lara Dutta:2004 - Aisa Jadoo - Khakee. 				
Koena Mitra:2004 - Saaki Saaki - Musafir. 				
Rakhi Sawant:2006 - Kismat Se Chalti Hai - Malamaal Weekly. 				
Dia Mirza :2006 - Pyaar Ki Chatni - Phir Hera Pheri. 				
Bipasha Basu:2006 - Beedi - Omkara ,2006 - Namak - Omkara. 				
Kareena Kapoor: 2006 - Yeh Mera Dil - Don. 				
Yana Gupta: 2003 - Babuji Zara Dheera Chalo - Dum, 2004 - Oh! What A Babe - Rakht. 				
				
181. A Hindi remake Don - The Chase Begins Again starring Shahrukh Khan, Priyanka 				
Chopra, Isha Koppikar and Kareena Kapoor made by Farhan Akhtar was recently released on 				
October 20, 2006. The film was first remade in 1979 in Telugu as Yugandhar starring N.T. 				
Rama Rao and Jayasudha Hindi song Khaike Pan Banaras wala was exactly the same, and 				
it was now titled Oh Rabba Yesukunna Killi. 				
A year later, Don was remade again, this time in Tamil as Billa (film) (1980) starring 				
Rajnikanth. Khaike Pan Banaras Wala as Vethallaya Pottendi Shakthi Konjam Yerudhad.. 				
The movie was also remade in Malayalam as Sobharaj (1986) with Mohanlal. 				
Amitabh Bachchan won a Filmfare award for his dual role in the film. 				
Asha Bhosle won a Filmfare award, for the song "yeh mera dil". 				
Kishore Kumar won a Filmfare award, for the song "Khaike Pan Banaras Wala." 				
182. "Khaike Paan Banaraswala"(Don 2006) - Udit Narayan,Shahrukh Khan. 				
183. Kareena Kapoor dances to the song "Yeh Mera Dil" previously performed by cabaret queen Helen. 				
184.Gangster(2006): "Ya Ali"song : Performed by Zubeen. 				
185.Yuva(2004). The movie was originally titled" Howrah Bridge" 				
186. Glenn Donald McGrath. world record for the highest number of Test wickets by a fast bowler. 				
187. Shane Keith Warne: Wickets 708(Test)  293(ODI). 				
188. Main Aayi Hoon UP Bihar Lootne       :   Chetan Shashitaal, Sapna Awasthi. 				
189. Rimi Sen an Indian actress working in the Bollywood film industry. real name, Shoumitra 				
Sen, She then played Amitabh Bachchan's and Hema Malini's granddaughter in the hit film 				
Baghban. 				
190.Suniel Shetty also has a production company called Popcorn Entertainment. He is a black 				
belt in Full Contact Kick boxing. He also is a successful businessman owning a hotel chain and 				
also owns the MISCHIEF garment outlet. 				
191. Dilip Prabhavalkar acting as Gandhi in Lage Raho Munna Bhai. 				
192. Lage Raho Munna Bhai was also screened in the United Nations auditorium on 10 				
November 2006, making it the first Hindi film to be shown there. The film was introduced by 				
Shashi Tharoor, United Nations Under-Secretary General for Communications and Public 				
Information."Bande Mein Tha Dum Vande Mataram" - sang by Sonu Nigam, Shreya Ghosal 				
and Pranab Biswas. 				
193. Mysore Pak was first created in the kitchens of the Mysore Palace by a palace cook 				
named Kakasura Madappa . 				
194. Buknu is a powdered mixture of several spices. Buknu is very popular in parts of Uttar 				
Pradesh, India.Some people say that its origin is in Kanpur. 				
195. Djahe is a spice made from ground ginger, used in Asian meat dishes. 				
196. Falooda is a South Asian refreshment drink made by using milk, vermicelli, 				
sabja/takmari, tutti frutti and sugar along with huge amounts of ice cream. 				
197.Shantanu: According to Brahma's curse, Mahabhishak  was reborn as the son of King 				
Prathiba in the Bharata dynasty. 				
198. The river Kosi in Bihar, but there were more rivers than one bearing this name. Satyavati, 				
mother of Jamadagni(grand mother of Parsuram) is said to have been changed into a river of 				
this name. 				
199.Munnar: is located at the confluence of the mountain streams Muthirappuzha, 				
Chanduvarai and Kundala. 				
200.Beur jail:  Patna. 				
201. Vamana Fifth Avatara of Vishnu, and the first incarnation of the Second Age, or Treta 				
yuga. Also he is the first Avatar of Vishnu which appears with a completely human form, 				
though it was that of a dwarf brahmin. He is also sometimes known as Upendra. 				
202.Kalki Avtar: Acceptance of the winged horseDevadatta (God-Given), the celestial parrot 				
Shuka, and the divine Nandaka (Bringer of Bliss) sword from Lord Shiva. 				
203. Angor Wat. The temple was, however, dedicated to Vishnu, and its original name was 				
Vrah Vishnulok, meaning "the sacred abode of Lord Vishnu." 				
204.Ravan's puspak viman: The myths tell of a wagon which flew by air, named "Dandu- 				
Monara". Still, the location names in Sri Lanka match to the description of a landing zone of 				
such a vehicle, "Wariyapola", (The place where airborne carriages land) is one such place, 				
which has contuors of a plateu, ideal for landing an airplane. 				
205. The other was the molestation of the apsara (celestial dancing girl) Rambha, who 				
turned out to be betrothed to Kuvera's son. Ravana was enamoured of her, and not even this 				
plea deterred him. Kuvera's son then cursed Ravana's heads to fall off, if ever he forced 				
himself on any woman. This curse is said to have kept Sita chaste, while she was Ravana's 				
captive for nearly a year. 				
206. Aum (also Om or Ohm,      ) is the most sacred syllable in Hinduism, symbolizing the 				
infinite Brahman and the entire Universe. This syllable is sometimes called the "Udgitha" or 				
"pranava mantra" . Aum is made out of the three gods Shiva and Ganesh and Gayatri. 				
Madonna had a temporary tattoo (mehendi) of the symbol "OM" in her palm for her song 				
"Frozen", from the album Ray of Light. 				
The Beatles reference the symbol in their Let It Be song "Across the Universe", singing "Jai 				
Guru Deva Aum," meaning "Salute Guru Deva, Aum." 				
207.Kali: She wears a garland of 51 heads, which represents the Varnamala, or the Garland 				
of Letters. This represents the 51 letters of the Devanagari or Sanskrit script. Hindus believe Sanskrit is a language of dynamism, and each of these letters represents a form of energy, or a form of Kali. 				
208. Rohini Devi, in Hindu mythology a consort of Vasudeva and mother of Balarama and 				
Subhadra. 				
209.Balaram.Wife Revati had two sons, Nisatha and Ulmuka. She is said to have taken part 				
with her husband in his famous drinking bouts. 				
210. One day, Nanda Maharaja requested Gargamuni, the family priest to visit their home in 				
order to give names to Krishna and Balarama. 				
211. The Mittal family owns 45% of Arcelor Mittal, the world's largest steel company.His 				
residence at 18-19 Kensington Palace Gardens was bought from Formula One car racing boss 				
Bernie Ecclestone in 2004 for £57.1 million ($105.7 million), the highest price ever paid for a 				
house. Formerly, this house was the residence of Paul Reuter, the founder of the Reuters news 				
service.Mittal has two children. He paid over £30 million/$65 million to host his daughter 				
Vanisha's wedding celebration in Vaux le Vicomte on 22 June 2004 and an engagement 				
ceremony at the Palace of Versailles on 20 June 2004, the most expensive wedding in world 				
history. His son Aditya is the CFO of Arcelor Mittal. 				
212. Ray Tomlinson initiated the use of the @ sign to separate the names of the user and their 				
machine in 1971 . 				
213.Panchatantra: Two main figures are the jackals Kalila and Dimna (Sanskrit: Karataka 				
and Damanaka). The main narrator is the philosopher (Hakim) Bidpai (Arabic: Baydaba, 				
French Pilpay), who is asked for a fable by the king Dabshalim. 				
214.Panchatantra Fables: There was a large thriving city called Mahilaropya in the southern 				
parts of our great country. There ruled a philanthropic, just and good ruler with the name of 				
Amarashakti. His sons named against their qualities - Bahushakti (the one with abundant power), 				
Ugrashakti (the one with passionate* strength) and Anantashakti, the one with limitless strength) 				
were fools.Vishna Sharma was appointed as their tutor. (The five tantras in the book are 1) 				
Mitrabhed 2)Mitrasamprapti 3) Kakolookeeyam 4) Labdhapranasham and 5) 				
Apareekshitkarakam. 				
215. Eight names of Tulasi Devi:Vrindavani: One who first manifested in Vrndavana. Vrinda: 				
The goddess of all plants and trees.Visvapujita: One whom the whole universe worships. 				
Puspasara: The topmost of all flowers, without whom Krishna does not like to look upon other 				
flowers. 				
Nandini: Seeing whom gives unlimited bliss to the devotees. 				
Krishna-jivani: The life of Sri Krishna. 				
Visva-pavani: One who purifies the three worlds. Tulasi: One who has nocomparison. 				
216 .Meenakshi. The Pandyan king, Malayathuwajan, performed a 'Yagna' seeking the				
blessing of God for a child as he had none. From the sacrificial fire appeared a 3 years old				
child with three breasts.				
216. Volkert Evertsz (short for Evertszoon) was a Dutch mariner who was shipwrecked on the 				
island of Mauritius and was supposedly the last human to see the legendary Dodo alive in1662. 				
217. Lara holds the world record of scoring most runs in a single over (28 runs against left- 				
arm spinner RJ Peterson of South Africa) in Test cricket. 				
218. Warne achieved his 700th test wicket at 3.18pm on 26 December 2006 by bowling English 				
batsman Andrew Strauss out at the Melbourne Cricket Ground, the final time Warne will play 				
professionally at that ground.  				
219.Kumble: First   wicket-Allan Lamb(old Trafford). 500 wicket:  Steve Harmison(Mohali) 				
220. Gupteswar is a famous cave shrine dedicated to Lord Shiva. It is located near Jeypore, 				
India, at the top of a limestone hill which is about 500 metres above sea level. 				
221. Historically the Coromandel Coast generally referred to the stretch of coast between Point 				
Calimere (Kodikkarai), near the delta of the Kaveri River, north to the mouths of the 				
Krishna River. Presently the Coromandel Coast is shared by the states of Tamil Nadu, Andhra 				
Pradesh and the union territory of Pondicherry. 				
222. Jhalkari Bai's saga is a study in contrast. She was the 'double' of Rani Laxmibai of Jhansi, 				
the legendary warrior who fought the invading British army in the first War of Independence. 				
A little known figure in Indian history, Jhalkari Bai lives on in the folklore of the Bundelkhand region. Laxmibai and Jhalkari Bai led the Durga Dal (women's army) repeatedly foil attacks by the British army. 				
223. Christmas in Colombia is celebrated as a very religious holiday. Presents are brought by "El 				
Niño Dios" (Baby Jesus) instead of "Papá Noél" (Santa Claus). 				
224.Chaudwar: Tradition holds that it was the capital for Virat, the brother-in-law of Kichaka. 				
Additionally, the five Pandava brothers, with their consort Draupadi, took shelter in 				
Choudwar in their secret exile. 				
225. Baaz is the name for the MiG-29 Air Superiority Fighter.Vajra is the name given for the 				
French built Dassault Mirage 2000.Garuda:  Mig-25R. 				
				
				
226. Mi-8 helicopter Rana and its subsequent upgraded version, the Mi-17 Pratap. The world famous Mi- 24 Hind Attack helicopter is called Akbar. But much before Rana, Pratap or Akbar had arrived on the scene, the IAF had the Chetak, its name for the Indian-built version of the Allouette III helicopter.				
227. Trishul is the name for the earlier MiG-21M variant, while the Vikram is the name for the				
MiG-21 Bis. 				
228. The system of dating history as AD and BC was introduced by Dionysius Exigus, a Christian monk in Rome, in 550 AD?				
229.  Only two elements are liquid at room temperature (27°C). One is Mercury (Hg) and the other is Bromine. 				
230. Hewlett-Packard has developed "Chai"(tea) a new programming language an alternative				
to Java(a type of coffee).				
231. Only two scientists have won the Nobel Prize for the same subject twice. One is 				
Frederick Sanger in Chemistry and John Bardeen(Physics).				
232. Plywood. Invented by  Immanuel Nobel, Alfred Nobel's father.				
233. Ajnabha, the older name of Bharatvarsha according to the Shrimad Bhagvad.				
234. John Bardeen He is the only person to have won two Nobel prizes in physics: in 1956 for 				
the transistor, along with William Bradford Shockley and Walter Brattain, and in 1972 for 				
a fundamental theory of conventional superconductivity together with Leon Neil Cooper and 				
John Robert Schrieffer, now called BCS theory 				
235.Frederick Sanger, biochemist and a two time Nobel laureate in Chemistry. He is the 				
fourth person in the world to have been awarded two Nobel Prizes (first three were Marie 				
Curie, Linus Pauling and John Bardeen. 				
236. Brave New World by Aldous Huxley.predicted the idea of test tube babies long before 				
this was thought possible. 				
237. The world's first stock exchange was established in Antwerp, Belgium in 1460 under 				
the rule of Philip the Good. The Antwerp exchange traded financial securities, primarily bonds. 				
238. A consortium headed by Reliance Energy Ltd of the Anil Dhirubhai Ambani Group has 				
bagged the contract for the first phase of Mumbai Metro Project along with the Mumbai 				
Metropolitan Region Development Authority. 				
The construction for the first phase -- Versova-Andheri-Ghatkopar corridor -- would 				
commence by October and is likely to be completed by 2009-10. 				
239. Maria Skłodowska-Curie (born Maria Skłodowska; known in France where she lived for 				
most of her life as Marie Curie, aka Madame Curie; Warsaw, November 7, 1867 - July 4, 1934, 				
Sancellemoz, France) was a Polish.The first two-time Nobel laureate (the only one in two 				
different sciences).    She founded the Curie Institutes in Paris, France, and in her home 				
town, Warsaw, in resurrected Poland. 				
240.  On February 17, 2005, Australia defeated New Zealand in the first men's full 				
international Twenty20 match, played at Eden Park in Auckland. The first Twenty20 				
international in England was played between England and Australia at the Rose Bowl in 				
Hampshire on the 13th June 2005. 				
241. India played its first ODI in 1974, under the captaincy of Ajit Wadekar. India won its 				
first ODI under the captaincy of Srinivasaraghavan Venkataraghavan in the 1975 Cricket 				
World Cup, against East Africa. 				
242. Swami Army or Bharat Army, the Indian equivalent of the Barmy Army, that were very 				
active in their support when India toured Australia in 2003/2004. They are known to attribute a 				
number of popular Indian songs to the cricket team. 				
243. The team's first series as an independent country was in 1948 against Sir Donald 				
Bradman's Invincibles (a name given to the Australian cricket team of that time). Australia 				
won the five-match series, 4-0. 				
244.  Lala Amarnath, India's fourth captain, led the team in its first Test match after Indian 				
independence. He also captained the side to its first Test victory and first series win, both in 				
a 3-match series at home against Pakistan in 1952. 				
245.  Vijay Samuel Hazare: led India to her first ever Test win (and the only victory under his 				
captaincy) in 1951-52 against England at Madras, winning by an innings and eight runs in a 				
match that began on the day that King George VI died. Donald Bradman's wicket three times. 				
246. Vijay hazare  and Jasu Patel were the first cricketers to be honoured with the PadmaShri. 				
247.The Feroz Shah Kotla in Delhi was the first stadium to host a Test match after 				
independence, being a draw against the West Indies in 1948, the first of a 5-Test series. 				
248. Debuting as test cricket team at Lord's, England on 25 June 1932, the Indian cricket 				
team became the sixth Test playing team. 				
249.System of dating history as AD and BC widely followed till today was introduced by 				
Dionysius Exigus, a Christian monk in Rome, in 550 AD 				
250. The Keenan Stadium(Jamshedpur) is named after a head of a steel factory which forms a 				
distinctive backdrop to the ground, along with the Dalma Hills. 				
251.GURU : film is based on the life of India's biggest petrochemicals tycoon, Dhirubhai Ambani. 				
252. A newspaper publisher Manik Dasgupta (Mithun Chakraborty) and a firebrand 				
journalist Shyam (R. Madhavan) expose many irregularities in the functioning style of Guru Bhai. 				
253. Abhishek Bachchan as ... Gurukant Desai (Dhirubhai Ambani) 				
Aishwarya Rai as ... Sujatha (Kokilaben Ambani) 				
Madhavan as ... Shyam Saxena (Arun Shourie) 				
Vidya Balan as ... Meenu   . 				
Mithun Chakraborty as ... Manikdas Gupta (Ramnath Goenka)				
Darrshan Jariwalla as ... Young Parsi Contractor (Nusli Wadia)				
254. Guru is the only movie to be shot at the premesis of the famed 'Express Estates', the 21				
acre strech in the heart of Chennai City the home of The New Indian Express and Dinamani, as the film demanded a period look for their settings of a media house.				
255.Sleeping Positions:  full-fetal, semi-fetal and sphinx . 				
256.Extra Terristorial  created by Carlo Rambaldi. played by two dwarfs named Tamara				
deTreaux and Pat Bolton. eyes were modelled on those of Einstein, Hemingway and Carl sandburg . 				
257. Mohabbatein : .				
Hindi movie is the remake of the hollywood flick 'Dead Poets Society				
258.Stamp Perforations :   blind, comb, fine line, harrow and irregular. 				
259. Ab Urbe Conditum - from the founding of the city of Rome . Before christian era was				
introduced in the 6th century AD, time was counted in the west in AUC years.				
260.   The first train in India became operational on 1851-12-22, and was used for the 				
hauling of construction material in Roorkee. 				
261.Chanakya puri: the United States Embassy and Chancery are two buildings of especial				
note, having been designed by Edward Durrell Stone. 				
262. Kajri - Mirzapur is considered the real home of the Kajri. According to a folk tale of				
Mirzapur - there was woman called Kajli whose husband was in a distant land. Monsoon 				
arrived and the separation became unbearable....she started crying at the feet of the 				
Kajmal Goddess. These cries took the form of the popular Kajri songs. There are two forms				
of Kajri singing in UP - one within which it is sung on a performance platform and the other				
when it is sung by women on monsoon evenings, while dancing in a semi-circle- this is known as				
the 'Dhunmuniya Kajri'. 				
 				
263. Kajri Purnima (full moon) is celebrated on the full moon day in the Hindu month of 				
Shravan (august), the same day as the Rakhi Purnima. Kajari Navami is celebrated in Central 				
India particularly in Madhya Pradesh, Chattisgarh and parts of Uttar Pradesh. This festival is 				
extremely significant for the farmers as it signifies the beginning of the season for sowing 				
barley and wheat and is thus considered extremely propitious. 				
				
264.Vivekananda:  was given the name Vivekananda by Maharaja of Khetri for his 				
discernment of things, good and bad . 				
265.Types of Kites: Bowed kite,Cellular or box kite,Centipede kite,Scott sled,Rogallo 				
wing,Power kite,Tetrahedral kite,Foil kite,Sport kite. 				
266. England. In the Lord's Test, More dropped the English opener Graham Gooch when 				
he was 36. Gooch went on to score 333 runs. 				
267. On 31st October 2005 Mahendra Dhoni scored 183* runs of just 145 balls. 				
He hit 10 Sixes, the most by an Indian in an Innings, and the second highest in ODI cricket 				
(The highest is 11 by Sanath Jayasuriya and Shahid Afridi) . 				
He broke Adam Gilchrist's record of 172 for the highest score made by a wicket keeper. 				
He is the second highest in scoring maximum runs in boundaries after Herschelle Gibbs of 				
South Africa. 				
268. The Zoroastrian scripture is called the Avesta and the text was written in Old				
Iranian. The Avesta consists of four major sections: the Yasna (which includes the				
Gathas which are songs that most Zoroastrians consider to be the oldest part of the Avesta				
written by Zarathustra himself), the Yashts, The Vispered and the Videvdat.				
269. 5S is the acronym for five Japanese words, seiri, seiton, seiso, seiketsu and 				
shitsuke, which signify order, cleanliness, purity and commitment.				
270. Hyundai means "modernity" in Korean. early U.S. advertising for the Hyundai				
Excel car told readers "It rhymes with Sunday."				
271. In 1985, through a technical tie-up with Toshiba Corporation of Japan, Videocon 				
International Limited launched India's first Color Television. Today, Videocon International				
Ltd., the flagship company of the Videocon Group, is India's leading manufacturer of Consumer				
Electronic products. 				
272. In 1990, a TV Series was aired on the Indian National Channel DoorDarshan titled 				
Param Vir Chakra. The tele-series was made by noted film maker Chetan Anand and ran 				
for 15 episodes. Farooq Shaikh played Somnath Sharma, Puneet Issar played Nk Jadunath 				
Singh, Vijayendra Ghatge played Lance Naik Karam Singh, Naseeruddin Shah played 				
Abdul Hamid. Anu Kapoor played Albert Ekka. 				
273.MVC with Bar: To date, there are six known awards of a first bar: Wing Commander Jag 				
Mohan Nath (1962 and 1 September 1965), Major General Rajindar Singh (19 March 1948 				
and 6 September 1965), General Arun Shridhar Vaidya (16 September 1965 and 5 				
December 1971), Wing Commander Padmanabha Gautam (6 September 1965 and 5 				
December 1971 [posthumous]), Colonel Chewang Rinchen (July 1948 and 8 December 				
1971), and Brigadier Sant Singh (2 November 1965 and January 1972),. 				
274.Indus River: It is the Official and National River of Pakistan in Urdu as Qaumi Daryaa 				
and Sindhi it is called Daryaa Badshah ,The King River. 				
275. Saptarishi; Gritsamada, Vishvamitra, Vamadeva, Atri, Angiras, Bharadvaja, 				
Vasishta. 				
276.Shiva has got three places: One is  Kailash Parvat another  is Lohit Giri under which 				
Brahamputra flows and third is Muzwan Parvat . 				
277. The Agra Fort was featured in the music video for Habibi Da, a hit song of Egyptian 				
pop star Hisham Abbas. 				
278.Inside Agra Fort: Inside the Musamman Burj, where Shah Jahan spent the last seven 				
years of his life under house arrest by his son Aurangzeb. 				
279.Gingee Fort:so well fortified was this place that Shivaji ranked it as the "most impregnable 				
fortress in India" and it was called the "Troy of the East" by the British. 				
280.Putin's biography: translated into English under the title First Person was based on 				
interviews conducted with Putin in 2000. 				
281. Judo "gentle way" is a martial art, combat sport, and philosophy, originated in Japan. 				
282. In terms of geography Libra is linked with China, Japan, Denmark, Austria, Argentina, 				
Tibet, Ethiopia, India, Italy, France, Egypt and South Africa. 				
In terms of geography, Capricorn is linked with Albania, Bulgaria, India, 				
283.Big Brother is a popular reality television format, where for around three months, a number 				
of contestants (normally fewer than fifteen at any one time) try to win a cash prize by avoiding 				
periodic publicly-voted evictions from a communal house. The show, a kind of 'real life soap', 				
was invented by the Dutchman John de Mol and developed by his production company, 				
Endemol. It has been a prime-time hit in almost 70 different countries. The show's name comes 				
from George Orwell's 1949 novel Nineteen Eighty-Four, in which Big Brother is the all- 				
seeing leader of the dystopian Oceania. 				
284According to the Puranas Brahma is self-born (without mother) in the lotus flower 				
which grows from the navel of Vishnu at the beginning of the universe. This explains his 				
name Nabhija (born from the navel). Another legend says that Brahm_ was born in water. In this 				
he deposited a seed that later became the golden egg. From this golden egg, Brahma the creator 				
was born, as Hiranyagarbha. The remaining materials of this golden egg expanded into the 				
Brahm-anda or Universe. Being born in water, Brahm_ is also called Kanja (born in water). 				
Brahm_ is said also to be the son of the Supreme Being, Brahman and the female energy known 				
as Prakrti or Maya. 				
285. According to the Matsya Purana Shatarupa was known by different names including 				
Satarupa, Sarasvati, Sandhya or Brahmi. 				
286.Temples dedicated to Brahma: Pushkar, close to Ajmer. 				
Solapur district in Maharashtra 				
Agkor Vat in Kambodia. 				
Kumbakonam, (Thanjavur District) Tamil Nadu. 				
Bramhapureeshwarar temple in Thirupattur, near Trichy. 				
287. Crescent: Shiva bears on his head the crescent of the fifth day (panchami) moon. 				
288. It is said that the ancient city of Kashi or modern Varanasi sits atop Shiva's Trishul. 				
289. Eklingji is a form of Shiva worshipped mostly in the town on Eklingji. He is reguarded as 				
the savior of the Maharajas of Mewar, Rana Pratap Singh. 				
290. Sukhdev is the son of the great guru Vyas (Avtar of lord Vishnu). He stayed inside 				
mother's womb for sixteen years. He was the first one to say maha bhgvata to the great Raja 				
Parikshit in last seven remaining days of king's life. 				
291. Pinaka may mean:The divine bow of Lord Shiva.  Ajagava: bow of Shiva 				
292. Tripura (meaning three cities, in Sanskrit) was constructed by the great architect Mayasura. 				
293.Ntini(SA):, Moingi Express  . 				
294. Barbarika: Khatushyamji's childhood name was Barbarika. His mother and relatives used 				
to call him by this name before the name Khatushyamji was given by Shri Krishna. 				
Sheesh Ke Daani: Literally: "Donor of Head." As per the legend related above. 				
Haare Ka Sahara: Literally: "Support of the defeated." 				
Teen BaaN Dhaari: Literally: "Bearer of three arrows."				
Lakha-datari: Literally: "The Munificent Giver," one who never hesitates to give his devotees 				
whatever they need and ask for. 				
Leela ke Aswaar: Literally: "Rider of Leela," being the name of his blue-coloured horse. Many 				
call it Neela Ghoda or "blue horse." 				
295.MHOW: This cantonment town was founded in 1818 by Sir John Malcolm as a result of 				
the Treaty of Mandsaur between the English and the Holkars who ruled Indore. Sir John 				
Malcolm's forces had defeated the Holkars at the Battle of Mahidpur in 1818. It was after this 				
battle that the capital of the Holkar Kingdom shifted from the town of Maheshwar on the banks 				
of the Narmada to Indore. It is believed that MHOW is an acronym for 'Military Headquarters of 				
Western India. The cool evening breeze known as Shab-e-Malwa which makes the summers 				
less harsh and so much more tolerable. 				
296.Indore was designated the summer capital of this newly created state. On November 1, 				
1956, Madhya Bharat was merged into Madhya Pradesh, whose capital city was Bhopala 				
297. Accidental Discovery of Tea:In 2737 BC, legend has it that leaves from a tree dropped into 				
Emperor Shen Nung's cup of boiling water,making it brown and aromatous. 				
298. MUMPS (Massachusetts General Hospital Utility Multi-Programming System), or 				
alternatively M, is a programming language created in the late 1960s, originally for use in the 				
healthcare industry. 				
299. After Fleming's death in 1964, subsequent James Bond novels were written by Kingsley 				
Amis (as Robert Markham), John Pearson, John Gardner, Raymond Benson, and Charlie Higson. 				
300. Rio de Janeiro Portuguese for "January River") is the name of both a state and a city in 				
southeastern Brazil. The city was the capital of Brazil (1763-1960) and of the Portuguese Empire 				
(1808-1821). Commonly known as just Rio (particularly in English and by its inhabitants), the 				
city is also nicknamed A Cidade Maravilhosa - "The Marvelous City". 				
301.Dhoom 2 : Cast  Hrithik Roshan ... Aryan/Mr. A  ;  Aishwarya Rai ... Sunehri 				
302. Twenty20 International (India)  1st 20/20 ; 1 Dec 2006 ;  Graeme Smith ; Virender 				
Sehwag   ;  New Wanderers ; India won by 6 wickets. 				
302. India's first 20-20 match:Umpires: IL Howell (SA) and BG Jerling (SA) 				
Man of the Match: KD Karthik (IND);  India 127/4 (19.5 overs); D Mongia 38 (45) 				
303.Kabul Express The film stars John Abraham, Arshad Warsi, Pakistani actor Salman 				
Shahid, Afghan actor Hanif Hum Ghum and American actress Linda Arsenio. The film is 				
produced by Aditya Chopra under Yash Raj Films and is directed by film maker Kabir Khan. 				
304. Suhel Khan (John Abraham) and Jai Kapoor (Arshad Warsi), two Indian television 				
reporters enter Afghanistan with one dangerous aim, to get an interview with a Taliban soldier. 				
Helping them in their pursuit of a Talibani is their Afghan guide, translator and driver, 				
Khyber (Hanif Hum Ghum) in his Toyota Jeep called Kabul Express. They soon come 				
across Jessica Beckham (Linda Arsenio) who is a photo journalist. 				
305. Rang De Basanti:Aamir Khan Daljit Singh/Chandrashekhar Azad . 				
Siddharth Narayan Karan Singhania/Bhagat Singh. 				
Atul Kulkarni Laxman Pandey/Ram Prasad Bismil. 				
Sharman Joshi Sukhi/Rajguru. 				
306. While filming Coolie in 1982, Bachchan was seriously injured during the filming of a 				
fight scene with co-star Puneet Issar. 				
307. Jammu was founded by Raja Jamboolochan in 14th century BC. During one of his 				
hunting campaigns he reached the Tawi River where he saw a goat and a lion drinking water 				
at the same place. The king was impressed and decided to set up a town after his name, 				
Jamboo. With the passage of time, the name was corrupted and became "Jammu. 				
308. Jalandhar is an ancient city in Jalandhar District in the state of Punjab, India. It was the 				
capital of Trigarttas (people living in the "land between three rivers": Ravi, Beas and 				
Sutlej). Jalandhar is named after Jaldhar, a demon king who lived in water as his name 				
suggests (Jal=water, dhar=in). It was the capital of Punjab until 1953, when it was replaced 				
by Chandigarh. Others say Jalandhar is derived from the fact that it is located between two 				
rivers JAL (water) & ANDHAR (in). During British occupation it was called Jullundur 				
309. Pune derives its name from Punya Nagari, or the city of virtuous deeds. Pune started out 				
as Punak-vishy — an agricultural settlement in the 7th century. By the 11th century, it was 				
known as Kasbe Pune or Punavadi when under the Mughal rule. It was known alternatively as 				
Poona by the British.Pune was also bestowed with the epithet of "Oxford of the East" by 				
Jawaharlal Nehru due to its stature as an educational hub 				
310.Shaniwar wada: In the early 18th century, prime minister of Chhatrapati Shahu, Peshwe 				
Baji Rao I wanted to make Pune his home, which was agreed to by the king. He built his palace 				
on a slightly raised ground near the Mutha river which is now known as Shaniwar Peth. 				
The fortified palace that came up is known as Shaniwar Wada. 				
311. Shri Chhatrapati Shivaji came to stay here with his mother Jijabai in 1635-36. They lived 				
in a mansion known as "Lal Mahal." 				
312. Pune was pronounced the Monsoon Capital of the Bombay Presidency. 				
				
313. Compaq Computer Corporation is an American personal computer company founded in 				
1982, and now a brand name of Hewlett-Packard.The company was formed by Rod Canion, 				
Jim Harris and Bill Murto — former Texas Instruments senior managers. The name 				
"COMPAQ" was derived from "Compatibility and Quality", as at its formation Compaq 				
produced some of the first IBM PC compatible computers. 				
314. List of Chiefs of Army Staff of Pakistan: 				
General Sir Frank Messervy (August 15, 1947 - February 10, 1948) 				
General Sir Douglas David Gracey (February 11, 1948 - January 16, 1951) 				
Field Marshal Ayub Khan (January 16, 1951 - October 26, 1958) 				
General Yahya Khan (June 18, 1966 - December 20, 1971) 				
General Tikka Khan (March 3, 1972 - March 1, 1976) 				
General Muhammad Zia-ul-Haq (April 1, 1976 - August 17, 1988) 				
General Jehangir Karamat (December 1, 1996 - October 6, 1998) 				
General Pervez Musharraf (October 7, 1998 				
315. The Nishan-e-Haider (Sign of the Lion), is the highest military award given by Pakistan 				
316. List of PAF Chiefs: 				
Air Vice Marshal Allan Perry-Keane (August 1947 - February 1949) 				
Air Vice Marshal R.L.R. Atcherley (February 1949 - May 1951) 				
Air Vice Marshal A.W.B. McDonald (February 1955 - July 1957) 				
Air Marshal Asghar Khan (July 1957 - July 1965) 				
317. Indian frigate INS Khukri hit by the submarine PNS Hangor. 				
318. A Qing-Qi (or "ching-chee"), a cross between a motorcycle and auto-ricksaw, is a new 				
form of transport in Pakistan. 				
319. An engineering division of the Indian Army, DANTAK, uses contract Indian labour to 				
maintain highways in Western Bhutan, which have a strategic value as well as a more 				
obvious economic benefit. 				
320. The southern ranges are broken gorges scoured out by the main rives of Bhutan, the 				
Amochu (Torsa), the Wangchu (Raidak), the Mochu (Sankosh) and the Dongme Chu 				
(Manas) which flow mostly in the north-south direction. 				
321. Raised in Apr 1960 at Srinagar, BEACON is the Pioneer Project of BRO.  Brig BP 				
Wadhera, the first Chief Engineer, coined the slogan "Beacon Bole Changla". 				
322.Raised in Feb 1960, TUSKER was the first Project of the BRO which was renamed as 				
VARTAK in Jun 63.  Deployed in the states of Arunachal Pradesh and Assam, the Project is 				
poised to undertake and manage works to the tune of Rs 120 Crore per year. 				
323.Born as DRAGON in Aug 1960, the Project was re-named as SWASTIK on 01 				
Nov 1968.   Raised primarily for construction and maintenance of roads in the erstwhile				
Kingdom of Sikkim (a part of UOI since 1975), the Project is presently involved in				
construction works in West Bengal, Sikkim, Jharkhand, Orissa and the Andaman and				
Nicobar Islands. 				
324.Udayak: Raised in Jun 1990 to execute works in the states of Arunachal Pradesh, Nagaland				
and Assam in northeastern sector.				
325. Historically, Bhutan was known by many names, such as 'Lho Mon' (Southern Land of				
Darkness), 'Lho Tsendenjong' (Southern Land of the Sandalwood), 'Lhomen Khazhi' 				
(Southern Land of Four Approaches), and 'Lho Men Jong' (Southern Land of Medicinal Herbs).				
326. Kuensel was the sole newspaper in Bhutan up until April 2006 when it was joined by the				
Bhutan Times.				
327.The highest award given by the Bangladesh Armed Forces is the Bir Sreshtho, given to				
the bravest of Martyrs.Other awards include Bir Uttam, Bir Bikram and Bir Pratik. 				
328. Sena Saubhagya Bhaskar -- Awarded to military personnel who at grave risk of life 				
perform distinguished acts of gallantry in a combat situation. This is the highest Nepali 				
award for gallantry.with the image of the sun (in stylized Nepali form) in the center,				
surrounded by the legend ""Mrityormamritam Gamaya / Sena Saubhagya Bhaskar" or "Lead me				
from death to deathlesness / "???". Above, there is a crown. Suspended from a straight-bar				
suspension by two kukris, handles to the center and blades upward. Reverse: An upright trident				
against a background of the Himalayas. On a scroll below, the legend .Surrounding all, the petals				
of a stylized eight-petaled lotus blossom.				
329.Nepal National anthem: The National Anthem Selection Task Team (NASTT) has, on 30th 				
November, 2006, selected poet Byakul Maila (real name: Pradeep Kumar Rai)'s song as the				
new National Anthem of Nepal:" We are hundreds of flowers, the one garland - Nepali 				
.Sovereign, spread out from Mechi to Mahakali." 				
330. The name "Pakistan" means "Land of the Pure" in Sindhi, Urdu and Persian. It was				
coined in 1934 by Choudhary Rahmat Ali, who published it in the pamphlet Now or Never. 				
331.Srilanka's Medals: Parama Veera Vibushanya -- Awarded for combat acts of bravery and				
gallantry of the highest order. Established: 1971, modified 1979.				
Veerodhara Vibushanya -- Awarded to recognize the highest degrees of non-combatant 				
bravery. VeerVickram Vibushanya -- Awarded for acts of gallantry in saving the lives of others.				
332. Cooch Behar Palace, also called the Victor Jubilee Palace, is a landmark in the Cooch				
Behar city, West Bengal was designed after the model of Buckingham Palace of London in				
1887 during the reign of Maharaja Nripendra Narayan. 				
333. Mariam-uz-Zamani (born Rajkumari Hira Kunwari, eldest daughter of Raja Bihar 				
Mal, Raja of Amber, India) was a Rajput princess, the senior wife of Akbar, married in 1562, and 				
mother of Jahangir. Her previous name was Jodhabai, but she changed it when she married 				
Akbar. Her tomb, built in 1611 AD is on the Delhi-Agra National Highway, near Fatehpur Sikri. 				
A mosque in Lahore, Pakistan was built in her honour, Mosque of Mariyam Zamani Begum. 				
334. Hiran Minar is set in peaceful evirons near Lahore in Sheikhupura, Pakistan. It was 				
constructed by Emperor Jehangir as a monument to Mansraj, one of his pet antelopes. 				
335.Last Moghuls: Colonel Muhammad Shahid Sarwar Azam (Retd), former Commandant 				
of 902 Central workshop, Deputy Sector Commander of BANBAT forces in Sierra Leone, West 				
Africa was also the Sector Commander of Bangladesh Rifles for Rajshahi Sector, incidentally, a 				
similar, if not same position was held by Prince Jalaluddin Mirza, his great grandfather at 				
King Dighapatia's court. His younger brother Lt. Col Muhammad Sarwar Alam is a doctor 				
of radiology in the Combined Military hospital.(Bangladesh). 				
336. Credited cast: WATER( River Moon); Lisa Ray ....  Kalyani 				
Seema Biswas ....  Shakuntala ; Kulbhushan Kharbanda ....  Sadananda 				
Waheeda Rehman ....  Bhagavati ; Raghuvir Yadav ....  Gulabi (as Raghubir Yadav); John 				
Abraham ....  Narayan  ; Mohan Jhangiani ....  Mahatma Gandhi ,  Sarala ....  Chuyia 				
337.Padma Bibhusan: Fali Nariman; Khushwant Singh; P N Bhagwati;  Late Shri Raja Rao 				
(Posthumous) 				
338.Padma Bhusan: Javed Akhtar; Bharti Mittal; J J Irani, Pepsi chief Indra Nooyi, Suzuki Motor 				
Corporation chief O Suzuki, IIM (Ahmedabad) director Bakul Dholakia and well known American 				
writer Amitav Ghosh . 				
339. Cuttack is referred to as a city with Babaan Bazaaar,Thepan gaali i.e. a city having 52 				
markets and 53 streets. 				
340.Sania Mirza: 2006, 15th Asian games, Doha, Qatar: Mixed doubles - won gold medal for 				
India partnering Leander paes. They beat Japan's Satoshi Iwabuchi and Akiko morigami 7-5, 5-7, 6- 				
2.First Indian woman to win a WTA singles title defeating Alyona Bondarenko of Ukraine in the 				
Hyderabad Open Finals. 				
341. Zakir Hussain: co-composed the opening music for the Summer Olympics in Atlanta. 				
342.Viswanathan Anand: Padma Shri, youngest ever recipient. 				
343.Vandana(UP), winner of this year's Geeta Chopra Award for her act of bravery(2006-7) 				
344. Teja Sai and Doondieswar have been awarded the Sanjay Chopra Award jointly. 				
345.The first to appear in the parade were winners of the Param Vir Chakra and Ashok Chakra, the nation's highest gallantry awards, followed by mounted columns of the 61st Cavalry led by  Malaysian Prince Captain Tunku Ismail Ibrahim, the first foreigner to take part in the parade.				
346.A float on military world games to be hosted by India later this year with its mascot 'Bravo', the great India bison, stood out for their uniqueness.				
347. The fylfot (a.k.a. swastika) is among the holiest of Jain symbols. Worshippers use rice grains to create fylfot around the temple altar.				
348.Pawapuri in Bihar (an eastern state in India) is a holy site for Jains, located 38 kilometers from Rajgir and 90 kilometers from Patna, the capital of Bihar.Around 500 BC, Lord Mahavira, the last of the 24 Tirthankaras and one of the founders of Jainism, breathed his last here. This is the place where Lord Mahavira achieved Moksha or Nirvana (Salvation from the endless cycle of life and death). He was cremated at Pawapuri, also known as Apapuri ("the sinless town"). There was a great rush to collect his ashes, with the result that so much soil was removed from the place of his cremation that a pond was created.				
349. The history of the potato has its roots in the windswept Andes Mountains of South America. The tough pre-Columbian farmers first discovered and cultivated the potato some 7,000 years ago.Arouind 1570,  the first potato made its way across the Atlantic to make a start on the continent of Europe. 				
350. The tomato (Solanum lycopersicum, formerly Lycopersicon lycopersicum) is a plant in the				
Solanaceae or nightshade family, native to Central, South, and southern North America from 				
Mexico to Peru. The word tomato derives from a word in the Nahuatl(Mexico) language, 				
tomatl. The specific name, lycopersicum, means "wolf-peach" . Tomatoes were originally				
known as "Love Apples", possibly based on a mistranslation of the Italian name pomo d'oro 				
(golden apple) as pomo d'amore.				
351. 26 January:Holidays and observances:Australia - Australia Day. India - Republic Day ; 				
Uganda - Liberation Day; International Customs Day. 				
352. The hut of a Toda Tribe of Nilgiris, India.The tribe bears a lot of similarity to the 				
Aborigines in Australia. 				
353. Preamble of the Flag Code of India says that: "The significance of the colours and the 				
chakra in the National Flag was amply described by Dr. S. Radhakrishnan in the Constituent 				
Assembly which unanimously adopted the National Flag. 				
354. There is also a provision by which a woman can also divorce her husband. This is 				
called Kullahi.(Islam) 				
355.Islam Saba-yatra: People may take turns in carrying the corpse. The procession is called 				
Janasa. 				
356. The Jains believe that the dead soul would be reborn immediately. So for them death is 				
a festival or Mahotsav. 				
357. When a child is born into the Sikh fold, the maternal grandparents gift him a package 				
called Shushak, which consists of clothes for the child and his family, a spoon, glass, and a 				
bowl for the child, money and gold ornaments for the child according to their financial status. 				
358. Nanke Chak:The bride's maternal grandparents and uncle spend a reasonable amount 				
for the wedding of the girl ,like clothes ,jewellery and they also host one meal. 				
359. The Kemetic(Egypt) religion embodies a system of spiritual cultivation, the oldest in the 				
world. The next closest tradition in terms of age would be Vedic tradition of India, which 				
based on the Rig Veda, could be traced back to about 1500 BCE, and even the Vedic tradition 				
would appear also to owe some of its spiritual science to Kemet. In the pre-history period of 				
Egypt, and during the Old Kingdom, Egypt was referred to as Kemet. 				
360. The Faravahar, Fravahar(Avestan), Farvard (middle Persian), Fravard or Fravahr is one of 				
the best known symbols of the Zoroastrian religion.The "Fravahar," the winged disc with a 				
man's upper body that is commonly used as a symbol of the Zarathushtrian religion since 19th 				
century, has a long history in the art and culture of the ancient Near and Middle East. 				
361.Kathmandu: It is an urban and suburban area of about 1.5 million inhabitants in the tri-city 				
area in the Kathmandu Valley in central Nepal, along the Bagmati River. 				
362.Patan(Nepal):   Four stupas around the city of Patan said to have been erected by 				
Charumati, daughter of Ashoka the Great, a Mauryan king, 				
363. The city of Kathmandu is named after a structure in Durbar Square called 				
Kaasthamandap. In Sanskrit, Kaasth "wood" and Mandap = "covered shelter." This unique 				
temple, also known as Maru Satal, was built in 1596 A.D. by King Laxmi Narsingh Malla. 				
The entire structure contains no iron nails or supports and is made entirely from wood. Legend 				
has it that the timber used for this two story pagoda was obtained from a single tree.Kathmandu 				
is also sometimes called "Kantipur. 				
364.Islamabad in The Potohar Plateau: lies between the Indus river on the west and the 				
Jhelum river on the east. Its northern boundary is formed by the Margalla Hills and the Kala 				
Chitta Range. 				
365. Majlis-e-Shoora :is the bicameral federal legislature of Pakistan that consists of the Senate 				
(upper house) and the National Assembly (lower house). According to Article 50 of the Constitution 				
of Pakistan, the Council consists also of the President of Pakistan. The National Assembly of 				
Pakistan has 342 members; 72 of these members are women. Pakistani law requires that at least 				
20% of the members be women.The Senate has a 100 members; currently 18 of these members are 				
women, one greater than the required number. 				
366. Baitul Mukarram's(National Mosque of Bangladesh) resemblance to the famous Ka'abah at 				
Makkah makes this a unique mosque in Bangladesh. 				
367.Thimpu: The city sprawls across the western slopes of the Wang Chhu river valley, with a 				
government quarter centered on Tashichoedzong. 				
368. Kabul:Timur Shah Durrani made it the capital of modern Afghanistan. 				
369. Kabul: was known as Chabolo in antiquity. According to other scholars, the Sanskrit name of 				
Kabol or Kabul is Kamboj . Gazetteer of Bombay Presidency 1904 maintains that ancient name of 				
Kabol was Kambojapura which Ptolemy (160 CE) mentions as Kaboura. Hiuen Tsang refers to 				
the name as Kaofeu. 				
370. Kabul International Airport :also known as Khwaja Rawash Airport is located 16 				
kilometers (9 miles) from downtown Kabul, Afghanistan.Kam Air: The airline was founded on 31 				
August 2003 by Z. M. Kamgar and was the first privately owned passenger airline in Afghanistan. 				
371. The name Thrissur is derived from 'Thiru-Shiva-Perur' which literally translates to "The 				
city of the SACRED SIVA". Thrissur was also known as Vrishabhadripuram and Then 				
Kailasam (Kailasam of the south) in ancient days. 				
372. The Church of Our Lady of Dolors,(Trichur) popularly known as the New Church [called 				
Puthenpalli locally]. It is the biggest church in South Asia. 				
373. Calico was made by the traditional weavers of calicut called 'chaliyans'. 				
374. King Solomon is a figure described in Middle Eastern scriptures as a wise ruler of an empire 				
centred on the united Kingdom of Israel. He was born in Jerusalem about 1000 B.C.E. and 				
reigned over Israel from about 970 to 928 B.C.E. 				
375. Mahan Air is an airline based in Tehran, Iran. 				
376.Johansburg:2007  This year marks the centenary of the beginning of his Satyagraha 				
movement, originated in the city on 11 September 1906. The philosophy was born out of his 				
experiences while living in Johannesburg with his family from 1903 to 1914. Gandhi leaves his 				
gentle footprint around the town - from the house in Albermarle Street in Troyeville where he and 				
his family stayed in the early 1900s; Victory House in the CBD, where Gandhi was refused entry to 				
use the city's first lift; to the Old Fort prison where Gandhi served two prison terms of several 				
months each in 1908. But perhaps the most significant site was the Empire Theatre - long 				
demolished but originally on the corner of Commissioner and Ferreira streets -where the 				
Satyagraha movement was born. 				
377. Mahadeva temple(Vaikom), also known as Thekkan Kashi (Southern Varanasi), is situated 				
here and is famous for Ashtami (vaikattashtami). 				
378. Vaikom Satyagraha (1924 - 25) was a satyagraha (movement) in Travancore now part of 				
Kerala against untouchability in Hindu society. 				
379.The first Padma Bhusan awardee:(1954) M. Ganapati, Engineer ;Josh Malihabadi, Urdu 				
poet. 				
380.LOC Kargil:Ajay Devgan ..Lt. Manoj Kumar Pandey,  Sunil Shetty .  Sepoy Sanjay Kumar, 				
Manoj Bajpai . Gren. Yogender Singh Yadav,  Abhishek Bachchan . Capt.Vikram Batra. 				
381. A local princess Vidyotama, who vowed to marry only a man who defeated her in debate, 				
outwitted all the scholars in the kingdom. These insulted scholars managed to present the dim- 				
witted Kalidasa as a learned man and even got her married to him. 				
382.VAT: VAT was invented by a French economist in 1954. Maurice Lauré, joint director of 				
the French tax authority, the Direction générale des impôts, as taxe sur la valeur ajoutée (TVA in 				
French) was first to introduce VAT with effect from 10 April 1954 for large businesses, and 				
extended over time to all business sectors in France. 				
383. In India, VAT replaced sales tax on 4 January 2005. Though some states did not opt for 				
VAT (for political reasons), majority of the States embraced VAT, with Haryana , the first. 				
384.Kavi Pradeep: Born Ramchandra Barayanji Dwivedi in 1915 into a middle-class 				
Brahmin family in the small central Indian town of Badnagar, in Madhya Pradesh state. 				
385.RN Tagore: He published his first substantial poetry—under the pseudonym 				
Bhanushingho ("Sun Lion")—in 1877 . 				
386. MTNL provides fixed line telephones, cellular connection of both GSM — 				
Dolphin(Postpaid) and Trump (prepaid) and WLL (CDMA) — Garuda-FW And Garuda- 				
Mobile and internet services through dialup and DSL — Broadband internet. 				
387.MTNL has formed a Joint Venture company in Nepal by the name of United Telecom Ltd. 				
(UTL) in collaboration with Telecom Consultants India Limited (TCIL), Videsh Sanchar Nigam 				
Limited (VSNL) and NVPL (Nepal Ventures Pvt. Ltd., a Nepalese Company) MTNL has set up 				
its 100% subsidiary, Mahanagar Telephone Mauritius Limited. (MTML) in Mauritius. 				
388.VSNL's roots date back to two telegraph companies, Eastern Telegraph Co. (ETC, 				
founded 1872) and Indian RadioTelegraph Co. (IRT, founded 1927). The two merged in 1932 				
to form Indian Radio and Cable Communications Co. (IRCC). VSNL was incorporated on 				
1986-04-01 as a wholly owned government entity under the Indian Companies Act, 1956. In 				
2002 the Indian Government privatized VSNL. The Tata Group group acquired a 				
controlling stake in VSNL-Tata Indicom. 				
389. The Inverted Head Four Annas of India is a famous stamp prized by collectors. The 1854 				
first issues of India included a Four Annas value in red and blue, believed to be the world's 				
first multicolor stamp.Shape-Octagonal. 				
390.  India's costliest stamp is an 1854 four-anna stamp that was printed with Queen 				
Victoria's portrait upside-down. This stamp became known as the 'inverted head' and only 28 				
are known to exist. Amongst post-Independence stamps, the Rs.10 Mahatma Gandhi issue of 				
1948 with "SERVICE" overprinted is the most valuable. The stamp is part of a set of four, 				
printed in Switzerland. They are the only stamps to be printed outside India since 1925. 				
391.Vikramaditya: The name is a Sanskrit tatpurusha, from (vikrama) meaning "valour" and 				
ffditya, son of Aditi. One of the most famous sons of Aditi, or adityas, was Surya the sun god; 				
hence, Vikramaditya means Surya, translating to "Sun of valour". He is also called Vikrama or 				
Vikramarka (Sanskrit arka meaning the Sun). 				
392.Vikram Samvat:The Kathanaka (meaning, "an account") tells the story of a famed Jain 				
monk Kalakacharya. It mentions that Gardabhilla, the then powerful king of Ujjain, 				
abducted a nun called Sarasvati who was the sister of the monk. The enraged monk sought 				
help of the Saka ruler, a Shahi, in Sakasthana. Despite heavy odds (but aided by miracles) the 				
Saka king defeated Gardabhilla and made him a captive. Sarasvati was repatriated. 				
Gardabhilla himself was forgiven though. The defeated king retired to the forest where he was 				
killed by a tiger. His son, Vikramaditya, being brought up in the forest, had to rule from 				
Pratishthana (in modern Maharashtra). Later on Vikramaditya invaded Ujjain and drove 				
away the Sakas. To commemorate this event he started a new era called the Vikrama Samvat. 				
393.Kathasarit sagar: A famous 11th century CE collection of Indian legends, fairy tales and 				
folk tales by Somadeva. It means in Sanskrit 'The ocean of the streams of stories'. 			
				
				
394 The tales of the throne are linked to the throne of Vikramaditya that is lost and recovered by 				
king Bhoja, the Paramara king of Dhar, after many centuries. This latter king is a himself famous and 				
this set of tales tell about his attempts to sit on the throne. This throne is adorned by 32 female 				
statues who challenge him to ascend the throne only if he is as magnanimous as Vikramaditya in 				
the tale she is about to narrate. This leads to 32 attempts (and 32 tales) on Vikramaditya and in each 				
case Bhoja acknowledges his inferiority. Finally the statues let him ascend it pleased with his humility. 				
395.Vikram Samvat: In the Hindu tradition in India and Nepal, the widely used ancient calendar is 				
Vikrama Samvat or Vikrama's era. This is said to have been started by the legendary king following 				
his victory over the Sakas in 56 BC. 				
396. In the Philippines, a game known as syatong is similar to gilli-danda. 				
397. Hong Kong International Cricket Sixes is a high-profile annual nine team international 				
cricket tournament held in Hong Kong.. It is currently sponsored by Cathay Pacific and Standard 				
Chartered.It was made for television with rules and a venue which encourages aggressive batting, and 				
because every player (except the wicket-keeper) bowls, the format suits all-rounders. Many 				
fours and sixes are hit, partly because the grounds used - the Hong Kong Stadium and the 				
Kowloon Cricket Club are relatively small. 				
Games are played between two teams of six players, and each game consisted of a maximum of 				
five eight-ball overs bowled by each side.*Each member of the fielding side bowls over, one with 				
the exception of the wicketkeeper. Wides and no-balls count as two runs. 				
If five wickets fall before 5 overs are completed, the last remaining batsman bats on with the 5th 				
batsman acting as runner. He always takes strike. The innings is complete when the sixth wicket 				
falls.Batsmen retire not out on reaching 30 runs. The idea being to reach 29 runs and then hit a 				
six to get 35 runs. A tournament points system awards two points for each match won. 				
398.The IHC initially was divided into 10 Division Companies corresponding to the 10 existing 				
Military Divisions in India and Burma and they were located at Peshwar, Rawalpindi, 				
Lahore, Quetta, Mhow, Poona, Meerut, Lucknow, Secunderabad and Rangoon. The whole 				
corps was re-organised on command basis during the year 1929-32 and thus there were five 				
companies of the IHC in 1932, No 1 Company at Rawalpindi, No 2 Company at Lucknow, 				
No 3 Company at Poona. No 4 Company at Quetta and No 5 Company at Rangoon. On 				
separation of Burma in 1935, No 5 Company of IHC was formed as Burma Hospital Corps 				
and this left four companies of IHC. 				
399.IMS: Sarjoo Coomar Goodeve Chauckerbutty was the first Indian to enter the service as 				
Assistant Surgeon on 24 Jan 1855. The history of the Indian Medical Service (IMS) dates 				
back to 1612 when on the formation of the East India Company into a joint stock business, 				
the Company appointed John Woodall as their first Surgeon General. 				
400. Armed Forces Medical College, Pune: In December 1941 in IHC-VCOs (Indian Hospital 				
Corps-Viceroy Commissioned Officers) and NCOs (Non Commissioned Officers) school was 				
established with No.3 Indian Hospital Corps battalion in Pune , later evolved into the Army 				
Medical Training Centre (AMTC) in January 1942. The AMTC was the forerunner of the 				
present Armed Forces Medical College (AFMC) at Pune, which was raised on 01May48. 				
401. Operation Parakram:After the December 13, 2001 attack on the Indian Parliament, 				
Operation Parakram was launched under which tens of thousands of Indian troops were 				
deployed along the Indo-Pakistan border. 				
402.Kangla fort: Manmohan singh officially handed over the historic Kangla Fort to 				
Manipur state government, which issued an ordinance taking over the administration and 				
control. It had been the headquarters of the paramilitary force, the Assam Rifles, since 1915. 				
Rosa macrocarpa, the beautiful species of rose, was discovered by Sir George Watt in Manipur. 				
403. The river Jhelum was called Vitasta by the ancient Indians in the Vedic period and 				
Hydaspes by the ancient Greeks.. The name survives the  Kashmiri name for this river as Vyath. 				
404.Beas :The river was also known as Arjiki or Vipas to the ancient Indians and the Hyphasis 				
to the Ancient Greeks. 				
405. Shawwal: is the tenth month on the Lunar Islamic calendar. The first day of Shawwal is 				
Eid ul-Fitr. 				
406.FIFA world cup football: the most famous historical moments in the women's tournament 				
is Brandi Chastain's victory celebration after scoring the Cup-winning penalty shot against 				
China in 1999. She took off her jersey and waved it over her head (as men frequently do), 				
showing her muscular torso and sports bra, as she celebrated. 				
407. Melbourne Park: is a sporting arena in Melbourne, Victoria, Australia. It is located by the 				
Yarra River near the southeast corner of the central business district.Melbourne Park is a part of 				
the sporting and entertainment precinct that also includes Olympic Park and Yarra Park. It is the 				
home of the annual Australian Open tennis tournament, which is played each year in 				
January and February. The venue was the home of the Melbourne Tigers basketball team. 				
It was originally known as the National Tennis Centre at Flinders Park until 1996, when 				
then-Premier Jeff Kennett decided to rename it Melbourne Park . 				
408. Corduroy is believed to have been first produced in Manchester England, the world's 				
first Industrial City. Manchester was referred to as Cottonopolis because of the large 				
number of cotton spinning mills located here. Corduroy is a textile composed of twisted fibers 				
that when woven lie parallel (similar to twill) to one another to form the cloth's distinct 				
pattern, a "cord . 				
409. Chiffon, which is a French word for rag, is a lightweight sheer material with a slightly 				
rough feel to it. It can be made from cotton, silk or synthetic fibers, but is usually associated 				
with silk or nylon . 				
410.Muslin is a type of finely-woven cotton fabric, introduced to Europe from the Middle East 				
in the 17th century. The first recorded use in England was in 1670. It was named for the city 				
where it was first introduced to them, Mosul in what is now Iraq, but the fabric originated 				
from Dhaka in what is now Bangladesh. 				
411.Rayon is produced from naturally occurring polymers and therefore it is not a synthetic 				
fiber, but a manufactured regenerated cellulosic fiber. 				
412. Reva Electric Car Company, earlier known as Maini Amerigon, was incorporated in 1995 				
as a joint venture between the Maini Group and AEVT Inc. of Irvindale, California, to 				
manufacture environment friendly, cost-effective electric vehicles for in-city mobility solutions. 				
413.   Remo Fernandes. He sang the song "Humma Humma in the Hindi version of the hit 				
movie produced - Bombay. The song went on to earn Remo a Double Platinum. 				
"Huya Ho" was the next song he composed for the film "Khamoshi" which was released in 				
1996.In 1998, along with his newly formed band called the Microwave Papadums. He 				
released his first and only Hindi/pop album to date titled "O, Meri Munni" and in 2000 became 				
the first Indian artist to have a song officially released solely on the Internet. The "Cyber 				
Viber" generated 16,000 downloads in 2 weeks.  his first hit album "Pack That Smack" in 1986 				
and "Bombay City" the next year, he became the highest-selling English rock musician in India 				
.  Second was singing to an audience in Bombay at a concert called Aid Bhopal, held to raise 				
funds for victims of the Bhopal gas tragedy, in which he sang two songs 'Pack that Smack' and 				
'Ode to Graham Bell'. To his surprise, the concert with both his songs, were televised by 				
Doordarshan on four successive Sundays at prime time. 				
414. In 1991, Rahman began his own studio (attached to his house), called the Panchathan 				
Record Inn. He initially composed music for use in advertisements, the title music of Indian 				
Television channels  etc. a scholarship to Trinity College at Oxford University, where he 				
graduated with a degree in Western classical music. 				
415.AR Rahaman He made an album Vande Mataram (1996) on India's national song, singing 				
the title song on the album. He followed it up with an album called Jana gana mana, a huge 				
conglomeration of performances by all the leading exponents/artists of Indian classical 				
music.Andrew Lloyd Webber, a well known composer of musicals, was impressed with 				
Rahman's unique style and therefore hired him to compose his maiden stage production Bombay 				
Dreams (2002). This play was well received in England. Furthermore, Rahman, along with the 				
Finnish folk music band Värttinä, composed the music for The Lord of the Rings theatre 				
production, which opened in Toronto on March 23, 2006. His first movie album Roja was listed 				
in TIME magazine's "Top 10 Movie Soundtracks of All Time". 				
416. Madhusudan Gupta, became the first man in modern India to dissect a human body. 				
417.The Central Drug Research Institute (CDRI), a national laboratory of the Council of 				
Scientific and Industrial Research (CSIR), was declared open by Pt. Jawaharlal Nehru on 17th 				
February 1951. Housed in the historic Chattar Manzil Palace (Farhat Bakhsh) on the bank of 				
river Gomati in Lucknow.The Chattar Manzil was built by Gen. Claude Martin, a French businessman 				
418. Bareilly is home to a number of famous hindu temples. It has four Nath (Shiva) temples at 				
its four corners, Alakhnath, Tiberinath, Madhinath, and Dhopeshwarnath. One of the well 				
known temples is the Shri Laxmi Narayan Mandir (located in Katra Manrya street near Bara 				
Bazar). This temple was built by the efforts of a Muslim Chuuna Miya . There is also another 				
reputed temple of lord DoopeshwarNath which is assumed to be the place where Draupadi and 				
Drishtadyumn were born by a grace of lord shiva in Mahabharata era. 				
419. Dadhichi or Dadhicha was a Vedic king, son of Atharvan, who turned a great Rishi. 				
Dadhicha gave his bones to destroy Vritra. Vritra (a brahmin in this version) became the head of 				
the Asuras.The Devas collected the bones and Indra crafted the Vajrayudha from them. 				
When they engaged Vritra again, the battle lasted for 360 days and the brahmin breathed his last. 				
420.Siva is worshipped in the country of the Kalingas in the form of a tiger. Siva has an image 				
in the country of the Kalingas that is called Vyaghreswara. 				
421.The theme song penned by Gulzar saab for the olympic torch relay event, "Lau se lau 				
jalti hai" is now officially released by Music Today in an Album titled "Athens". "Athens" 				
has nine songs sung by Kavita Subramanium and Seetha Subramanium (daughter of Kavita) and 				
composed by L. Subramanium. 				
422. Durga:Her face was sculpted by Shiva, torso by Indra, breasts by Chandra (the moon), 				
teeth by Brahma, bottom by the Earth, thighs and knees by Varuna (water), and her three eyes by 				
Agni (fire). Each god also gave her their own most powerful weapons, Rudra's trident, 				
Vishnu's discus, Indra's thunderbolt, Brahma's kamandal, Kuber's gada etc. Himalayas 				
gifted her a fierce white tiger. On the end of the 8th & beginning of the 9th day of waxing 				
moon, Chanda and Munda came to fight. 				
423. Miyan Tansen accepted Islam at the hands of the great Sufi mystic and saint - Shaykh 				
Muhammad Ghaus of Gwalior who was also his teacher and spiritual guide. He lies buried in 				
the mausoleum complex of this great Shaykh of Gwalior. 				
424. Calicut is the Anglicised form of 'Kalikut', Arabic for the Malayalam name Kozhikode. 				
According to the historian K.V. Krishnan Iyer, the term means koyil (palace) kodu (fortified). 				
Calicut came to be called the 'City of Zamorins' . 				
425.  Beypore is a port city situated 10 km south of calicut at the mouth of chaliyar river. 				
Beypore is famous for its ancient shipbuilding yard, which constructed 'uru' the traditional 				
trading vessels of Arabs . 				
426. Koodiyattam is a traditional performing artform from Kerala, India. Recognised by 				
UNESCO as a Human Heritage Art, this form of Sanskrit drama is considered to be at least 				
2000 years old. Kulasekhara Varma Cheraman Perumal, an ancient King of Kerala is known as 				
the creator of Koodiyattam in the present form, and his Aattaprakaram is considered as the 				
most authoritative publication on the art form. 				
427. Traditionally, Koodiyattam has been presented by Chakyars. The name Koodiyattam as 				
its name suggests is a combined performance of Chakyar and Nangyar. Traditionally 				
Mizhavu, a special percussion instrument was the only instrument used in Koodiyattam 				
performances. Off late Edakka, another traditional drum has also been used as 				
accompaniment. Chakyar is the main actor who performs the ritualistic Koothu and Koodiyattam 				
inside the temple or in the Koothambalam. The female roles are done by ladies of Nambiar community called Nangyaramma.Traditionally, a person belonging to Nambiar plays the Mizhavu. 				
Nangyaramma accompany Nambiar with kuzhithalam(a type of cymbal). 				
428.Bhasa: His most famous play Swapna-vasavadatta (Swapnav_savadatta)(Vasavadatta in 				
the dream) and Pratijna-Yaugandharayana (the vow of Yaugandharayana) are based on the 				
legends that had grown around the King Udayana, a contemporary of the Buddha. The Duta- 				
Vakya and Bala-charitra are perhaps the only Sanskrit by a famous playwright with Krishna as 				
the central character.Pratima-nataka: Kaikeyi;Uru bhanga: The broken thigh. The unfinished 				
Daridra-Charudatta (Charudatta in poverty) tells the story the courtesan Vasantasena and is 				
interesting for the same story was developed by Shudraka into the more famous Mricha- kataika. 				
429. Dolmens (megalithic tombs known locally as muniyaras) in Kerala's Marayoor region, 				
erected by Neolithic tribesmen. 				
430. Kolachal (Colachal) is a city and a municipality in Kanniyakumari district in the Indian 				
state of Tamil Nadu. 				
431. The Battle of Colachel (or Battle of Kulachal) was a battle that took place on 10 August 				
1741 (31 July OS) during the Travancore-Dutch War, when forces of Marthanda Varma, the 				
king or Raja of the Indian state of Travancore (also known as Tiruvitamkur) defeated forces of 				
the Dutch East India Company (also known as the VOC), and the allied Rani of Eleyadathu 				
Swarupam at Kulachal. The Dutch commander Captain Eustachius De Lannoy was captured, 				
and Marthanda Varma agreed to spare the Dutch captain's life on condition that he joined 				
his army and trained his soldiers on modern lines. He appointed his former prisoner, Admiral 				
D'lennoy, as his commander-in-chief and gave him the status of a local noble. D'lennoy 				
modernised the Travancore army and equipped the army with firearms and artillery. 				
432. Kathakali: is a form of Indian dance-drama. It originated in the Indian state of Kerala 				
during the 17th century. The Raja of Kottarakara was the earliest proponent of this art. 				
433.  Kathakali is featured in the award-winning Indo-French-German produced film Vaanaprastham. 				
434. Bhasmasura was an Asura or demon who, after praying to Lord Siva received a boon. 				
Bhasmasura asked that he be granted the power that anyone whose head he touched with his 				
hand should immediately fall dead. Siva granted this request, but Bhasmasura thereupon 				
attempted to touch the head of Siva with his hand. Siva fled, and was chased by 				
Bhasmasura. Eventually, Lord Vishnu in the form of Mohini tricked Bhasmasura into 				
touching his own head, and Bhasmasura immediate fell dead. 				
435.Mohiniattam: The lyrics are in Manipravala, a mixture of Sanskrit and Malayalam. 				
436.Mohiniattam: The dance which has influences and elements from two South Indian 				
dance forms, the Bharatanatyam and Kathakali, was formulated in the court of king Swati 				
Tirunal by Vadivelu, one of the Thanjavur Quartet. 				
437. Vallathol Narayana Menon popularly known as Vallathol, was one of the famous 				
triumvirate poets of Kerala. others are Kumaran Asan and Ulloor S. Parameswara Iyer. He 				
is the author of the famous ' Sahithya Manjari '.He got the title,'Mahakavi' for his 				
MahaKaavyam 'Chitrayogam'. He played a primary role in setting up the Kerala 				
Kalamandalam at Cheruthuruthy, near the banks of Bharathapuzha River. Later this place 				
was renamed Vallathol Nagar. He raised Kathakali as a great art form to the level today. 				
438. Vadodara also known as Baroda, is the third most-populated town in the Indian state of 				
Gujarat after Ahmedabad and Surat. It is one of four towns in the state with a population of over 				
1 million, the other being Rajkot and the two cities listed above. It is located on the Vishwamitri 				
river, southeast of Ahmedabad and is known as the Cultural Capital of Gujarat. The city was 				
once called Chandravati, after its ruler Raja Chandan, then Viravati, the abode of the brave, 				
and then Vadpatra because of the abundance of banyan trees on the banks of the Vishwamitri. 				
From Vadpatra it derived its present name "Vadodara",Sanskari Nagari'. 				
439. . Where on Earth are you most likely to get hit by lightning? 				
Answer:  Central Africa. Central Africa gets thunderstorms all year round and is the part of the 				
Earth most frequently struck by lightning. Lightning also frequently strikes the Himalayas, but 				
rarely strikes the open ocean and almost never happens at the poles. 				
440. When are severe storms most likely? In the afternoon. Severe thunderstorms usually peak in the afternoon when the Earth's surface is at its hottest after baking all day in the Sun. 				
441. world's tallest free standing structure? 				
The CN tower, Toronto, Canada is the tallest freestanding structure in the world 				
(554m to the top of antenna) - although newer and taller ones are under construction. The highest 				
building debate continues to rage with most of the world's tallest structures radio or tv 				
broadcasting towers. The highest supported structure is the KVLY-TV mast in Dakota, US 				
(629m). The Taipei 101 is the tallest habitable building (509m to top of spire). The Sears 				
Tower is 527m to the top of its antenna. The highest structure built at sea is the Petronius 				
Platform, an oil rig in the Gulf of Mexico that is 610m high but only 75m above sea level. 				
442. the largest hole ever dug in the Earth? 				
Kennecott's Bingham Copper Mine in Utah is the largest open pit mine in the world 				
and the largest human made excavation. Over 4 km in diameter, it represents the removal of 				
more than 15.3 cubic km of Earth. At 1000m depth the Big Hole diamond mine in Africa is the 				
deepest hole dug in the Earth. The West Edmonton Shopping Mall is one of the world's largest 				
shopping malls and covers 0.5km sq. 				
443. In 2003 physicists at Cornell University in New York manufactured a playable device 				
about the width of a five human blood cells. What was it?The world's second smallest 				
guitar. The world's smallest guitar is 10 micrometers long and has six strings each just 100 				
atoms wide. The world's second smallest guitar, modelled on a Gibson Flying V and built by the 				
same team, is five times larger and can be 'played' using a laser that oscillates the strings at a 				
frequency 17 times higher than an ordinary guitar. 				
444. Internet terms: A cookie is a parcel of information that is downloaded and stored on an 				
individual's computer once they have visited a particular web page, which can uniquely identify 				
that user. Spam is unsolicited email. Netnannies are software blocking programs that prevent 				
porn and unwanted chat and personal file sharing and can limit the time spent online. 				
445. Files on the Internet live on individual computers, often known as servers. A server can 				
be a computer or software running on a computer that provides services to other computers, such 				
as hosting. 				
446. Which Internet Protocol (IP) number is used by a computer to send a message back to itself? 				
127.0.0.1 is the address used by computers to send messages to themselves, to troubleshoot or test the 				
network. 0.0.0.0 is the default network address and 255.255.255.255 is the dedicated broadcast IP for 				
messages sent to an entire network. 				
447. Zardozi work is a type of embroidery in India. It prospered during the Mugal Emperor, Akbar 				
but later due to loss of royal patronage and industrialization, led to its decline. Zardozi is an ancient 				
Persian embroidery form (Zar in Persian means gold and Dozi is embroidery) that has been passed down 				
for generations. 				
448.Embroidery Works: Aabla Mirror work: which has its roots in Rajasthan and Kutch. 				
Aari Embroidery done on a cot. Also known as khatla work aari originated in Barabanki. 				
Butas and Butis Motifs: composed of floral forms fitted into paisley shapes derived from the Mughal 				
era. Lari Fine quality gold thread :embroidery found in Bareilly , Benaras ( Varanasi ), Lucknow and 				
Agra. These days silver zari is equally popular.Phool Patti Work Applique work from Aligarh where 				
usually organdi or other fabric cutouts in floral and leaf motifs are affixed on to a plain fabric sometimes 				
in tandem with silver tilla embroidery. Taipchi Darn stitch on muslin. Khatwa Inverted satin stitch on 				
muslin. Murri or Phanda Satin stitch knots.Zardosi Leaf-scroll worked in gold and silver thread on 				
silk, satin, velvet and other rich fabrics. Zardosi is also combined with Dabka work and is originally 				
from Lucknow. Mokaish Silver dots strewn all over is Mokaish work. 				
Kashida Mix of textile embroidery and printing. 				
449. Phir Hera Pheri:The storyline of this movie bears a strong resemblance to the English movie 				
Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels. 				
450.Salam Nameste: The major plot is closely based upon Neuf mois and its US remake, Nine Months. 				
451.Tendulkar:brought up his 60th first class hundred by scoring a single off Sourav Ganguly. Of the 				
105 runs he scored in 129 balls, 76 came in boundaries. 				
452. The most recent World Cup Finals were held between June 9 and July 9, 2006 in Germany, 				
where Italy was crowned champions after beating France in the final, winning the penalty shootout 5-3 				
after the match finished 1-1 after extra time. The next World Cup Finals will be held in 2010 in South 				
Africa. 				
453. The Estadio Centenario, the location of World Cup final in 1930 in Montevideo, Uruguay. 				
454.FIFA TROPHY: designer Silvio Gazzaniga. The new trophy is 36 cm high, made of solid 18- 				
carat gold and weighs 6175 grammes. The base contains two layers of semi-precious malachite while the 				
bottom side of the trophy bears the engraved year and name of each FIFA World Cup winner since 1974 				
455. Maracanaz: Uruguay beat, against all odds, their Brazilian counterpart at the Maracanã stadium, 				
and as a result, the term Maracanazo (Portuguese: 'Maracanaço', roughly translates to "The Maracana 				
Blow") is used in reference to this game. It is considered to be one of the biggest upsets in football history. 				
456. Ronaldo(nickname- The Phenomenon): has enjoyed success at the international level, winning 				
the 1994 and 2002 FIFA World Cups with Brazil. Ronaldo has won three FIFA World Player of the 				
Year awards (1996, 1997, 2002). Ronaldo and former Real Madrid teammate Zinedine Zidane are the 				
only two men to have won the award three times. 				
457.Fasest Goal in the World cup football: 11seconds; Hakan fiükür of Turkey against  Korea 				
Republic in 2002,at Korea/Japan. 				
458. The Best Young Player ("Gillette Best Young Player") award was awarded for the first time at the 				
2006 FIFA World Cup in Germany and given to Germany's Lukas Podolski. 				
459.Yasin award: 2006 Germany  Gianluigi Buffon.Golden Ball: 2006 Germany  Zinedine 				
Zidane.Golden shoe: 2006 Germany  Miroslav Klose. 				
460.Both Golden shoe & Yasin award: Oliver Kahn was awarded both in 2002. 				
460. The John Bull is an English-built railroad steam locomotive, operated for the first time 				
on September 15, 1831; it became the oldest operable steam locomotive in the world (150 				
years) when the Smithsonian Institution operated it in 1981. Built by Robert Stephenson 				
and Company, the John Bull was initially purchased by and operated for the Camden and Amboy 				
Railroad, the first railroad built in New Jersey. Today, the original John Bull is on static 				
display in the Smithsonian's National Museum of American History in Washington, DC. 				
461. The Fairy Queen was constructed in Leeds, England in 1855, and reached Calcutta in 				
1895 where it was christened as the Fairy Queen. The locomotive was given its serial 				
number 22, by its then owner, The East Indian Railway. It began to haul light mail trains 				
between Howrah and Ranigunj, but was soon consigned to line construction duty in the state 				
of Bihar, where it served until 1909. In 1997, after the runaway success of the Palace on 				
Wheels, the locomotive was restored to full working order in preparation for its first 				
mainline journey in 88 years and its return to commercial service on July 18 that year. The 				
two-day excursion sees the train plying from New Delhi to Alwar to the Sariska Tiger 				
Reserve. The train pulled by this locomotive can accommodate thirty-eight passengers and 				
the ticket is priced at Rs. 7,500 for adults and Rs. 3,750 for children. 				
462. Matheran Railway has an interesting story behind it. Abdul Hussein, son of the business 				
tycoon, Sir Adamjee Peerbhoy of Mumbai, was a regular visitor to Matheran and he 				
developed a fascination for the area.. The construction started in 1904 and the two feet gauge line 				
finally opened to traffic in 1907.Neral, the starting station of this line, falls nearly midway on 				
the Mumbai-Pune route of the central railway. Starting from Neral, the narrow gauge two 				
feet line runs parallel to the main broad gauge line leaving the road to the west of Hardal hill, 				
then turning sharply east. 				
463. Today, there are only two cities in the world where tramcars still exist. One is Kolkata 				
and the other is Melbourne in Australia and both cities happily share a common pedigree in 				
that both fall in the jurisdiction of British Commonwealth League of Nations. 				
464.Tramjatra: In an effort to preserve the tramcars as a mode of transport, a cross-cultural 				
arts project - "Tramjatra" has taken shape, which has linked both Kolkata and 				
Melbourne, tram enthusiasts together.It all began almost a decade back when an Australian 				
Tram conductor - Robert D'Andrea artist Michael Douglas visited Kolkata in an effort to 				
garner support for the preservation of the tram heritage. As a result of their pioneering zeal 				
and a spirit of optimism, Tramjatra was born which has today become a symbol of friendship 				
between Kolkata and Melbourne tram aficionados. 				
465.Trams In India, the cities of Calcutta, Bombay, Madras, and Delhi had trams in the past 				
(until the 1940s). Calcutta is the only one that still has them. In present-day Pakistan, Karachi 				
was the only city to have trams in the past. 				
466. The Calcutta Tramway Co. (CTC), originally incorporated in England in 1880, is now 				
owned by the West Bengal government. In its heyday the system carried 0.75 million 				
passengers a day with about 275 trams on average on the road at any time. 				
467.Tram Traction supply is at 550V DC, supplied by an overhead catenary system. The 				
catenary is at a negative potential. The return current is carried by underground return 				
conductors at a positive potential. 				
468.Kabbadi: It is popular throughout South Asia and Southeast Asia, is the national game of 				
Bangladesh and state game of Punjab, India. The name — often chanted during a game — 				
derives from a Hindi word meaning "holding of breath", which is indeed the crucial aspect of 				
play. The chant-word is kabaddi in India and Pakistan, ha_u_u in Bangladesh, do-do in 				
Nepal, guddu in Sri Lanka, chado-guddo in Malaysia, Zoo in Iran, and techib in Indonesia. 				
A team scores a bonus of two points, called a lona, if the entire opposing team is declared out. 				
469.Padmavati: After the Mahabharata war, the land of Thondai Mandalam was ruled by 				
Akasha Raja, whose capital was situated at Narayanapuram, near the Venkatachala hill range. 				
Being childless, a great sacrifice decided to be performed.The land was ploughed for the 				
sacrifice. At that time a thousand petalled lotus containing a baby was discovered. It was a 				
beautiful girl child. An incarnation of Goddess Lakshmi. . 				
470. The Tirumala hill is believed to be Kridadri having once been situated in heaven, as sacred 				
as Vaikuntha, Vishnu's heaven,. Known by different names in the different yugas, it was called 				
Vrishabhadri in Krita yuga, Anjanadri in Treta yuga, Seshadri in Dvapara yuga .Venkatadri in 				
Kali yuga. The stories of the hill establish its sanctity in every age. The word Tirumala itself 				
means sacred hill. 				
471. Seshadri : Once Vayu, the God of the Wind, went to Vishnu's heaven Vaikuntha. As 				
Vishnu was resting with his consort Lakshmi, Adishesha, the divine serpent, was guarding the 				
doorway and refused him entry. The two began to quarrel, till Narayana came out and heard each 				
boasting of his strength and prowess. The Lord suggested a way for them to determine who was 				
more powerful Adishesha should circle the Ananda mountain and Vayu should try to blow and 				
dislodge him. Several days and nights of furious combat passed by, with neither winning nor 				
yielding, while all the worlds trembled. Finally Brahma and the other Gods told Adishesha that 				
Vishnu and Shiva knew of his strength, so he could loosen his hold and allow Vayu to win. So 				
the serpent loosened his hold and was immediately blown away, with the hill, to the region north 				
of the Swarnamukhi river. As he was very dejected, Brahma assured him that he would be 				
merged with the Venkata hill and Vishnu would reside on him. Then Adishesha fell at Lord 				
Vishnu's feet and was blessed to become the Seshadri range, by which name it was known in the 				
Dvapara yuga. His hood is located at Venkatadri, his body at Ahobalam where Vishnu lived as 				
Narasimha, and his tail at Srisailam where Vishnu was manifested as Mallikarjuna. 				
472.Balaji: As Balaji because when the world was immersed under the waters, Vishnu, as a 				
newborn child, floated on a leaf on the waters. 				
473.Varaha Bahan:When the world was flooded(and remain submerged) on that huge sheet of 				
water, Vishnu lay on a ficus leaf as the eternal child, Vatapatrashayi. Seeing the plight of 				
Mother Earth at the bottom of the waters, he assumed the frightening form of Shweta Varaha, the 				
White Boar, and descended into the nether world to search for her. The evil demon Hiranyaksha 				
attacked him, and they fought a long and violent battle, at the end of which Varaha destroyed the 				
demon with his mighty tusks. He then lifted up Mother Earth on his tusks and emerged from the waters. 				
474. Venkateshwara was chasing a wild elephant. Whilst following the elephant, he walked into 				
the royal gardenwhere and met Padmavati who fell in love with him. He returned home and 				
enlightened Vakulamalika about his past birth as Rama and Lakshmi's as Sita, and how they 				
would both be united in Kali yuga as Srinivasa and Padmavati. 				
475. Padmavati's mother, Dharunidevi. 				
476.Tux the penguin, based on an image created by Larry Ewing in 1996, is the logo and 				
mascot of Linux. 				
477.What, during the French Revolution, were called Liberty, Equality and Fraternity? The 				
King, Queen and Jack on a pack of cards. 				
478.Sachin: was the first batsman to given out by a third umpire when he was run out . 				
Who was the non-striker? A: Ravi Shastri . 				
479.Soap 501: All the soaps at that time were imported from England and came in batches of 				
500. Homi Sethna was instrumental in launching India's first ever detergent bar and in 				
order to drive the point home to the British he named it 501 				
480. Microsoft's delay in launching Windows 95 (Windows 4.0 officially) which was 				
codenamed 'Chicago'.				
481. Sam Wilson - Uncle Sam.:In the year 1775, Paul Revere made his historic ride to 				
Lexington. With him was a drummer boy who assisted him at the age of 10. The boy later 				
attained international fame and was immortalised by the artist James Montgomery . 				
482.IAS-Language paper:This paper is of a qualifying nature and the marks obtained are not 				
counted for ranking. This paper is not compulsory for candidates from the states of Arunachal 				
Pradesh, Manipur, Meghalaya, Mizoram, Nagaland and Sikkim. 				
483. The inventor of the first Alarm Clock. Jean Eugene Houdin 				
484.The first synthetic plastic:Celluloid(billiard ball). 				
485.The Googly in cricket :by Bosanquet . 				
486. Windows XP. The letters "XP" stand for experience.Codenamed "Whistler" after 				
Whistler, British Columbia, as many Microsoft employees skied at the Whistler-Blackcomb ski 				
resort during its development . 				
487.Father's day: Sonora's father was born in June, so she chose to hold the first Father's 				
Day celebration in Spokane, Washington on the 19th of June, 1910. 				
President Calvin Coolidge, in 1924, supported the idea of a national Father's Day. Then in 1966 				
President Lyndon Johnson signed a presidential proclamation declaring the 3rd Sunday of 				
June as Father's Day. President Richard Nixon signed the law which finally made it 				
permanent in 1972. 				
488. President, Woodrow Wilson, declared the first national Mother's Day.in 1914. Julia 				
Ward Howe wrote the original Mother's Day Proclamation in 1870, as a call for peace and disarmament. 				
489. The Mekong is one of the world's major rivers. It is the 13th-longest in the world. Its 				
estimated length is 4,023 km. From Tibet it runs through China's Yunnan province, Myanmar, 				
Thailand, Laos, Cambodia and Vietnam. All except China and Myanmar belong to the 				
Mekong River Commission. Balls of light are observable from time to time rising from the 				
water's surface in the stretch of the river near Vientiane or Nong Khai. These are sometimes 				
referred to as Naga fireballs. The locals attribute the phenomenon to Phaya Naga, Mekong Dragons. 				
490. R.D. Burman's One song, Chura liya hai, as sung by Asha Bhosle and Mohd. Rafi 				
(inspired by Donovan's title song from If It's Tuesday, This Must Be Belgium (1969)).Amir 				
khan,as young Ratan(Tariq) in Yaddon Ki Barrat film. 				
491.New Magnetic molecules: The organic nickel compounds created by Rajsapan Jain and 				
his colleagues at the University of Victoria, Canada, display magnetic properties spontaneously 				
at room temperature. 				
492. The Baily Bridge is the highest bridge in the world. It is located in the Ladakh valley 				
between the Dras and Suru rivers in the Himalayan mountains. It was built by the Indian 				
Army in August 1982. 				
493. The national awards for bravery was started in 1957 by the Indian Council for Child 				
Welfare. The awards are announced on November 14, Children's Day. 				
494Eden Gardens: The park was built in 1877 by Sir Asley Eden, Lieutenant Governor of 				
Bengal who named it after his two twin daughters. 				
495. The national emblem of Pakistan was approved by the Central Government in 				
1954..There is a crescent and star crest at the top of the emblem, this is the traditional symbol if 				
Islam. In the centre is a shield divided into four parts showing cotton, wheat, tea and jute 				
which are the main crops of Pakistan. It signifies the strong agriculture based economy of the 				
country. This shield is encircled by a wreath. The scroll supporting the shield carries the Urdu 				
words 'Faith', 'Unity' and 'Discipline.. 				
496. 'Panchphoran'(Bengali) which includes five spices - mustard, aniseed, fenugreek seed, 				
cumin seed and black cumin seed.. 				
497.A H Wheeler & Co is a bookstore chain. In 1886, Emile Moreau, a French author, and T K 				
Bannerjee, an Indian businessman, started the bookstore chain 'A H Wheeler & Co.',. The company 				
was also the one that published Rudyard Kipling in 1888 when he was all but unknown. The 				
company's name was borrowed from a then-successful London bookstore, Arthur Henry Wheeler's. 				
498. Royal Toothbrush: French Kiss, British Stiff Upper Lip and Italian Romance. 				
499. Register The Cash:This machine was invented in 1879 by an American Café owner who was 				
inspired by a ship's revolution counter to make it. Invented by James Ritty he called it the 'Thief catcher'. 				
500. Isaac Newton : the warden of the British Mint in the late 17th century and was responsible 				
for the revolutionary recoinage which put an end to counterfeiting in England. 				
501. The Empire State Building: owned by Prudential Assurance Company was put up for sale in 1991. 				
502. Bajaj : was once known as the Bachraj trading Company. 				
503 Premier Padmini : car in its country of origin, Italy, was known as Millicento. 				
504. Sunil Gavaskar :began his modelling career with an ad for Century soap. 				
505. Brand names that have become words in English language: Aspirin, Cellophane, Corn 				
flakes, Escalator, Kerosene, Nylon, thermos and Zipper. 				
506. Band -Aid : newly wed Johnson and Johnson employee named Earl G Dickson come up with 				
in 1920 because his wife, who was inexperienced in the kitchen kept burning and cutting herself. 				
507. The Singer Sewing Machine :Mahatma Gandhi described it as 'One of the few useful things ever invented'. 				
508. Littlewoods: European supermarket chain opened their first Indian outlet in Bangalore and 				
later sold out to the Tatas who renamed it 'Westside'. 				
509. Times Indiglo watch: According to Business Week, when the New York trade center was 				
bombed in 1993, a man by name Jim McIntyre led a group of people across 34 floors in total 				
darkness to safety by using above watch. 				
510. Miral Durlabhji : played the Junior Onida Devil. 				
511. Reebok: is better known as the company J.W.Foster and Co. 				
512. Buying goods through installment schemes: Singer Sewing Machines was the first company 				
to introduce this highly innovative marketing tool. 				
513. Bangalore-based Aditi Technologies' Talisma: first Indian product to be put up on 				
Microsoft's Site Builder Network site. It is a customised customer  e-mail manager. 				
514. Gopher : Before the World Wide Web, this was the system for finding and displaying 				
document files stored on the Internet. It was named for the mascot of the college where it was 				
developed, the University of Minnesota. 				
515. Lotus:founder Mitchell Kapor, a Bostonian, teacher of Transcendental Meditation and a 				
Buddhist in 1988,  started a foundation for electronic free speech. 				
516. Scottish civil servant Charles Pratt Kennedy built Simla's first British summer home in 				
1822, and by the latter half of the 19th century the town had become the summer capital of the 				
British Raj. 				
517.Shimla: Jubbarhatti the nearest airport is 25 Km from here. The airport is one of its kind and 				
has been built by slicing away the top of a long hill. Regular flights run between New Delhi and 				
Shimla from here. 				
518.Rashtrapati Niwas: On the Observatory Hills of Shimla, is located the Viceregal Lodge. Also 				
known as Rashtrapati Niwas, it was formerly the residence of the British Viceroy Lord 				
Dufferin.This is the most beautiful building in Shimla. 				
519. 'Kohima village' called 'Bara Basti' or 'large village',which is the largest village in Asia. 				
520.Marie Tussaud (1761-1850), born Marie Grosholtz in Strasbourg, France, worked as a 				
housekeeper for Dr. Philippe Curtius, a physician skilled in wax modelling. Curtius taught Tussaud 				
the art of wax modelling. Created her first wax figure, of Francois Marie Arouet de Voltaire, in 				
1777.. She established her first permanent exhibition on Baker Street in London in 1835 (on 				
the "Baker Street Bazaar"). With branches in Amsterdam, Hong Kong, Las Vegas and New 				
York City, scheduled to open in Hollywood. 				
521. The police chief Scott beat Lala Lajpat Rai severely and he succumbed to his injuries later. 				
Bhagat Singh, who was an eyewitness to this event, vowed to take revenge. However, in a case 				
of mistaken identity, Gopal signalled Singh on the appearance of J.P. Saunders, a Deputy 				
Superitendent of Police.Thus, Saunders, instead of Scott, was shot. Singh was cremated at 				
Hussainiwala on banks of Sutlej river. Today, the Bhagat Singh Memorial commemorates 				
freedom fighters of India. On September 28, 1907, Bhagat Singh was born into a Sikh (Sandhu) 				
family to Sardar Kishan Singh Sandhu and Vidyavati in the Khatkar Kalan village near Banga in 				
the Lyallpur district. 				
522. Sarfaroshi ki Tamanna: is a poem in Hindi/Urdu written by the popular Indian 				
revolutionary Ram Prasad Bismil ,who was involved  in the Indian Independence Movement 				
against the British Empire in India. Bismil was a member of the revolutionary Hindustan 				
Republican Association and is known for his involvement in the famous train robbery that took 				
place at Kakori (now in Uttar Pradesh, India). The poem is written as an ode to the young 				
freedom fighters of the Indian Independence Movement, such as Bhagat Singh and 				
Chandrashekhar Azad. 				
523. HMIL presently markets over 30 variants of passenger cars across six models, the Santro 				
and Getz in the B segment, the Accent in the C segment, the Elantra in the D segment, the 				
Sonata in the E segment and the Tucson in the SUV segment,Verna,Embera.    524. The 				
Republican Party. It is often referred to as the GOP, or Grand Old Party, although it is the 				
younger of the two major parties.Symbol:red and blue colored elephant and 3 stars in upper 				
blue portion. 				
525.Democratic party(USA): The most common symbol for the party is the donkey, although 				
the party itself never officially adopted it. The origins of this symbol are unknown, but several 				
theories have been proposed. According to one theory, in its original form, the jackass was born in 				
the intense mudslinging that occurred during the presidential race of 1828 as a play on the name of 				
Andrew Jackson, the Democratic candidate. Jackson had been called "Andrew Jackass," and the 				
defiant Jackson adopted the nickname. 				
526.Indian Navy:It was also instrumental in overthrowing the coup attempt by PLOTE 				
mercenaries in Maldives by pouring troops there in 1988. The campaign led by the Indian Navy 				
was known as Operation Cactus. In October 1999 the coordinated effort by the Indian Navy and 				
the Indian Coast Guard helped in the seizure of the Japanese ship MV Alondra Rainbow, that 				
was taken by pirates and led to the arrest of the pirates. The Indian Navy participated in the 				
U.N peacekeeping operation Operation Restore Hope, off the coast of Somalia from December 				
1992 to October 2003. The Indian Navy also participated in Operation Parakram. Later in 2001, 				
during Operation Enduring Freedom, Indian Navy provided vital support by relieving American 				
ships securing the Strait of Malacca.During the 2004 Indian Ocean earthquake crisis, the Indian 				
Navy deployed 27 ships, 19 helicopters, 6 naval aircraft and over 5000 Indian Navy personnel in 				
disaster relief operations. This was the part of various operations like 'Operation Madath' in the 				
Indian states of Andhra Pradesh and Tamil Nadu, 'Operation Sea Waves' in the Indian 				
territory of Andaman and Nicobar Islands, 'Operation Castor' in Maldives, 'Operation 				
Rainbow' in Sri Lanka and 'Operation Gambhir' in Indonesia. 				
528.Australia's The first 10 wicket ODI defeat:Newzealand defeated Australia by 10 wickets. 				
529. Prince Ali Gauhar, afterwards Emperor Shah Alam II, had been the heir apparent of his 				
father, Emperor Azizuddin Alamgir II. 				
530. Emperor Akbar Shah II had four sons, one of which Bahadur Shah Zafar eventually 				
succeeded him at age 60. Before Bahadur Shah, one of his other sons, Mirza Nali was given the 				
title of Crown Prince of the Mughal, but the title went on to his brother.After the mutiny, he fled 				
Delhi and took refuge in other parts of India. In the mid 1800s he came to Bengal. His sons 				
and two daughters lived the same life he did, in constant fear of the British.His eldest son, Mirza 				
Jalaluddin became an official to a Bengal King's court. He was succeeded by his eldest son, 				
Mirza Zafar.He was an official to the King too. His son Mirza Jamsher renounced his titles in 				
1895. Their children settled down permanently in North Bengal and to this day they still remain 				
in the capital city of Dhaka and Rajshahi. 				
531. The mutiny was, literally, triggered by a gun. Sepoys throughout India were issued with 				
a new rifle, the Pattern of 1853 Enfield Percussion cap rifled musket - a more powerful and 				
accurate weapon than the old smoothbore Brown Bess in use for the last several decades. 				
532.Sepoy Mutiny: The Commander in Chief in India, General George Anson reacted to this 				
crisis by saying, "I'll never give in to their beastly prejudices", and despite the pleas of his junior 				
officers he did not compromise.(with changing the greased catridges). 				
533.Sepoy mutiny messages: Chapaties and Lotus Flowers began to circulate around large 				
parts of India, quoting the famous line "Sub lal hogea hai." (Everything will become Red.), 				
passed around by people from town to town and village to village, as a symbol of the prophecy 				
and a sign of the coming revolt. 				
534. On March 29, 1857 at the Barrackpore (now Barrackpur) parade ground, near Calcutta, 				
Mangal Pandey of the 34th BNI attacked and injured the adjutant Lt. Baugh with a sword 				
after shooting at him, but instead hitting his horse. 				
535. General John Hearsey came out to see him on the parade ground, and claimed later that 				
Mangal Pandey was in some kind of "religious frenzy". He ordered a Jemadar Ishwari Prasad 				
to arrest Mangal Pandey, but the Jemadar refused. The whole regiment with the single 				
exception of a soldier called Shaikh Paltu drew back from restraining or arresting Mangal 				
Pandey.Mangal Pandey, after failing to incite his comrades into an open and active rebellion, 				
tried to take his own life by placing his musket to his chest. He only managed to wound himself, 				
and was court-martialled on April 6. He was hanged on April 8. 				
536. Legend holds that Babur swam across every major river he encountered, including 				
twice across the Ganges River in North India. 				
537.Kohinoor:Babur had said:" its value would provide two and a half days' food for the whole world". 				
538. Paul Julius Baron von Reuter( Israel Beer Josaphat.) was a Jewish German-born British 				
journalist and media owner, the founder of Reuters news agency.Reuter moved to London on 				
October 29, 1845, calling himself Joseph Josephat. On November 16 he converted to 				
christianity and changed his name to Paul Julius Reuter. One week later on November 23, he 				
married Ida Maria Elizabeth Clementine Magnus in Berlin. 				
While telegraphy evolved, Reuter first founded the Reuters News Agency in Aachen which 				
transferred messages between Brussels and Aachen using carrier pigeons. 				
539. There is a crater named after Shah Jahan on the minor planet 433 Eros. Craters on 				
Eros are named after famous fictional and real-life lovers. 				
is considered to be the most detailed account of the Mughal court. It is an important account of 				
the time of the later reign of Shah Jahan and of the reign of Aurangzeb. 				
1945:API registered as a private limited Indian company wholly owned by Reuters 				
1947, August 27:Press Trust of India incorporated in Madras. 				
1949, February 1 :PTI begins news services, taking over operations from API but still 				
maintains links with Reuters. 				
1953 :PTI becomes a free agent, independent of Reuters. 				
542.Akbar: He also married a Christian woman from Goa, Maryam. 				
543. Amber is a ruined city of Rajasthan state, India. It was the former capital of Jaipur state. 				
544.South Africa, who beat Pakistan 3-1 in a recent home series, have become the first 				
team to replace Australia at the top of the rankings since they were introduced in October 				
2002 as Australia was defeated by newzealand. 				
545. Chand Bardai (circa 1200) was the court poet of the Indian king Prithviraj III Chauhan, 				
who ruled Ajmer and Delhi from 1165 to 1192. A native of Lahore, Chand Bardai composed 				
the Prithviraj Raso, an epic poem in Hindi about the life of Prithviraj. 				
546. Cast of Omkar: 				
Ajay Devgan Omkara 'Omi' Shukla Othello 				
Saif Ali Khan Ishwar 'Langda' Tyagi Iago 				
Vivek Oberoi Keshav 'Kesu' Firangi Cassio 				
Kareena Kapoor Dolly Mishra Desdemona 				
Konkona Sen Sharma Indu Emilia 				
Bipasha Basu Billo Chamanbahar Bianca 				
Naseeruddin Shah Bhaisaab Duke of Venice 				
547.Omkar: This is Vishal Bharadwaj's third interpretation of a literary classic after Maqbool 				
which was based on William Shakespeare's Macbeth and Chatri Chor which was based on 				
Ruskin Bond's The Blue Umbrella. 				
548.Nelson Mandela:His 27 years in prison, much of it spent in a cell on Robben Island. In 				
South Africa he is often known as Madiba, an honorary title adopted by elders of Mandela's 				
clan.Also Mukhulu(grand father). 				
549. On February 2, 1990, State President F.W. de Klerk unbanned the ANC and other anti- 				
apartheid organisations, and announced that Mandela would shortly be released from prison. 				
Mandela was released from Victor Verster Prison in Paarl on February 11, 1990. 				
550. Madiba shirt is a batik silk shirt, usually adorned in a bright and colourful print. It has 				
become a well-known nickname for batik shirts in South Africa, being popularised by former 				
South African president Nelson Mandela. 				
551. With Gujral(Dev Gowd,PM) at the helm of Ministry of External Affairs, India resolved 				
long standing dispute over Ganga water sharing with Bangladesh. 				
556. An ATM is also known, in English, as Automated Banking Machine, Money machine, 				
Bank Machine (Canada), Cash Machine (New Zealand, UK, Minnesota), Hole-In-The-Wall 				
(New Zealand, Australia, UK) or Cashpoint (New Zealand, UK). Despite the wide usage of the 				
term "ATM Machine", the word "machine" is redundant. 				
557. ATM, developed and built by Luther George Simjian and installed 1939 in New York by 				
the City Bank of New York.  De La Rue developed the first electronic ATM, which was installed 				
first in Enfield Town in North London on June 27, 1967 by Barclays Bank. The first person to 				
use the machine was Reg Varney of "On the Buses" fame.The invention is credited to John 				
Shepherd-Barron, although Luther George Simjian registered patents in New York, USA in the 				
1930s and Donald Wetzel. 				
558.Indusland Bank was the first private bank to be set up in India. 				
559. Chartered Bank opened its first overseas branch in India, at Kolkata, on 12 April 1858. 				
560. Nadar is nicknamed 'Magus' meaning 'wizard' in Persian is the CEO of Hindustan 				
Computers Ltd. His wizadry was evident when he transformed HCL corporation into one of the 				
top most firms making computers and office equiment. 				
561. The world's first airport was built in 1928 at Croydon near London (England). It was the 				
main airport for London till it was closed down in 1959, after the World War II. 				
562 PR Dasmunshi:. "Anek Rakta Anek Nam" (Political Novel); "Take Over" (Novel); 				
"Maner Manush" (Novel); "Bhorer Sanai" (Poetry Collection); "Ekhan Madhyanha" (Poetry 				
Collection); "Ayodhya Sayahna" (Poetry Collection) 				
Editor, "Dakhinee Barta"—A Bengali Magazine . 				
563. Panchmai Pir is a Dargah of pir (Muslim Sufi) in the Rann of Kutch area of Gujrat, India. 				
It is famous as everybody who wants to start a journey to cross the great desert, first stops here 				
and feeds the jackals. The legend says, if the jackals do not eat the food offered, something bad 				
may happen if the journey is continued. Normally, under such circumstances, the devotee 				
considers the ill effects of continuation of journey bad enough so as to abandon it.This legend is 				
quite famous in the popular Indian culture. KN Daruwala's Love Across the Salt Desert is 				
based on it. This story was later filmed into Abhishek Bachchan's film Refugee. 				
564. Kalinjar means The destroyer of time in Sanskrit. 'Kal' is time and jar destruction. It is 				
therefore a common belief associated with the Kalinjar hill that Lord Shiva had slain the god of 				
time on it. The scriptures state that the holy place had four different names in the four yugas. In 				
Satyuga it was known as Kirtinagar, in Treta it was Madhyagarh, in Dwapar it was 				
Singhalgarh and now in Kalyuga, it has come to be known as Kalinjar. 				
565. Allahabad Fort(by Akbar) is the location of the much revered Akshaya Vat, which is 				
Hindi for 'immortal tree'. Legends say that if anyone jumped from this centuries old banyan 				
tree he would attain immortality. 				
566. The ancient Egyptians developed the art of counting to a high degree, but their system of 				
numeration was very crude. For example, the number 1,000 was symbolized by a picture of a 				
lotus flower, and the number 2,000 was symbolized by a picture of two lotus flowers 				
growing out of a bush. 				
567. The name "Rourkela" means "Our Village" derived from "Rour" which means "our" and 				
"Kela" means "village" in the local language "Sadri" spoken by the "Raulia" tribe living there. 				
568.Rourkela: Oscar nominated film director Mira Nair was born here. 				
569. The Central Bureau of Investigation is India's premier investigating agency, responsible 				
for a wide variety of criminal and national security matters. It was established on 01 April 1963 				
and evolved from the Special Police Establishment founded in 1941. 				
Motto: Industry,Impartiality,Integrity. The founder director of the CBI was D.P. Kohli who 				
held office from 1st April, 1963 to 31st May, 1968. 				
570. Farkhor Air Base, the only Indian military base situated in a foreign country, at 				
Farkhor/Ayni in Tajikistan, is also another base station of ARC(aviation research centre). 				
571.   Gurupreet Singh(Bhilai) - The property owner on Moon. 				
572. Ludhiana: gets its name from the Lodhi Dynasty, which is believed to have founded the 				
city in the year 1480. The legend goes that two Lodhi Chief Yusaf Khan and Nihand Khan were 				
deputed by Sikandar Lodhi (1489-1517 A.D.) to restore order in this region. They camped at the 				
site of present city of Ludhiana which was then a village called Mir Hota. Yusaf Khan went 				
across the river Sutlej in Jalandhar Doab to check Khokhars who were plundering the Doab and 				
made a settlement at Sultanpur while Nihand Khan stayed back and founded the present city at 				
the site of village Mir Hota. 				
573.   Kaba Gandhi No Delo is the place where Mahatma Gandhi  lived during his stay in 				
Rajkot.Mahatma Gandhi's father, Karamchand Gandhi was known as Kaba Gandhi. The words 				
Kaba Gandhi No Delo means Kaba Gandhi's residence. 				
though it was passed on 26 November 1949.) 				
575.Om Puri: He was critically acclaimed for his performances in many unconventional roles 				
such as a victimized tribal in Aakrosh (1980) (a film in which he spoke not a single line of dialogue). 				
576. The Baitarani is one of six major rivers of Orissa, which lends its coastal plain the name of 				
"Hexadeltaic region" or the "Gift of Six Rivers. 				
577. As lord of the Vasus, Indra was also referred to as V_sava. 				
578.Beri Beri: The origin of the word is from a Sinhalese phrase meaning "I cannot, I cannot. 				
579.Kwashiorkor: The name is derived from one of the Kwa languages of coastal Ghana and 				
means "the one who is displaced" reflecting the development of the condition in the older child 				
who has been weaned from the breast once a new sibling is born. 				
580. Scurvy:In infants, scurvy is sometimes referred to as Barlow's disease, named after Sir 				
Thomas Barlow (1845-1945),[3] a British physician who described it. Scurvy is also known as 				
Moeller's disease and Cheadle's disease. 				
581. According to occult lore, the Nine Unknown Men are a two millennia-old secret society 				
founded by the Indian Emperor Asoka c. 270 BCE. According to the legend, upon his conversion 				
to Buddhism after a massacre during one of his wars, the Emperor founded the society of the 				
Nine to preserve and develop knowledge that would be dangerous to humanity if it fell into the wrong hands. 				
582. Windows XP. Eventually "Neptune" was merged into their new project, Whistler, which 				
later became windows XP. 				
583. The origin of the folkloric term "Blue Moon" is complicated, because its meaning has 				
changed over time. Modern practice is to name a full moon a blue moon if it is the second of two 				
full moons to occur in the same calendar month. The original meaning of blue moon was the 				
third full moon in a season when there were four Full Moons in that season. 				
584. Gowri Habba is celebrated a day before Ganesh Chaturthi. It is a significant festival in 				
parts of Karnataka, Andhra Pradesh & Tamil Nadu. Gowri the mother of Lord Ganesha and wife 				
of Lord Shiva is worshiped through out India for her ability to bestow upon her devotees courage & power. 				
585. Nariyal Purnima:In western India and parts of Maharashtra, Gujarat, Goa and Karnataka, 				
this day is celebrated as Nariyal Purnima. On this day an offering of a coconut (nariyal) is made 				
to the sea, as a mark of respect to Lord Varuna, the God of the Sea. Nariyal Purnima marks the 				
beginning of the fishing season and the fisherman, who depend on the sea for a living, make an 				
offering to Lord Varuna so that they can reap bountiful fish from the sea. 				
586. At least three children have been born in Antarctica. The first was Emilio Marcos 				
Palma, born January 7, 1978 to Argentine parents on the Argentine Base Esperanza, near the tip 				
of the Antarctic peninsula. In 1984, Juan Pablo Camacho was born at the Presidente Eduardo 				
Frei Montalva Base, becoming the first Chilean born in Antarctica. Soon after, a girl, Gisella, 				
was born at the same station. 				
587. Jabalpur is the administrative headquarters of Jabalpur district and Jabalpur division. The 				
city is considered to be a Sanskardhani, literally meaning a "cultural centerplace". 				
588.Kanha: The park is claimed to be the birth place of the Jungle Book by Rudyard Kipling. 				
However, a nearby national park in Seoni District near the town of Chhindwada, named 				
Priyadarshini Indira Pench Valley National Park is wisely accepted as the original 				
birthplace of Mowgli that inspired Kipling to write the book. Mowgli(not named as such) 				
was a real feral child found by villagers living at the outskirts of the park. 				
something good. He bumps into Idi Amin (Forest Whitaker, who bagged his first Best Actor 				
Oscar for this role), and the two strike up a friendship. 				
591. Prahasta: chief commander of Ravana's army of Lanka. Purochan in next birth.				
592. Atikaya was the son of Lord of Lanka, Ravana and Queen Dhanyamalini, who was the 				
second wife of Ravana. Atikaya was the younger brother of Indrajit and was extremely powerful. 				
He had learned all the secrets of archery and gained divine weapons through Lord Shiva when 				
he caught the Trishula of Lord Shiva in anger at Mount Kailasha. 				
593. According to Hindu mythology the Sudarshana chakra was made by the architect of 				
gods, Viswakarma.Viswakarma's daughter was married to the Sun. Due to the Sun's blazing 				
power she was unable to go near the Sun and she complained to her father about this. 				
Viswakarma took the Sun and put him on his workshop and made him less shining and thus his 				
daughter was able to hug the Sun. The left over Sun-"dust" was collected by Viswakarma and he 				
made 3 things out of it. The 1st one was the famous aerial vehicle Pushpaka Vimana, the 2nd 				
was the Trident of Lord Siva, and the 3rd was the Sudarshana Chakra of Lord Vishnu. 				
594.Bhopal Express: It has achived prestigious Ramkrishna Bajaj National Quality Award in 				
small business category. It is also India's first ISO 9000-2001 certified train. 				
595.Chocolate: Krish (Anil Kapoor) is a sharp and egotistical lawyer who has unmatched legal 				
skills. Rocker (Sunil Shetty) is and obsessed lover clear about one thing ? nothing comes in his 				
way. Pipi (Irfan Khan) is a soulful thinker who would always prefer to tread the hard but right 				
path. Tubby (Arshad Warsi) is a playboy. Sim (Tanushree Dutta) is a temptress with a 				
dubious past. Devaa (Emran Hashmi) is a passionate musician who sees the world in black and 				
white. Mansoon (Sushma Reddy) is a charming down-on-her luck journalist. 				
596. Kishore knew Madhubala had a health problem but in spite of that they had a civil 				
marriage and he converted to Islam and was renamed Karim Abdul. 				
597. Man Dole Mera Tan Dole:Hindi Movie:  NAGIN(1954)				
Singer: LATA MANGESHKAR; Music: Hemant Kumar;Lyrisyst:Rajinder Krishen.				
598. Afonso de Albuquerque:(born 1453, Alhandra, near Lisbon — died Dec. 15, 1515, at sea,				
off Goa, India) Portuguese soldier, conqueror of Goa (1510) and of Melaka (1511).				
599.Almeida, Francisco de, c.1450-1510, Portuguese admiral, first viceroy of Portuguese 				
India. He was first sent to India in 1503 as captain major of a fleet and helped Portuguese forces				
defeat the ruler of Calicut. In 1505 he was appointed viceroy and set out from Lisbon with				
instructions to develop Portuguese commerce by building fortifications on the east coast of				
Africa, concluding alliances with the Indian rulers, and taking control of the spice trade from the				
Arabs. In Africa he built forts at Kilwa and Sofala and burned Mombasa. After his arrival in				
India he built further forts but relied mainly on his fleets to secure control of all sea trade..				
Almeida at first refused to yield his power to Afonso de Albuquerque and had Albuquerque 				
imprisoned (1509), but he later gave him command. On his way home to Portugal, Almeida was				
killed by Khoikhoi near the Cape of Good Hope. 				
600. George Bernard Shaw (born 26 July, 1856, Dublin, Ireland died November 2, 1950,				
Hertfordshire, England) was an Irish writer. Famed as a playwright, he wrote more than sixty				
plays. He was uniquely honoured by being awarded both a Nobel Prize (1925) for his 				
contribution to literature and an Oscar (1938) for Pygmalion. He was a strong advocate for				
socialism and women's rights, a vegetarian and teetotaller, and a vocal enemy of formal				
education. Shaw died in 1950 at the age of 94 as the result of injuries incurred by falling from a				
ladder while he was attempting to prune a tree. 				
Malaysia); Ashok Gandotra (Rio de Janeiro, Brazil); Salim Durani (Kabul, Afghanistan) and 				
Rabindra (Robin) Singh (Princes Town, Trinidad. 				
consecutive balls in first-class cricket. Sobers was playing as captain of Nottinghamshire against 				
Glamorgan in Swansea; the unfortunate bowler was Malcolm Nash. This tally of 36 runs off an 				
over beat a 57 year-old record of 34 runs, held by Ted Alletson. The feat of six sixes in an 				
over, by Ravi Shastri, playing for Bombay against Baroda in 1984. 				
Thumb : Angushta 				
Index finger : Tarjani 				
Middle finger : Madhyama 				
Ring finger : Anamika 				
Little finger : Kanishtika 				
604. In Western cultures a wedding ring is traditionally worn on the ring finger. According to 				
tradition, the wedding ring is worn on the left ring finger because the vein in the left ring finger, 				
referred to as the vena amoris was believed to be directly connected to the heart, a symbol of 				
love.(Ring finger) It is the weakest of the fingers on the hand, as it shares a flexor muscle with 				
the middle and little fingers. 				
605. The medical finger.(Ring finger) Some cultures named it after its supposed magic 				
power, especially the healing power. An example of the idea of its healing power is 				
Bhaisajyaguru, the Medicine Buddha, who uses his right ring finger for medicine. 				
English: leech finger 				
German: Arztfinger (doctor's finger) 				
Japanese: kusuri-yubi (medicine finger) 				
Japanese: kusushi-yubi (doctor's finger) 				
606. little finger, also known as 'pinky'. 				
607. Opossums have a remarkably robust immune system, and show partial or total immunity 				
to the venom of rattlesnakes, cottonmouths, and other pit vipers.Thanks to their lower blood 				
temperature, rabies is almost unknown in opossums. 				
608. Muhammad Bin Tughlaq (1325-51), the most celebrated king of the Tughlaq dynasty, was 				
the first Muslim ruler who revolutionized the coinage.. His experiments with his coinage, 				
particularly his forced currency, give him a prominent place among the greatest moneyers of 				
history. He has been called the "the prince of moneyers." 				
609. Project Mogul (sometimes referred to as Operation Mogul) was a top secret project by 				
the US Army Air Forces involving high altitude balloons, whose primary purpose was long- 				
distance detection of sound waves generated by Soviet atomic bomb tests and ballistic missiles. 				
The project was carried out from 1947 until late 1948. 				
610. India Gate, an important monument of the city, is a memorial built in commemoration of 				
more than 80,000 Indian soldiers who were killed during World War I. The monument is an 				
imposing 42 meters high arch and was designed by the famous architect Edwin Lutyens. India 				
gate was earlier named All India War Memorial. The design of India gate is almost similar to 				
its French counterpart war memorial, the Arc-de-Triomphe. 				
611. Puja Gupta was crowned `Miss India Universe`, Mumbai girl Sarah Jane Dias was 				
crowned `Miss India World` and Puja Chitgopekar `Miss India Earth` at a glittering awards 				
function of the coveted beauty pageant here last night. 				
612. The most widely accepted origin of the name Sikkim is that it is a combination of two 				
words in the Limbu Su, which means "new", and Khyim, which means "palace" or house, in 				
reference to the palace built by the state's first ruler, Phuntsok Namgyal. The Tibetan name for 				
Sikkim is 'Denjong, which means the "valley of rice." 				
613.Green Billionares: Among the green billionaires are high-profile folks like Microsoft co- 				
founders Bill Gates and Paul Allen. Gates' investment firm invested $84 million in California's 				
Pacific Ethanol, which makes ethanol from corn; Allen's real estate investment company is 				
constructing 100 million square feet of housing made from environmentally sensitive materials 				
in downtown Seattle. But even in conservation, Google appears to be racing ahead of Microsoft. Google co-founders Sergey Brin and Larry Page, turned their Mountain View, Calif., headquarters into one of the 				
world's most eco-friendly. 				
614. The name BrahMos is derived from the names of the two great rivers of India and Russia - 				
- the Brahmaputra and Moskva -- and the missile is jointly produced by India's Defence 				
Research and Development Organisation and Russia's NPO Mashinostroyenia under the project 				
codenamed PJ-10. 				
615. Mikhail Sergeyevich Gorbachev surname more accurately romanized as Gorbachyov; 				
born March 2, 1931) is a Russian politician. He was the last leader of the Soviet Union, serving 				
from 1985 until its collapse in 1991. 				
616. glasnost ("openness"), perestroika ("restructuring"), and uskoreniye ("acceleration", of 				
economic development. 				
617. Gorbachev himself was elected as the first and only President of the Soviet Union by 				
the Congress of People's Deputies. 				
618. Boris Nikolayevich Yeltsin (February 1, 1931 - April 23, 2007   ) was the first president 				
of the Russian Federation, serving from 1991 to 1999 				
619.Ryoto Tachi(Japanese) won his first Tennis title in India beating pune's Arjun Khade at 				
mumbai. 				
620. Mulayam Singh Yadav was a member of the Lok Sabha. In order to meet the 				
constitutional requirement of becoming the member of state legislature within 6 months of being 				
sworn in, he contested the assembly by-election from Gunnur assembly seat in January 2004. 				
He won by a record margin and polled almost 92% of the total votes. His victory margin of 				
183,899 votes is the highest margin of victory in assembly elections so far. 				
621.Rahul Dravid: This was the 65th occasion when Dravid participated in a century 				
partnership - most by any batsman in Test history . 				
622.   Despite European pressure, Thailand is the only Southeast Asian country never to have 				
been colonized by a European power. 				
623. Fastest Test fifties (by minutes) 27  Mohammad Ashraful (67)  Ban v Ind  Mirpur  2007 				
Fastest Test fifties (by balls) Balls 				
24  JH Kallis (54)  SA v Zim  Cape Town  2004-05 				
26  Shahid Afridi (58)  Pak v Ind  Bangalore  2004-05 				
26  Mohammad Ashraful (67)  Ban v Ind  Mirpur  2007 				
624. British Prime Minister Tony Blair has made his movie debut in a short film about climate 				
change awareness, which is directed by Indian filmmaker Shekhar Kapur . 				
The 54-year-old outgoing premier plays a 'carbon crusader' in the film titled Global Cool, that 				
also stars blond beauty Sienna Miller . 				
625. Based on the George Jonas' book 'Vengeance', Munich(directed by Stephen Spilberg) 				
focuses on the unrelenting bloodlust and massacre of 11 Israeli athletes by Black September 				
terrorists. 				
626. Yash Raj Films will make its foray into animation movies by tying up with Walt Disney 				
Studios, USA. Their first film together will be Roadside Romeo, a film about a dog, that will 				
release in the summer of 2008. 				
A musical, Roadside Romeo will be directed by Jugal Hansraj, who was earlier seen in Aditya 				
Chopra's directorial venture, Mohabbatein. The voices for the characters will be given by Saif 				
Ali Khan [Images], Kareena Kapoor and Jaaved Jafri. 				
627. Kokborok also known as Tiprakok or Tripuri is the native language of the Tripuri people 				
in the Indian state of Tripura and its neighbouring areas of Bangladesh. The word Kokborok 				
is composed of two words, kok which means "language" and borok which literally means "man" 				
but is used to denote the Tripuri people. Thus Kokborok means "the language of man" or "the 				
language of the Borok people". 				
628. The most widely accepted origin of the name Sikkim is that it is a combination of two 				
words in the Limbu Su, which means "new", and Khyim, which means "palace" or house, in 				
reference to the palace built by the state's first ruler, Phuntsok Namgyal. The Tibetan name for 				
Sikkim is 'Denjong, which means the "valley of rice". 				
629. The Pha Luang Ta Bua Yannasampanno monastery(Bangkong), where tourists come to 				
see man and beast living together in perfect harmony.Tigers sleeping on the laps of human beings. 				
630.World's largest hotel: On December 18, 2006 Guinness World Records listed the First 				
World Hotel in Genting Highlands, Malaysia as the world's largest hotel. It has a total of 				
6,118 rooms and is part of the Genting Highlands Resort. 				
631. Bipasha Basu will be hosting the grand show at Benfica Stadium, Lisbon where the 				
names of the New 7 wonders of the World will be announced on July 7.Accompanying her 				
on stage will be Hollywood stars Ben Kingsley and Hillary Swank. 				
632. Cesar-Polo-Esau Papers deal with Communist countries notably China and the 				
erstwhile Soviet Union and three sections of which are devoted to an analysis of the Sino-Indian 				
relations leading up to the 1962 debacle. 				
633. World's Longest Rice Grain:Indian Basmati 1121. 				
634.Metcalfe House: The training of IAS officers those days used to be undertaken in Metcalfe 				
House in Delhi. Probationers would live in nearby areas and cycle their way to Metcalfe House. 				
In 1958, the training school was shifted to Mussoorie. 				
635.Sehwag(20-20 trophy) unveiled the 12 kg silver-rhodium trophy, which has been designed 				
by Minale Bryce Design Strategy of Queensland, Australia, and manufactured by Amit Pabuwal in India. 				
636. Perin made what in today's parlance would be the DPR or the detailed project report for the 				
plant. Even after the report, Perin stayed till the site for the plant was fixed at Sakchi, or what is 				
known as Jamsehdpur (Sakchi was renamed Jamshedpur by Lord Chelmsford, the viceroy 				
of India, and Kalimati station Tatanagar in 1919). 				
637. The first international bowl-out in a Twenty20 match took place on 16 February 2006, 				
when New Zealand beat West Indies 3-0 in Auckland.   A bowl-out was also used on 14 				
September 2007 when India beat Pakistan 3-0 during the 2007 Twenty20 World Championship 				
in Durban, South Africa. 				
638. With 1,55,618 post offices and over 5,66,000 employees, India has the largest postal 				
network in the world.We can also boast of the world's highest post office, Hikkim (pin code 				
172114). Located at 15,500 feet, Hikkim is part of the Lahaul and Spiti district in Himachal Pradesh. 				
639:The first Twenty20 international in England was played between England and Australia at the Rose Bowl in Hampshire on the 13th June 2005, which England won. 				
640. Sandeep Sejwal made a big splash in the pool as he won his second silver medal at the 2nd 				
Indoor Asian Games in Macau by finishing second in the men's 50m breaststroke. 				
641. Carl Lewis is the only man to defend a 100 meter Olympic title successfully. Archie Hahn, 1904 Olympic champion, also won the 1906 Olympic 100 m title, but the Intercalated Games are not recognized by the IOC as being official.				
He is also the only man to defend long jump Olympic title successfully, four times. No other long jumper has ever won twice at the Olympic games                                                               				
642. Twinkle, Twinkle, Little Star" is a popular English nursery rhyme. It combines the tune of				
the French melody "Ah! vous dirai-je, Maman" (first published in 1761)with an English poem,				
"The Star", by Jane Taylor. The poem, which is in couplet form, was first published in 1806 in				
Rhymes for the Nursery, a collection of poems by Taylor and her sister Ann.				
643. Singhania's 'Mission Impossible' (MI-70K) to set the World Altitude record in a hot air				
baloon at the Mahalaxmi Race Course in Mumbai. Singhania became the first man to fly his 				
hot air baloon to a new height of 69.852 ft above sea level. The previous record of 'high				
Altitude in a Hot Air Baloon' was set by Per Lindstrand who touched a height of 64,997 ft.				
His publication:  The Indian Post(a short lived news paper from Bombay) 				
Hon Air Commodore of the Indian Air Force by the then President of India R Venkataraman. 				
He also did a solo flight in a microlight from the UK to India in 1998. Singhania has a flight 				
experience of over 5,000 hours. 				
In 1994, he won the gold medal in the Federation Aeronautique Internationale race, 				
covering a distance of 34,000 km spanning 24 days 				
644. The Moitree (friendship) Express will operate weekly between the Cantonment Railway 				
Station in Dhaka and Chitpur station in Kolkata passing through the Darshana border in a 13 to 				
14 hour long journey. 				
646.JAUHAR : Alauddin Khilji was the first to attack Chittaur in 1303 A.D., overpowered by a 				
passionate desire to possess the regal beauty, queen Padmini. Legend has it, that he saw her face 				
in the reflection of a mirror and was struck by her mesmerising beauty. But the noble queen 				
preferred death to dishonour and committed 'Jauhar'. 				
In 1533 A.D, during the rule of Bikramjeet, came the second attack from Bahadur Shah, the 				
Sultan of Gujarat. Once again Jauhar was led by Rani Karnavati, a Bundi princess. Her infant 				
son, Udai Singh was smuggled out of Chittaur to Bundi who survived to inherit the throne of the 				
citadel. He learnt from his traumatic childhood that discretion is preferred to valour. So, in 1567 				
A.D., when the Mughal Emperor invaded Chittaur, Udai Singh fled to establish a new capital, 				
Udaipur - a beautiful lake city, leaving behind Chittaur to be defended by two 16-year-old 				
heroes, Jaimal of Bednore and Patta of Kelwa. These young men displayed true Rajput 				
chivalry and died after 'Jauhar' was performed. Immediately thereafter Akbar razed the fort to a 				
rubble. Chittaur was never inhabited again but it always was a reminder of the the heroic spirit of 				
Rajput warriors. 				
647. Vande Mataram is the national song of India, distinct from the national anthem of India 				
"Jana Gana Mana". The song was composed by Bankimchandra Chattopadhyay in a mixture 				
of Bengali and Sanskrit. and the first political occasion where it was sung(by Rabindranath 				
Tagore) was the 1896 session of the Indian National Congress.In 2003, BBC World Service 				
conducted an international poll to choose ten most famous songs of all time. Around 7000 songs 				
were selected from all over the world. According to BBC, people from 155 countries/island 				
voted. Vande Mataram was second in top 10 songs. 				
648.Bada Imambara: architect Kifayatullah, who also lies buried in the main hall of the 				
Imambara. It is another unique aspect of the building where the sponsor(tomb of Asaf-ud-Daula) 				
and the architect lie buried besides each other. 				
649.The Chattar Manzil, or Umbrella Palace, was constructed by order of Nawab Ghazi Uddin 				
Haider and completed after his death by his successor, Nawab Nasir Uddin Haider. The palace 				
now houses the Central Drug Research Institute (CDRI). 				
650. Kakori is one of the Indian towns which has a Martian crater named after it. The other 				
cities/towns are Amet, Bhor, Broach, Poona (Pune), Rayadurg, Sandila and Wer.				
651. Panama Canal:The canal was formally opened on August 15, 1914 with the passage of the 				
cargo ship Ancon.Coincidentally, this was also the same month that fighting in World War I 				
(the Great War) began in Europe. 				
652.Panama Canal: The least expensive toll was 36 cents to American adventurer Richard 				
Halliburton who swam the canal in 1928. 				
The most expensive regular toll for canal passage to date was charged on February 24, 2008 to 				
the Norwegian Jade cruise liner, which paid just over US$313,000. 				
653.Challenger Deep :  conquest  ;On 23 January 1960, the Swiss-built Bathyscaphe Trieste, 				
acquired by the U.S. Navy, descended to the ocean floor in the trench manned by Jacques 				
Piccard (who co-designed the submersible along with his father, Auguste Piccard) and USN 				
Lieutenant Don Walsh. The descent took almost five hours and the two men spent barely 				
twenty minutes on the ocean floor before undertaking the three-hour-and-fifteen-minute ascent. 				
They measured the depth as 10,916 metres (35,813 feet). 				
654.Jallianwalabag: Reginald Dyere was later told by the Commander-in-Chief in India, 				
General Sir Charles Carmichael Monro, to resign his post and that he would not be reemployed. 				
655.Northernmost point on land: Kaffeklubben Island, east of Greenland (83°40N, 				
29°50W).Various shifting gravel bars lie further north, the most famous being Oodaaq. 				
656. This was India's third heaviest Test defeat. Earlier, West Indies beat India by an 				
innings and 336 runs at Kolkata in 1958, while England thumped them by an innings and 285 				
runs at Lord's in 1974. 				
657. Posthumous Golden globe awards and nominations: 				
1976: Peter Finch won the award for Best Actor in a Motion Picture Drama for his role in Network. 				
2009: Heath Ledger won the award for Best Supporting Actor in a Motion Picture for his role in 				
The Dark Knight. 				
658. Only four actresses have won two acting awards(Golden globe) in the same year: 				
Sigourney Weaver (1989) 				
Best Actress, Motion Picture Drama, Gorillas in the Mist: The Story of Dian Fossey 				
Best Supporting Actress - Motion Picture, Working Girl 				
Joan Plowright (1993) 				
Best Supporting Actress - Motion Picture, Enchanted April 				
Best Supporting Actress - Series, Miniseries or Television Film, Stalin 				
Helen Mirren (2007) 				
Best Actress - Motion Picture Drama, The Queen 				
Best Actress - Miniseries or Television Film, Elizabeth I 				
Kate Winslet (2009) 				
Best Actress - Motion Picture Drama, Revolutionary Road 				
Best Supporting Actress - Motion Picture, The Reader 				
659. Shantanu came across Satyavati, daughter of Dāshraj (a ferryman on the Yamuna 				
river), and fell in love with her. D_shraj agreed to the marriage on condition that any child 				
Satyavati bore him would inherit the throne.				
660. Vir Chakra: It was first awarded to Subedar Har Singh on 10th December, 1947				
661. Panchayati raj system exists: in all the states except Nagaland, Meghalaya and Mizoram. Also all the UTs except Delhi.				
            662. Ahilyabai's husband Khanderao Holkar was killed in the battle of Kumbher in 1754. Twelve years later, her father-in-law, Malhar Rao Holkar				
           663.Noor-Jehan:  Occasionally composed Persian poems under the assumed name of Makhfi				
          664.Narmada River: means “ giver of pleasure.”				
            Shiva’s sweat accumulated in a tank and started flowing in the form of a river – the Narmada. Another legend has it that two teardrops that fell from the eyes of Lord Brahma, the Creator (*of the Universe, yielded two rivers – the Narmada and the Sone				
          665.Kanchipuram at the bankvati river of Veda				
          666.Saptapuri:Ayodhya,Haridwar,Varanasi, Mathura,Kanchipuram,Dwarka,Ujjain.				
                 667:Test Cricket records:				
             The first batsman to score a triple hundred in Test cricket was England's Andy Sandham when  he scored 325 against West Indies at Kingston in April 1930. Sandham's record score was surpassed by Don Bradman (334 in 1930), Wally Hammond (336 not out in 1932-33), Len Hutton (364 in 1938). West Indian Gary Sobers then scored 365 not out against Pakistan at Kingston in 1957-58) and it remained a record until another West Indian Brian Lara made 375 against England at St. John's in 1993-94. Australia's Matthew Hayden broke Lara's record with 380 against Zimbabwe at Perth in 2003-04, but Lara got the record back on his name against England once again against England at St. John's in the same season. Lara  also became the first batsman to score a quadruple century (400 not out) in Test history :				
668. Here is the list Indian centurions in their debut innings:				
Batsman	Runs	VS	Venue	Season
SC Ganguly	131	Eng	Lord's	1996
S Amarnath	124	NZ 	Auckland	1975-76
SK Raina	120	SL	Colombo SSC	2010
DH Shodhan	110	Pak	Kolkata [ Images ]	1952-53
M Azharuddin	110	Eng	Kolkata	1984-85
Hanumant Singh	105	Eng	Delhi [ Images ] 	1963-64
V Sehwag	105	SA	Bloemfontein	2001-02
PK Amre	103	SA	Durban	1992-93
AG Kripal Singh	100*	NZ 	Hyderabad 	1955-56
                                                                                            				
       669. Henri Pequet (1888-1974) was a pilot in the first official airmail flight on February 18, 1911. The 23 year old Frenchman, in India for an airshow, delivered about 6,500 letters when he flew from Allahabad to Naini, about 10 kilometers away. He flew a Sommer biplane with about fifty horsepower (37 kW), and made the journey in thirteen minutes.The letters were marked "First Aerial Post, U.P. Exhibition Allahabad 1911."            				
         670. 33 miners in Copiapo, Chile, emerged miraculously safe as heroes from the treacherous Mina San Jose copper-gold mine that held them captive post a cave-in August 5.				
    				
				
          671. In his laboratory on 2 October 1925, Baird successfully transmitted the first television picture with a greyscale image: the head of a ventriloquist's dummy nicknamed "Stooky Bill" in a 30-line vertically scanned image, at five pictures per second Baird went downstairs and fetched an office worker, 20-year-old William Edward Taynton, to see what a human face would look like, and Taynton became the first person to be televised in a full tonal range.				
        672. The Golghar or Gol Ghar ("Round house"), located to the west of the Gandhi Maidan in Patna, capital of Bihar state, India is a granary built by Captain John Garstin, in 1786				
        673. On king Kaykay's advice, Ram sends Bharat and his sons to Gandhar. They win the Gandhar provience. Bharat's son Taksha builds the city Takshashila (now Taxila). Bharat's son Pushkal builds the city Pushkalavati (now Charasdda in Pakistan).				
        674. Satrughna’s sons were named Subhahu and Surasena.				
        675.. Shantanu came across Satyavati, daughter of Dāshraj (a ferryman on the Yamuna river), and fell in love with her. Dāshraj agreed to the marriage on condition that any child				
             Satyavati bore him would inherit the throne.				
        676. Houseboats were introduced accidentally to Kashmir: members of the Indian Civil Service serving in the plains who vacationed in Kashmir were not permitted to build permanent homes because of the then Maharaja's suspicion of a British presence in Srinagar. They thus chose to live in houseboats. The first such, named Victory, was designed by Mr MT Kenhard in 1888				
677: It was this Prabhasa who took birth as Devavrata (Bhishma). The legend behind Bhishma's birth is as follows — once the eight Vasus ("Ashtavasus") visited Vashishta's ashram accompanied by their wives. One of the wives took a fancy to Nandini, Vashishta's wish-bearing cow and asked her husband Prabhasa to steal it from Vashishta. Prabhasa then stole the cow with the help of the others who were all consequently cursed by Vashishta to be born in the world of men. Upon the Vasus appealing to Vashishta's mercy, the seven Vasus who had assisted in stealing Nandini had their curse mitigated such that they would be liberated from their human birth as soon as they were born; however, Prabhasa being protagonist of the theft, was cursed to endure a longer life on the earth. The curse, however is softened to the extent that he would be one of the most illustrious men of his time.				
678: Jambavan, Jambavat, or Jambuvan the King of the Bears, is a sloth bear in Indian epic tradition, immortal to all but his father Vishnu. He is known as Riksharaj (King of the Rikshas).				
679: In 2000, three of the Miss India winners won their respective international pageants – Lara Dutta (Miss Universe), Priyanka Chopra (Miss World) and Diya Mirza (Miss Asia-Pacific). The only other country to have won all three major titles in one year was Australia in 1972				
680: In 2010, Nicole Faria became the first Indian to win the Miss Earth title in Vietnam				
681: Starting in 2010, Femina Miss India relinquished the franchise to send a representative to the Miss Universe pageant. Tantra Entertainment Pvt. Ltd. (TEPL) in collaboration with 1994 Miss Universe Sushmita Sen have started a new pageant called I Am She – Miss Universe India. The winner of this pageant will participate in the Miss Universe pageant.  				
682: Mālavikāgnimitram: meaning Mālavikā and Agnimitra is a Sanskrit play by Kālidāsa. It is his first play.The play tells the story of the love of King Agnimitra, the Shunga king of Vidisha for the beautiful hand-maiden of his chief queen. He falls in love with the picture of an exiled servant girl named Mālavikā. When the queen discovers her husband's passion for this girl, she becomes infuriated and has Mālavikā imprisoned, but as fate would have it, in the end she is discovered to be of royal birth and is accepted as one of his queens.				
683:Kalidas’ Poetry:   Raghuvamśa is an epic poem about the kings of the Raghu dynasty.Kumārasambhava is an epic poem which narrates the birth of Kartikeya, Parvati being sent by her father to serve the meditating Siva, Manmadha attempting to create love in Siva for Parvati, Siva destroying Manmadha in his fury.Ṛtusamhāra describes the six seasons by narrating the experiences of two lovers in each of the seasons.Meghadūta or Meghasāndesa is the story of Meanwhile, the Dutch, fearing an outbreak of war on the United Provinces, signed the Anglo-Dutch Treaty of 1814 with the United Kingdom, under which Kochi was ceded to the United Kingdom in exchange for the island of Bangkaa Yaksha trying to send a message to his lover through a cloud. Kalidasa set this poem to the 'mandākrānta' meter known for its lyrical sweetness. It is one of Kalidasa's most popular poems and numerous commentaries on the work have been written.				
684:KIRTIMANA:.Vasudev and Devaki’s firt son. Vasudeva took him to Garga and named him Kirtiman.				
685: The result was Kumar's magnum opus and his directorial debut, Upkaar (1967). In it, he played both a soldier and a farmer. The film was also noted for the famous song Mere Desh Ki Dharti, written by Gulshan Bawra, composed by Kalyanji-Anandji and sung by MahendraKapoor.				
686. Portugese navigator, Pedro Álvares Cabral founded the first European settlement in India at Kochi in 1500.				
687. Meanwhile, the Dutch, fearing an outbreak of war on the United Provinces, signed the Anglo-Dutch Treaty of 1814 with the United Kingdom, under which Kochi was ceded to the United Kingdom in exchange for the island of Bangka(Indonesia).				
688.Medini : The Harivansa states that the earth received its name of Medini from the marrow (medas) of these demons. In one passage it says that their bodies(demons Madhu & Kaitabha), being thrown into the sea, produced an immense quantity of marrow or fat, where Narayana used in forming the earth. In another place it says that the medas quite covered the earth, and so gave it the name of Medini.				
689:Raj ghat: The memorial has the epitaph Hē Ram, (literally 'O' Ram', but also translated to 'O God'), believed to be the last words uttered by Gandhi. The memorial was designed by Vanu G. Bhuta. The landscaping and planting of memorials at Rajghat was performed by Alick Percy-Lancaster, the last Englishman to hold the post of Superintendent of Horticultural Operations, Government of India.				
690:Navy day 04 Dec. : On 4 December, the Indian Navy successfully executed Operation Trident, a devastating attack on the Pakistan Naval Headquarters of Karachi that sank a minesweeper, a destroyer and an ammunition supply ship. The attack also irreperably damaged another destroyer and oil storage tanks at the Karachi port. This was followed by Operation Python on 8 December 1971, further deprecating the Pakistan Navy's capabilities. Indian frigate INS Khukri was sunk by the PNS Hangor (S131), while INS Kirpan (1959) was damaged on the west coast.				
691: Kailash Parvat: The word may be derivedfrom the word kēlāsa (केलास) which means "crystal".The Tibetan name for the mountain is Gangs Rin-po-che. Gangs or Kang is the Tibetan word for snow peak analogous to alp or himal; rinpoche is an honorific meaning "precious one" so the combined term can be translated "precious jewel of snows".Another local name for the mountain is Tisé mountain, which derives from ti tse in the Zhang-Zhung language, meaning "water peak" or "river peak".                                                                                                                                                                                                				
692: Kalantaka (Ender of Death) is an aspect of the Hindu god Shiva as the Conqueror of Time and Death, itself personified by the god Yama.He is depicted as defeating or killing Yama when the latter comes to take the life of Shiva's devotee Markandeya. Shiva is often depicted as dancing on Death, personified by Yama.The chief temple dedicated to Kalantaka is situated at Thirukkadavoor, Tamil Nadu (South India), however the Kalantaka icon is found sculpted in many Shiva temples in the South.                                                                                                                                                                                                                 693: International Day of Non-Violence. On 15 June 2007, it was announced that the "United Nations General Assembly" has "unanimously adopted" a resolution declaring 2 October as "the International Day of Non-Violence.30 January of every year is observed the School Day of Non-violence and Peace in schools of many countries.In countries with a Southern Hemisphere school calendar, it can be observed on 30 March.                                                                                                          694: Jai Hind was coined by Netaji Subhas Bose's close lieutanant Major Abid Hasan.                                                                                                                   				
695: Massoud was known as the Lion of the Panjshir for playing a leading role in driving the Soviet army out of Afghanistan in 1989, bringing an end to the 10-year Soviet invasion.                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       696: Different methods of Cleansing Process (Shudhikriyas)   Agnisardhouti, Vamandhouti,  Kapalbhati,  Jalneti,  Nasagra Drishti.                                                                                             697: Salt March to Dandi from 12 March to 6 April, where he marched 388 kilometres (241 miles) from Ahmedabad to Dandi, Gujarat.                                                                                                          698: There are two temples in India dedicated to Gandhi.One is located at Sambalpur in Odisha and the other at Nidaghatta village near Kadur in Chikmagalur district of Karnataka.                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                           699: The Mahamrityunjaya Mantra also called the Tryambakam Mantra, is a verse of the Rigveda .It is addressed to Tryambaka "the three-eyed one", an epithet of Rudra, later identified with Shiva.The verse also recurs in the Yajurveda .                                                                                                                                                    700: Main Jat Yamla Pagla Deewana" from the 1975 film, Pratiggya also starring Dharmendra.Sang by Mohmd Raffi.                                                                                                       701: The tz database, also called the zoneinfo database, is a collaborative compilation of information about the world's time zones, primarily intended for use with computer programs and operating systems. It is sometimes referred to as the Olson database after the founding contributor Arthur David Olson. Paul Eggert is editor and maintainer of the tz database.                                                                                                                                                                                                                             702.: IST is designated E* ("Echo-Star").Indian Standard Time is calculated on the basis of 82.5° E longitude, which is just west of the town of Mirzapur, near Allahabad in the state of Uttar Pradesh.In the tz database it is represented by Asia/Kolkata.                                                                                                                                                                       703: Atimaharathi: A warrior capable of fighting 12 Maharathi warriors simultaneously. Rama, Hanuman and Indrajit are Atimaharathi's.                                                                                                 704: Goddess Parvati, then she come before them in different avtaars and forms.  				
Durga, the one who killed demon Durgamasur, She is rides on lion.                                                  Kali, the most ferocious Form of the Goddess, who can not be pacified by any one after war. Chandi, the gentle and manifestation of Goddess Durga or Kali, Goddess Lakshmi, Goddess   Saraswati, who killed Demon Mahishasura in battle of Alkapuri. Kanyakumari, the one who killed Banasura  .Chamunda, Who killed Chand mund and Rakta vijya   Kaushiki, who killed Shumbha and  Nishumbha .                                             .				
705: Goddess Laksmi's incarnation. One example is Demon Muru, who was killed by the Goddess and she saved her consort Lord Vishnu.                                                                                     706: SS Gairsoppa was a 412 foot steel-hulled British cargo steamship that was enlisted in the service of the United Kingdom Ministry of War Transport and sunk by a German U-boat on February 17, 1941.The Gairsoppa was discovered approximately 4700 meters below the surface of the north Atlantic, in international waters approximately 300 miles off the coast of Ireland.It was carrying 70lakh ounces of silver from India.                                                                                          707: The Milwaukee protocol is an experimental course of treatment of an acute infection of rabies in a human being. The treatment involves putting the patient into a chemically induced coma and administering antiviral drugs. It was developed and named by Dr. Rodney Willoughby, Jr., M.D., following the successful treatment of Jeanna Giese. Giese, a teenager from Wisconsin, became the first of only six patients known to have survived symptomatic rabies without receiving the rabies vaccine.                                                                                                                                                                                                                       708:Anti rabies vaccine: This vaccine was first used on 9-year old Joseph Meister, on July 6, 1885, after the boy was badly mauled by a rabid dog.                                                                           709:Ram Manohar Lohia: "25000 Rupees a Day", the amount spent on Prime Minister Jawaharlal Nehru, an obscene sum in a country where the vast majority lived on 3 annas (less than one-quarter of a rupee) a day. Nehru demurred, saying that India's Planning Commission statistics showed that the daily average income was more like 15 annas (a little under a rupee) per day. Lohia demanded that this was an important issue, one that cried out for a special debate. The controversy, still remembered in India as the "Teen Anna Pandrah Anna (3 annas -15 annas)" controversy.                                                                                                                  “ Roti and Beti”   Ph D  thesis on salt Satyagrah  .                                                                                                                                                                                                  710: Margaret Elizabeth Noble (1867-1911), better known as Sister Nivedita. Tagore regarded her as Lok-Mata and Aurobindo Ghosh as Agni-sikha.                                                                                          711: The first apparent usage of the term "euthanasia" belongs to the historian Suetonius who described how the Emperor Augustus, "dying quickly and without suffering in the arms of his wife, Livia, experienced the 'euthanasia' he had wished for.                                                                                                                     712. January 1936, King George V was given a fatal dose of morphine and cocaine in order to hasten his death. At the time he was suffering from cardiorespiratory failure, and the decision to end his life was made by his physician, Lord Dawson.                                                                                                                                         713: Pandu mistook a sage (Rishi Kindama) and his wife for deer and shot an arrow at them, killing the conjugal couple. The dying sage placed a curse on Pandu. Since he had killed them in the midst of lovemaking, the curse was that were he to approach a woman with the intent of making love, he would die.                                                                                                                                      714: Vidura is considered as the Mahachohan in the Theosophical world. Mahachohan is said to be the chief of a Social Hierarchy of the trans-Himalayan mystics.                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                 715: Deimachus (3rd century BCE), was a Greek of the Seleucid Empire. He became an ambassador to the court of Bindusara "Amitragata" (son of Chandragupta Maurya) in Pataliputra in India.                                                                                                                                                                                                                              716:In Greek :  King Piodasses (Ashoka)                                                                                                                                                                                                     717:Tristan Da Cunha: The first permanent settler was Jonathan Lambert, from Salem, Massachusetts, United States, who arrived at the islands in December 1810.He declared the islands his property and named them the Islands of Refreshment. Lambert's rule was short-lived, as he died in a boating accident in 1812.				
718: India’s first inland fish processing unit has been set up in the village of Bhutana in Karnal district of Haryana. The unit has been set up in technical collaboration with ZTM BPD Unit, South Zone, Central Institute of Fisheries Technology, Cochin, which comes under the Indian Council of Agricultural Research (ICAR).                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                            719: The East India e Company built its first factory in India in Masulipatnam it was known as Maisolos The port is located on the southeastern, or Coromandel Coast, of India. Situated in the mouth of the River Krishna on the Bay of Bengal, the Masula port saw flourishing sea trade..                                                                                                                                                                                                                    720:Man of the match on Test Debut:  Pravin Amre  ,     RP Singh  .   Aswini .                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                    721:KATHAKALI : The percussion instruments used are chenda, maddalam and, at times, edakka. In addition, the singers (the lead singer is called “ponnani” and his follower is called “singidi”) use "chengila" (gong made of bell metal, which can be struck with a wooden stick) and "ilathaalam" (a pair of cymbals). The lead singer in some sense uses the Chengala to conduct the Vadyam and Geetha components, just as a conductor uses his wand in western classical music. Kathakali is usually performed in front of the huge Kalivilakku (kali meaning dance; vilakku meaning lamp) with its thick wick sunk till the neck in coconut oil. The language of the songs used for Kathakali is Manipravalam.                                                                                                              722:Ravichandran Ashwin became the third Indian cricketer to score a century and take five wickets in same test match. He achieved this feat in his third test where he made 103 and took 5/156 in the first innings. Other Indians to have done this are Vinoo Mankad in 1952 and Polly Umrigar in 1962.                                                                                                                                  723: Lina Medina (born September 27, 1933, in Ticrapo, Huancavelica Region, Peru) is the youngest confirmed mother in medical history, giving birth at the age of five years, seven months and 17 days. She currently lives in Lima, the capital of Peru.                                                                                    724: Youngest Oscar winner: 10-year-old Tatum O'Neal, Paper Moon (1973)                                                                                                                      725 : The world's youngest Prime Minster at any time would have been William Pitt the Younger, of England. He became Prime Minister in 1783 when he was just 24 years old.				
726 : Youngest president of the world -- Romanian five-years-old Razvan Gogan has become the youngest person to act as President, after signing (under the supervision of elected President Basescu) a Presidential Decree for children's rights.                                                                                                                                                                                727: Meleik Delaney is the youngest author in the world. He created the Fighters of Justice Book Series at the age of 3. He wrote several books at 3.                                                                                                                                                                                                                                              728: Tendulkar’s 100th hundred in the Asia Cup match against Bangladesh on Friday helped him complete a 'century of centuries'.The landmark was achieved with a single on the leg side off Shakib Al Hassan, in the 44th over. First hundred off Angus Fraser of england.                                                                                              729: 400 mts Hurdles, 1984 Los Angeles Olympics;				
FinalRANK FINAL TIME				
Gold :  Nawal El Moutawakel (MAR) 54.61				
 Silver : Judi Brown (USA) 55.20				
 Bronze :Cristieana Cojocaru (ROU) 55.41				
4.  P.T. Usha (IND) 55.42				
5.  Ann-Louise Skoglund (SWE) 55.43				
730: StreeShakti Puraskar:As a measure of recognition of achievements of individual women in the field of social development, the Government of India has instituted six national awards which are to be called Stree Shakti Puraskar. These awards are in the name of the following eminent women personalities in the Indian history who are famous for their personal courage and integrity:-				
Devi Ahilya Bai Holkar				
Kanngi				
Mata Jijabai				
Rani Gaindenlou Zehang				
Rani lakshmi Bai				
Rani Rudramma Devi(For Both men & women)				
731:Tiger as national animal:				
India,Bangladesh,Myanmar,Malayasia,South Korea, Vietnam				
732:INDIA: 				
India Royal Bengal Tiger (national animal)  				
Indian Peacock (national bird)  				
King Cobra (national reptile)  				
Gray Langur (national icon)  				
River Dolphin (national aquatic animal)  				
Indian Elephant (national heritage animal)				
733:Books by Shasi tharoor:				
The Great Indian Novel (1989				
The Five Dollar Smile and Other Stories (1990)				
Show Business (1992)				
Riot (2001)				
Reasons of State (1982) India: From Midnight to the Millennium (1997)				
Nehru: The Invention of India (2003)				
Bookless in Baghdad (2005)				
The Elephant, the Tiger, and the Cell Phone:				
Shadows Across the Playing Field: Sixty Years of India-Pakistan Cricket (2009)(along with Shaharyar Khan)[72]				
Illustrated booksKerala: God’s own country (2002) (along with artist M.F. Husain)				
L'Inde (French) and India (English) (2008)				
 734: Doubly landlocked countryA  landlocked country surrounded only by other landlocked countries may be called a "doubly landlocked" country. A person in such a country has to cross at least two borders to reach a coastline.				
Liechtenstein in Central Europe surrounded by Switzerland and Austria.				
 Uzbekistan in Central Asia surrounded by Afghanistan, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Tajikistan, and Turkmenistan.				
There were no doubly landlocked countries in the world from the Unification of Germany in 1871 until the end of World War I. This is because Uzbekistan was part of the Russian Empire, and thus part of a country that was not landlocked; while Liechtenstein bordered Austria-Hungary, a country which had an Adriatic coast until it was dissolved in 1918. Upon the dissolution of Austria-Hungary Liechtenstein became a doubly landlocked country. There were again no doubly landlocked countries from 1938 until the end of World War II, as Nazi Germany had incorporated Austria, which meant that Liechtenstein bordered a country with a coast. After World War II Austria regained its independence and Liechtenstein became doubly landlocked once more. Upon the dissolution of the Soviet Union, Uzbekistan became the second doubly landlocked country.				
735: Landlocked by a single country There are only three countries that are landlocked by a single country – that is they are surrounded on all sides by just one country. Such a country is also called an enclave.				
 Lesotho, an enclave in South Africa.				
 San Marino, an enclave in Italy.				
 Vatican City, an enclave in the city of Rome, Italy.				
736: Landlocked by two countries There are seven landlocked countries that are surrounded by only two mutually-bordering neighbors:				
 Andorra (between France and Spain)				
 Bhutan (between India and China)				
 Liechtenstein (one of the "doubly landlocked" countries, between Switzerland and Austria)				
 Moldova (between Romania and Ukraine)				
 Mongolia (between Russia and China)				
 Nepal (between India and China)				
 Swaziland (between South Africa and Mozambique)				
737: Jana Gana Mana: The purely indigenous song, which has enchanted and has been saluted by billions of people for the last 100 years, was first sung on the second day of the annual conference of the Indian National Congress in Calcutta on December 27, 1911. Sarala Devi Chowdhurani — Tagore's niece — intoned the song, along with a few schoolstudents, in front of the gathering of the then INC president Bishan Narayan Dar and other leaders such as Bupendra Nath Bose and Ambika Charan Mazumder.				
738: Sqn Ldr Rakesh Sharma was awarded the Ashoka Chakra, for the sucessful completion of the Space Mission. As were his companions on the Soyuz T-11 Mission, Col Yuri Vasilevish Malyzhev and Col Gennady Mikhailovich Strekalov, both Russians and the first and the only time, the Ashoka Chakra was awarded to foreigners				
739: The Varuna naval exercises are annual naval cooperation drills between the French Navy and the Indian Navy. The two navies usually meet in the Indian Ocean and coordinate efforts on  				
 everything from minesweeping to anti-submarine warfare. France and India began Varuna in 2001 and have carried out eight bilateral exercises since, the latest one occurring from late March to early April in 2006.				
740: INDRA is a joint, bi-annual military exercise conducted by India and Russia starting in 2003. The exercise is tasked with boosting coperation and interoperability between the Russian and Indian navies. The word INDRA is a portmanteau of the participants' respective  countries.                                                                                                                                                         				
741: Tropex 2010 was held, with the Western and Eastern fleets taking part along with elements from the airforce.				
Recently, Indian Navy carried out a Joint Naval exercise with Sri Lanka Navy codenamed SLINEX-II from 19 to 24 September 2011.				
MILAN:Once in two years navies from the Indian Ocean region meet at the Andaman and Nicobar Islands and the event is named as Milan. MILAN included a passage exercise in 2010				
742: Naval exercises :				
Some such exercises take place annually like the Varuna with the French Navy, Konkan with the Royal Navy, Indra with Russian Navy, Malabar with the U.S. Navy, Simbex with the Republic of Singapore Navy and IBSAMAR with the Brazil and South African navies.				
743: International fleet reviews: The Indian Navy also conducted an International fleet review named Bridges of Friendship in February 2001 in Mumbai. Many ships of friendly Navies from all around the world participated, including two from the U.S.				
744:Leander Paes: was defeated by Brazil’s Fernando Meligeni in 1992 Barcelona Olympics				
745: In May 2008, Pistorius(double amputee taking part in Olympic 2012) made the "2008 TIME 100" – Time magazine's annual list of the world's most influential people – appearing third in the "Heroes & Pioneers".				
746:. Erik Weihenmayer, the first blind person to climb Mount Everest				
747: Acting President B.D. Jatti administered the oath of office to Prime Minister Morarji Desai at the Rashtrapati Bhavan in New Delhi on March 24, 1977. Desai resigned in July 1979 because his Janata Party lost its parliamentary majority.				
748: In 1903, Dr. Graham received his first public award, the Kaiser-i-Hind Medal, awarded to him by the Government.				
749: Saheb of Jasdan (Gujrat)was awarded the Kaiser-i-Hind Gold Medal in 1900				
        Sir Rajagopala Krishna Yachendra kaiseri-hind in 1900				
        Maharaja Rameshwar Singh Bahadur Kaiser-i-hind in 1900				
750: Hornbill Festival of Nagaland   				
Hornbill Festival was launched by the Government of Nagaland in December 2000 to encourage inter-tribal interaction and to promote cultural heritage of the state. Organized by the State Tourism and Art & Culture Departments, Hornbill Festival showcases a mélange of cultural displays under one roof. This festival takes place between the 1st and the 7th of December every year				
751: The Olympic triathlon contains three components; a 1.5 km (0.93 mi) swim, 43 km (27 mi) cycle, and a 10 km (6.2 mi) run.				
752: The Vice President also serves as the ex-officio chairman of Rajya Sabha (Council of States). Thus, apart from holding the executive position of successor to the President, the Vice President also serves the legislative role of Chairman of the Rajya Sabha. This unique duality is not shared by any other Commonwealth Country, and was borrowed from the Constitution of the United States.				
753: Yuyutsu in the Hindu epic Mahabharata was a son of Dhritrashtra with a Vaishya woman named Sauvali. He was younger than Duryodhana and elder than the rest of the ninety-nine Kuru brothers and Dushala.				
754:Abhimanyu’s Death: The Kaurava forces team up and kill a defenseless Abhimanyu, who famously uses the wheel of a broken chariot to fend of attackers in lieu of his weapons. The final blow was struck by the son of Dushasana, Durmashana. This was the only way by which Abhimanyu could attain Moksha.				
755: Yogeshawar Dutt clinched a bronze medal at the Olympic Games after beating North Korea's Jong Myong Ri 3-1 in the 60kg freestyle play-off for the medal at the ExCel arena in London on Saturday.The Indian grappler, who narrowly missed the bronze at the Beijing Games, had to fight five bouts in a single day to get on the podium. His lone defeat was against reigning World champion Besik Kudukhov of Russia in the pre-quarters.				
756: The building of the 96 kilometers (60 mi) Kalka Shimla Railway link commenced in 1898 to open up the remote hill regions to the rest of the country and was inaugurated by the British Viceroy Lord Curzon in November 1903.				
757: The Bridge on the River Kwai is a 1957 British World War II film by David Lean based on the novel The Bridge over the River Kwai by French writer Pierre Boulle. The film is a work of fiction but borrows the construction of the Burma Railway in 1942–43 for its historical setting. It stars William Holden, Alec Guinness, Jack Hawkins, and Sessue Hayakawa. The scene creation of the film was done in Sri Lanka and many of them were at Kitulgala on Kelani river area including the bridge explosion.				
758:ISI(Inter Services Intelligence) : The ISI was the brainchild of Australian-born British Army officer, Major General R. Cawthome, then Deputy Chief of Staff in the Pakistan Army.				
759: Fernando José Torres Sanz nicknamed El Niño (The Kid in Spanish), Spanish footballer who plays as a striker for Chelsea and the Spain national team.				
760: Author Jonathan Swift made reference to the moons of Mars, about 150 years before their actual discovery by Asaph Hall, detailing reasonably accurate descriptions of their orbits, in the 19th chapter of his novel Gulliver's Travels.				
761: "18 June Road", in Panjim, Goa is named after Rammanohar Lohia. It was that date in 1946 where he launched an agitation against colonial rule.				
762: CEAT Limited is a tyre manufacturing company based in Mumbai, India. CEAT is an abbreviation for Cavi Elettrici e Affini Torino (Electrical Cables and Allied Products of Turin). Founded in Italy as CEAT Tyres by Virginio Bruni Tedeschi, the company established its manufacturing in India in 1958 and was sold to Pirelli by Virginio's heir Alberto Tedeschi (Carla Bruni's grandfather) in the 1970s. The company's Indian division was then taken over by RPG Enterprises in the year 1982 which also got the rights to the CEAT brand and renamed the company as CEAT Limited. Its tagline is "Take it on".				
763: Major Dhyan Chand National Stadium commonly known by its former name, National Stadium is a field hockey stadium at New Delhi, India. It originally held 25,000 people. It is named after former Indian field hockey player, Dhyan Chand. It served as the venue for the 1st Asian Games in 1951.				
Indian athletes at the first AsiadThe stadium was built in 1933 as a gift for Delhi from the Maharaja of Bhavnagar, it was originally multipurpose stadium and named the Irwin Amphitheatre. It was designed by Anthony S. DeMillo and opened by Lord Willingdon. It was renamed National Stadium before the 1951 Asian Games, Dhyan Chand's name was added in 2002				
764: 1960 Olympic 400mtrs race(Milkha Singh 4th)				
GOLD Otis Davis, USA 45.07				
SILVER Carl Kaufmann, GER 45.08				
BRONZE Malcolm Spence, RSA 45.60				
765: Rohitashwa was the son of Harishchandra. He founded the town of Rohtas Garh in Rohtas district, Bihar.				
766: Sir Surendranath Banerjee. He founded the Indian National Association, one of the earliest Indian political organizations, and later became a senior leader of the Indian National Congress. He was also known by the sobriquet, Rashtraguru (the teacher of the nation).				
767: Film: Badla (1974)				
Dialogues: Jagdish Kanwal.SHATRUGHNA’s Khamosh 				
768: Malviya Ji popularised the slogan Satyameva Jayate (Truth alone will triumph) he was also addressed as 'Mahamana'.				
769: The third umpire was conceptualized by former Sri Lankan Test cricketer, and current cricket writer Mahinda Wijesinghe .and debuted in Test cricket in 1992 at Kingsmead, Durban for the South Africa vs. India series. Karl Liebenberg and Cyril Mitchley were TV umpires in this match. Sachin Tendulkar became the first batsman to be dismissed (run out) by using television replays in the second day of the Test.				
770: James Hardy of the University of Mississippi performed the first human lung transplant in 1963.				
771: The first kidney transplants between living patients were undertaken in 1954 in Boston and Paris. The Boston transplantation, performed on December 23, 1954, at Brigham Hospital was performed by Joseph Murray, J. Hartwell Harrison, John P. Merrill and others. The procedure was done between identical twins to eliminate any problems of an immune reaction. For this and later work, Dr. Murray received the Nobel Prize for Medicine in 1990				
772: Dr. John P. Merrill (left) explains the workings of a then-new machine called an artificial kidney to Richard Herrick (middle) and his brother Ronald (right). The Herrick twin brothers were the subjects of the world's first successful kidney transplant, Ronald being the donor				
773:General Frank Messervy(Pakistan’s first COAS), has been criticised for collusion as Commander-in-Chief of Pakistan's Army, with the clandestine Pakistani invasion of Jammu and Kashmir in 1947 codenamed Operation Gulmarg and for not informing Mountbatten or Lockhart				
774: Khuda se mannath hai meri (Kashmiri song) - KEERTHI_CHAKRA - Kailash Kher - Lyrics & Music .. Sajath, Farhad .				
775:Kala Pahad: After the defeat in the Battle of Tribeni, Sulaiman Karrani was forced to make peace. He realized that he would never be able to conquer Bhurishrestha unless he could defeat Rajiv Lochan Ray in the battlefield, which was next to impossible. So he invited him to his palace and trapped him into a love affair with his daughter. He offered Rajiv Lochan Ray to convert to Islam to which he offered to convert his daughter to Hinduism and marry her.However, King Gajapati Mukunda Deva was opposed to such a matrimonial alliance and wrongly decreed that conversion to Hinduism was illegal. Enraged, Rajiv Lochan Ray converted and married Karrani's daughter taking the name of Kalapahad (Black Hill - the destroyer). He led Karrani's revenge over Mukundadeva and attacked Orissa.				
776:List of members of Interim Govt.1946-47				
Portfolio	Minister			
Vice-President of the Executive Council	Jawaharlal Nehru			
External Affairs and Commonwealth Relations				
Home Affairs	Vallabhbhai Patel			
Information and Broadcasting				
Defence	Baldev Singh			
Industries and Supplies	John Mathai			
Education	C. Rajagopalachari			
Works, Mines and Power	C.H. Bhabha			
Food and Agriculture	Rajendra Prasad			
Railways and Transport	Asaf Ali			
Labour	Jagjivan Ram			
Finance	Liaquat Ali Khan			
Commerce	Ibrahim Ismail Chundrigar			
Health	Ghazanfar Ali Khan			
Posts and Air	Abdur Rab Nishtar			
Law	Jogendra Nath Mandal			
777: 15th August:				
1519 – Panama City, Panama, is founded.				
1537 – Asunción, Paraguay, is founded.				
1540 – Arequipa, Peru, is founded				
1914 – The Panama Canal opens to traffic with the transit of the cargo ship SS Ancon				
1944 – World War II: Operation Dragoon – Allied forces land in southern France.				
1945 – World War II: Japan surrenders to end the war.				
1947 – India gains Independence from the British Indian Empire and joins the Commonwealth				
1948 – The Republic of Korea is established south of the 38th parallel north.				
1971- Bahrain gains independence from Britain.				
1960 – Republic of the Congo (Brazzaville) becomes independent from France				
1975 – Bangladesh's founder Sheikh Mujibur Rahman is killed along with most members of his family during a military coup				
778: 26th.January:				
Australia Day (Australia)				
Duarte Day (Dominican Republic)				
Liberation Day (Uganda)				
Republic Day (India)				
779: Today, only three independent, sovereign city-states exist: Monaco, Singapore, and Vatican City				
780:Jagjivan Ram: The first indigenously built electric locomotive to have been built in India, a WAM-1 model, was named after him, which was recently restored by the Eastern Railway				
781: Ministry of HRD constituted w.e.f. 26th September, 1985				
 Shri K.C. Pant 31.12.1984 25.09.1985  :The last minister of Education				
Shri P.V. Narasimha Rao 25.09.1985 25.06.1988:The first minister of HRD				
782: Rugmark is a network of non-profit organizations dedicated to ending illegal child labour in the rug making industry. Founded in 1994 by children's rights activist Kailash Satyarthi.it provides a certification program that allows companies that pass inspection to attach a logo certifying that their product is made without child labour.				
783:Godavari River: Since the Ganga was brought down to Triambakeshwar by Sage Gautama, it is known here as Gautami. It is also known as Godavari because the river helped Sage Gautama to relieve his sins.Coringa mangrove forests in the Godavari delta are the second largest mangrove formation in the country. Part of this has been declared as the Coringa Wildlife Sanctuary, renowned for reptiles. They also provide an important habitat to a wide variety of fish and crustaceans.				
784: The Maastricht Treaty (formally, the Treaty on European Union or TEU) was signed on 7 February 1992 by the members of the European Community in Maastricht, Netherlands. On 9–10 December 1991, the same city hosted the European Council which drafted the treaty. Upon its entry into force on 1 November 1993 during the Delors Commission, it created the European Union and led to the creation of the single European currency, the euro. The Maastricht Treaty has been amended by the treaties of Amsterdam, Nice and Lisbon. See also Treaties of the European Union.				
785: Ronaldo Ross:He initially called Anopheles dapple-wings.He was able to find the malaria parasite in a mosquito that he artificially fed on a malaria patient named Hussain Khan.				
In 1902, Ross was awarded the Nobel Prize in Medicine for his remarkable work on malaria. His Indian assistant Kishori Mohan Bandyopadhyay was awarded a gold medal				
787: 1868-1904 -- Jamsetji Nusserwanji Tata laid the foundation of what would grow to become the Tata group. He trained in England and established a trading company and textile mills in India. He set up The Indian Hotels Company and built the Taj Mahal Palace and Tower, India's first luxury hotel, which opened in 1903.He also established the JN Tata Endowment to encourage Indian scholars to take up higher studies. It was the first of many philanthropic trusts by the Tata Group, which today control 65.8 per cent of the shares of Tata Sons, the group's holding company. 1904-1932 -- Sir Dorab Tata established the Tata Iron and Steel Company (now Tata Steel). In 1907, he set up its first office overseas, Tata Ltd in London. He built the Tata Oil Mills Company to make soaps, detergents and cooking oils, which was sold in 1984 to the company now called Hindustan Unilever.                                                                                                                                 1932-1938 -- Sir Nowroji Saklatwala, Jamsetji's sister's son. Died of a heart attack after a brief stint at the top.                                                                                                                                                                1932-1991 -- Jehangir Ratanji Dadabhoy Tata. Known as JRD, he was the longest-serving chairman of the group. In 1932, he founded Tata Aviation Service (now state-owned Air India). Also founded Tata Chemicals (1939), Tata Motors and Tata Industries (both 1945), Voltas (1954), Tata Tea (1962), Tata Consultancy Services (1968) and Titan Industries (1984)                                           				
788: Main Jat Yamla Pagla Deewana - Pratigya (1975) Dharmendra, Hema, Malini, Ajit Music Laxmikant-Pyarelal Lyrics Anand Bakshi Sing By Mohammad Rafi.                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                          789: First doctor to get Padma Bibhusan: 1963 A. Lakshmanaswami Mudaliar  – (1887 – 1974) Medicine .				
790 : First Armed forces officer to get Padma bibhusan:   1965 Arjan Singh – b. 1919 Military Service                                                                                                                                                                                           1965 Joyanto Nath Chaudhuri  – 1908 – 1983 Military Service                                                                                                                                                           91:First doctor to get Padma Bhusan:  Muthulakshmi Reddi Medicine                                                                                                                                                                            792: The Census Commissioners from 1881 Census to 1941 Census and thereafter Registrar General and Census Commissioner, India from 1949 onwards are shown below:     1881   Mr. W. W. Plowden          1949 - Mr. M W M Yeatts(both as census commissoner and Registrar general and Commissioner)                                                                                                    1949 - 1953   Mr. R. A. Gopalaswami(first Indian)     2009 - present Dr. C. Chandramouli                                                                                                           793:Sholay: The bike used was a 350 c.c Ariel twin port bearing registration number MYB 3047                                                                                                            794: The India House in Aldwych was set up as a building for the offices of the Indian High Commissioner and Embassy and should not be confused with the hostel in Highgate. The building was conceived by Sir Atul Chatterjee, the first High Commissioner for India in London, and Herbert Baker. It was designed by Herbert Baker and Gilbert Scott. The building was completed in 1930 and opened by King George V with a solid gold key.  After independence in 1947, the building was transferred to the Indian Government. The first High Commissioner to preside in it was V. K. Krishna Menon.                                                                                                                         795: Chemeen:Produced by Babu Ismail Settu under the banner of Kanmani Films, it features cinematography by Marcus Bartley, and editing by Hrishikesh Mukherjee and K. D. George. Songs are set to music by Salil Chowdhury, with lyrics by Vayalar, and featuring the voices of K. J. Yesudas, P. Leela, Manna Dey and Santha P. Nair.                                                                                                                                                                                                              796: Major General Amarjeet Singh :Amitabh Bachchan (AbTumhare Hawale Watan Saathiyo)                                                                                                                                                          Amitabh Bachchan as Col. Suryaveer "Surya" Singh in (Ek Ajnabee)                                                    Amitabh Bachchan as Colonel Balbir Singh Sodhi and Dadabhai/Devraj Hathoda in (Kohram) Amitabh Bachchan as Maj. Jasbir Singh Rana                                                                                                                                     797: Kalki Avtar:Kalachakra tantra was first taught by the Buddha to King Indrabhuti, the first dharmaraja of Shambhala. It is widely believed that the next Hindu Avatar known as Kalki will take birth at Sambalpur or Shambhala as this place was known in olden times.                                                                                                                                   798: Jai Hind :The term was coined by Chempakaraman Pillai, of Indian Independence Movement and Hindu-German_Conspiracy. It has since captured the imagination of Indians and has been immortalized by Subhas Chandra Bose as the battle cry of the Indian National Army (Azad Hind Fauj).                                                                                                                                             799: Pero da Covilha He was a Portuguese diplomat and explorer. He reached India 10 years before Vasco da Gama did in 1498. Pero da Covilha was sent by King John II of Portugal on a mission of exploration in the Near East and adjoining regions of Asia and Africa. The expedition started at Santarem on 7th May 1487. He reached Calicut (modern Kozhikode) in November 1488. After completing his mission of the European trade with India, Covilha sailed back in February 1489.                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                        800:Olympic 2012: HOCKEY				
Germany won the men's tournament for the fourth time, and the women's tournament was won by the Netherlands — their third Olympic women's hockey title.				
FOOTBALL:				
Champions  Mexico (men)				
 United States (women) Runners-up  Brazil (men) Japan (women)				
Third place  South Korea (men)				
 Canada (women)				
801:Olympic 2012 Volleyball:				
      Men: Russia- Gold				
               Brazil- Silver				
               Italy- Bronze				
     Women:Brazil-Gold				
                  USA- Silver				
                  Japan- Bronze				
802: February:Historical names for February include the Old English terms Solmonath (mud month) and Kale-monath (named for cabbage) as well as Charlemagne's designation Hornung. In Finnish, the month is called helmikuu, meaning "month of the pearl"; when snow melts on tree branches, it forms droplets, and as these freeze again, they are like pearls of ice.				
803: The month May was named for the Greek goddess Maia, who was identified with the Roman era goddess of fertility, Bona Dea, whose festival was held in May.				
804: Gulliver’s travels:				
 Part I: A Voyage to Lilliput				
 Part II: A Voyage to Brobdingnag				
 Part III: A Voyage to Laputa, Balnibarbi, Luggnagg, Glubbdubdrib, and Japan				
 Part IV: A Voyage to the Country of the Houyhnhnms				
805: Chupke chupke:This film is one of two released in 1975 to cast Dharmendra and Amitabh together, the other being Sholay. Apart from these, Ram Balram was the only other film that the two starred in together, if one does not count Dharmendra's guest appearances in Andha Kanoon and Naseeb, and Amitabh's cameo in Guddi and Dost.				
806: Harry Houdini (born Erik Weisz, later Ehrich Weiss or Harry Weiss; March 24, 1874 – October 31, 1926) was a Budapest-born, American stunt performer, noted for his sensational escape acts. He first attracted notice as "Harry Handcuff Houdini" on a tour of Europe, where he sensationally challenged different police forces to try to keep him locked up.				
807: Ravinder Kaushik(Black Tiger) was recruited by RAW and was given extensive training in Delhi for two years. Sunnat (circumcision) was performed on him to show him as a Muslim. In 1975 he was sent to Pakistan and given the name Nabi Ahmed Shakir. He successed in getting admission in Karachi University and completed his LLB. He joined Pakistan Army and become a commissioned officer and later was promoted to the rank of a Major. He married a local girl Amanat, and became father of a girl. From 1979 to 1983, while in military service, he passed on valuable information to RAW which was of great help to the Indian defence forces.He was given the title of 'Black Tiger' by India's then home minister S.B. Chavan.				
808: Watermelon (Citrullus lanatus (Thunb.), family Cucurbitaceae) is a vine-like (scrambler and trailer) flowering plant originally from southern Africa. Its fruit, which is also called watermelon, is a special kind referred to by botanists as a pepo, a berry which has a thick rind (exocarp) and fleshy center (mesocarp and endocarp).				
809:Vinod Rai, the Comptroller and Auditor General of India, is another person who turned fortunes of the city by building Sakthan Thampuran(Ram Verma) Nagar (S.T.Nagar) when he was collector of Thrissur district. He is also known as the second Sakthan Thampuran of Thrissur by shifting the Municipal Stand near the M.O. Road to Shaktan Thampuran Nagar, now known as Shaktan Thampuran Private Bus Stand, Thrissur.				
810: Thrissur Pooram is called 'thee pooram of all poorams' (festival). UNESCO adjudged Thrissur Pooram as “the most spectacular festival event on the planet.				
811: Idukki has become India’s first district to officially pledge to stamp out corporal punishment. in schools, which thrives across the country despite being banned in some states.				
812: Members of the Dongria Kondh tribe gather on top of the Niyamgiri mountain,(Rayagarha District) which they worship as their living god, to protest against plans by Vedanta Resources to mine bauxite from that mountain.				
813: The unique hilly floral and faunal diversity of Koraput, presumed as the origin of rice, will soon be designated a Globally Important Agricultural Heritage System (GIAHS), on the lines of World Heritage Site, by Unesco.				
814: Operation Chequerboard In Feb 1986 the army nominated a new chief, General K. Sundarji, who was determined to press the decisions taken by General Krishna Rao. In addition, Sundarji sought government permission to conduct an exercise named Operation Chequerboard to see how quickly troops based in the Assam plains could take up their positions on the Sino-Indian .				
815: Operation Falcon  At the end of 1986, India granted statehood to Arunachal Pradesh, which is an area claimed by China but administered by India. The Chinese government proceeded to protest. But the military movements in Tawang, taken in conjunction with this political action were seen as a provocation by the Chinese. In early 1987 Beijing's tone became similar to that of 1962, and with the Indian Army refusing to stand down, Western diplomats predicted war.				
The Indian response to the Chinese buildup was Operation Falcon and involved movements across the Sino-Indian border. Mi-26 heavy lift helicopters were used to deploy Infantry fighting vehicles and tanks into North Sikkim in the east and Demchok in the west.				
816:Nomadic Elephant: Indian Army’s joint military exercise called ‘Nomadic Elephant’ with the Mongolian Army in the southern Indian state of Karnataka(Belgaon). The idea is to hone skills in counter-insurgency operations and increase synergy between the two armies. The drill will also focus especially on the needs of peacekeeping missions under the UN flag.				
817: 'Hand-in-Hand'  : The armies of the two countries last held counter insurgency and counter terrorism wargames codenamed 'Hand-in-Hand' in 2009 in Belgaum in India and prior to that in China in 2007.				
818: EKUVERIN 2012  :The fourth joint military training exercises between the Indian Army and the Maldives National Defence Force (MNDF) - EKUVERIN 2012 - is being held in Belgaum from November 12 to 25.				
819: DOSTI XI : Defence ties between India and Maldives have continued to expand and strengthen over the years. In April this year, both the countries, along with Sri Lanka, held joint Coast Guard/Naval exercises – DOSTI XI - off the coast of Male (Maldives) to strengthen the bonds of friendship and enhance mutual operational capability and cooperation in the region				
820: Military exercise 'Shoorveer', the biggest summer war game of Army's South-Western Command involving over 50,000 troops, culminated today in Hanumangarh district and nearby areas in Rajasthan. Spearheaded by Jaipur-based South Western Command of Indian Army- also known as the Sapta Shakti Command- the exercise involved army troops sharpening their battle skills in peak of summer.				
821: Exercise BOLD KURUKSHETRA” is held annually and underscores the warm and growing defence relationship between Singapore and India. Aside from joint exercises, the IA and SAF also interact regularly through visits, courses, seminars and other professional exchanges				
822: SENAHIYA:  Defence Minister of India, A.K. Antony opened Maldives National Defence Force (MNDF) hospital, SENAHIYA at Male in  2012 .                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                   823  Vijayee Bhava :Six-day Joint Exercise of the Indian Army & the Air Force, Vijayee Bhava began on 9 May 2011 in the deserts of Bikaner and Suratgarh.				
824: Russia and India’s joint INDRA-2012 anti-terror military exercises in the Siberian republic of Buryatia .The drills at the Burduny training range until Aug 16, the spokesman for Russia's Eastern Military District said.				
825: 'JIMEX 12' :The first bilateral maritime exercise between India and Japan kickstarts in june 2012 off Tokyo.Titled 'JIMEX 12' (Japan India Maritime Exercise), the manoeuvre will witness the participation of two destroyers; one maritime patrol aircraft and a helicopter from Japanese Maritime Self Defence Force (JMSDF), while the Indian Naval units participating are INS Rana, INS Shivalik, INS Karmukh and INS Shakti				
826: Viceregal Lodge, Delhi, where Viceroy Lord Hardinge stayed (1912–1931) now University of Delhi main building.				
827: 8888 Uprising : Coincident with Aung San Suu Kyi's return to Burma in 1988, the long-time military leader of Burma and head of the ruling party, General Ne Win, stepped down. Mass demonstrations for democracy followed that event on 8 August 1988 (8–8–88, a day seen as auspicious), which were violently suppressed in what came to be known as the 8888 Uprising. On 26 August 1988, she addressed half a million people at a mass rally in front of the Shwedagon Pagoda in the capital, calling for a democratic government.				
828: Vijay Kumar won  silver medal in the individual 25 metre rapid fire pistol event at the 2012 Summer Olympics. Kumar hails from Barsar village of Hamirpur district of Himachal Pradesh and is presently a serving Subedar Major in the Dogra Regiment (16th Battalion) Indian Army. Vijay Kumar is currently supported by the Olympic Gold Quest initiative. He has been posted at Army Marksmanship Unit (AMU) Mhow since 2003 where he is being coached by the Russian Pavel Smirnov.				
829: Olympic Gold Quest is a program of the Foundation of Sports And Games (founded in 2001), started by Indian sporting icons Geet Sethi and Prakash Padukone to identify and support Indian athletes with a proven track record and who have the potential to win Olympic gold medals. In 2010 Leander Paes and Viswanathan Anand also joined the Board of Directors. Viren Rasquinha, former India hockey captain, is the current COO of Olympic Gold Quest				
830: Children's Film Society, India :The concept of an exclusive cinema for India's children was mooted by its first Prime Minister Jawaharlal Nehru, and Children's Film Society, India (CFSI) was founded on 11 May 1955 with Hriday Nath Kunzru as its first president. The first film produced by CFSI was Jaldeep (1956), an adventure film directed by Kidar Sharma also starring Mala Sinha.				
The Chairperson of CFSI is selected for a duration of three years, and over the several notable personalities have remained Chairperson of CFSI including, Sai Paranjpye (twice), Nafisa Ali (2005–2008) and presently the position is held by actor-director, Nandita Das.				
831: Andrew Fitzgibbon VC (13 May 1845 – 7 March 1883), incorrectly cited as Arthur Fitzgibbon in the London Gazette, was possibly the youngest recipient of the Victoria Cross, the highest and most prestigious award for gallantry in the face of the enemy that can be awarded to British and Commonwealth forces. Fitzgibbon was born in Gujerat, India. He was fifteen years old, and a Hospital Apprentice in the Indian Medical Establishment, Indian Army, attached to the 67th Regiment (later The Royal Hampshire Regiment) during the Third China War when the following deed took place for which he was awarded the VC.On 21 August 1860 at the capture of the Northern of the Taku Forts, China, Hospital Apprentice Fitzgibbon accompanied a wing of the 67th Regiment when it took up a position within 500 yards of the fort. He then proceeded, under heavy fire, to attend a dhoolie-bearer, whose wound he had been directed to bind up, and while the regiment was advancing under the enemy's fire, he ran across the open ground to attend to another wounded man.				
832: Sir Cliff Richard, OBE (born Harry Rodger Webb, 14 October 1940, Lucknow, India) is a British pop singer, musician, performer, actor, and philanthropist. "Move It ,"Devil Woman" and "We Don't Talk Anymore”.				
833: Lucknow Residency : Nawab Asafuddaula started the construction of Lucknow Residency in the year 1775 AD for the British resident and also for his staff. This mission was completed by Nawab Saadat Ali Khan in 1800 AD. Later, it was used by the Chief Commissioner of Awadh. Few more buildings were added to the Residency as per the requirement. It is said that originally the site of the Residency belogned to Sheikhzadas. The Residency complex today consists of ruins of several buildings, each ruin has its own story to tell about the events of 1857. These are still there like Dr. Fayerer's house, Brigade mets,Sago's House,  Kanpur Battery, Redan Battery, Sikh Square, Anderson's Post, etc. During the tenure of John Bailley who became Resident of Lucknow during the beginning of 19th Centuary Nawab Saadat Ali Khan, got a Guard House built here and this was known as Bailley Guard Gate.				
834: Dinesh Reddy: Indian Hockey President(N0v.2012-)				
        Kovermann – Football coach				
835:First ICC President: Lord Cowdrey				
836: “Aaskash 2” or commercially called “Ubislate 7+” .Datawind is rolling out the device.				
837: Sagar Sandesh:    US and Indian Navies to organize INDIAEX 2012 – off the coast of mumbai				
838: The First Information Report (FIR) filed by Shri Nand Lal Mehta shows that the last words of Gandhi were Hey Raam				
Police Station : Tughlak Road District : Central				
FIR No. : 68     Date and hour of occurence :				
30.1.1948 / 5:45 P.M. Judge: Atma Charan				
839: The Ball of the Century, also referred to as the Gatting Ball or simply That Ball,is the name given to a cricket delivery bowled by Australia's Shane Warne to England's Mike Gatting. The event occurred on day two of the first Test of the 1993 Ashes series, which took place at Old Trafford, Manchester. With his first ball against England, in his first Ashes test, Warne produced a spectacular delivery that bowled Gatting. It became recognised as being of considerable significance in not just the context of the match or series, but in cricket in general, helping to revive leg spin bowling				
840: Parikshit entered the hut of a sage named Samika as he was thirsty. He found the sage in deep meditation. He bowed to him several times but as there was no response he took a dead snake and threw it around the sage's neck. Later when the sage's son, Sringin, heard of this incident he cursed the king to die of snake bite on the 7th day.				
841: Pandit Harishankar Brahmachari alias Azad made Jhansi his organisation's hub for some time. He used the forest of Orchha, situated 15 kilometres (9.3 mi) from Jhansi, as a site for shooting practice and, being an expert marksman, he trained other members of his group. Near the forest he built a hut near to a Hanuman Temple on the banks of the Satar River. He lived there under the alias of Pandit Harishankar Brahmachari for a long period, and started teaching children from the nearby village of Dhimarpura				
842: Ram Prasad Bismil  was also a patriotic poet and wrote in Hindi and Urdu using the pen names Ram, Agyat and Bismil. But, he became popular with the last name "Bismil" only.				
Bismil was one of the founder members of the revolutionary organisation Hindustan Republican Association. Bhagat Singh praised him as a great poet-writer of Urdu and Hindi, who had also translated the books Catherine from English and Bolshevikon Ki Kartoot from Bengali. Several inspiring patriotic verses are attributed to him. The famous poem "Sarfaroshi ki Tamanna" is also popularly attributed to him, although some progressive writers have remarked that 'Bismil' Azimabadi actually wrote the poem and Ram Prasad Bismil immortalized it.				
843: Ashfaq ullah Khan: wrote poems under the pen-names of 'Warsi' and 'Hasrat'				
844: Kakori train robbery:To give a fillip to their movement and buy arms and ammunition to carry out their activities, the revolutionaries organised a meeting on August 8, 1925 at Shahjahanpur. After a lot of deliberations it was decided to loot the government treasury carried in the 8-Down Saharanpur - Lucknow passenger train. On 9 August 1925, Ashfaqulla Khan and eight other revolutionaries looted the train under the leadership of Pandit Ram Prasad Bismil.         845:  1. Mercury is called "Buddh" (named after Lord Buddha)				
        2. Venus is called "Shukra" (named after Sage Shukracharya )				
        3. Mars is called "Mangal" (derived from sanskrit word Mangalam)				
        4. Jupiter is called "Brihaspati" (Brihaspati is the Indian God Of Learning)				
        5. Saturn is called "Shani" (Shani is the Son of the Sun God)				
        6. Sun is called "Surya" has been regarded as a planet for astrological purposes only.				
        7. Uranus is called "Arun" (Arun is the Indian God of Dawn)/ or Indra            				
        8. Neptune is called "Varun" (Varun is the Indian God of Water/Seas)				
846:Andaman & Nicober Islands: Tinmaittivu ("impure islands" in Tamil)				
The islands provided a temporary maritime base for ships of the Marathas in the 17th century. The legendary admiral Kanhoji Angre established naval supremacy with a base in the islands and is credited with attaching those islands to India.				
Danish settlers of the Danish East India Company arrived in the Nicobar Islands on 12 December 1755. On January 1, 1756, the Nicobar Islands were made a Danish colony, first named New Denmark, and later (December 1756) Frederick's Islands				
From 1 June 1778 to 1784, Austria mistakenly assumed that Denmark had abandoned its claims to the Nicobar islands and attempted to establish a colony on them, renaming them Theresia Islands.				
847:Baratang contains the only known examples of mud volcanoes in India. These mud volcanoes have erupted sporadically, with recent eruptions in 2005 believed to have been associated with the 2004 Indian Ocean earthquake. The previous major eruption recorded was on 18 February 2003. The locals call this mud volcano jalki				
847: Gitanjali is a collection of poems by the Bengali poet Rabindranath Tagore. The original Bengali collection of 157 poems was published on August 14, 1910. The English Gitanjali or Song Offerings is a collection of 103 English poems of Tagore's own English translations of his Bengali poems first published in November 1912 by the India Society of London. It contained translations of 53 poems from the original Bengali Gitanjali, as well as 50 other poems which were from his drama Achalayatan and eight other books of poetry - mainly Gitimalya (17 poems), Naivedya (15 poems) and Kheya (11 poems).				
848:K2: First Ascent: 31 July 1954:  Achille Compagnoni & Lino Lacedelli.				
849: Masherbrum (also known as K1) is located in the Gilgit Baltistan of Pakistan. At 7,821 metres (25,659 ft) it is the 22nd highest mountain in the world and the 9th highest in Pakistan. It was the first mapped peak in the Karakoram mountain range, hence its name.				
The meaning of the name "Masherbrum" is not entirely clear. It may come from mashadar (muzzle-loading gun) plus brum (mountain), from the resemblance of the double summit to an old muzzle-loader. It may also come from masha (queen or lady), giving "queen of peaks."				
850: Kanchanjenga:After several attempts the mountain was first climbed in 1955 by a British expedition lead by Charles Evans. The first ascent was by George Band and Joe Brown. On the following day Norman Hardie and Tony Streather. Ginette Harrison is first and ONLY woman to summit (5/18/98) Kangchenjunga to date. Wanda Rutkiewicz, who is regarded as the greatest women climber ever, died on Kangchenjunga on May 12 or 13th 1992.				
851: Narendra took the name of Swami Bibidishananda. Later he was given the name Vivekananda by Ajit Singh, the Maharaja of Khetri. In January 1899 the Baranagar Math was transferred to Belur in the Howrah district, now known as the Belur Math				
852: Kitayun :The Shahnama of Fardausi records swayamvar in pre-Islamic Iran, of one Kitayun, eldest daughter of the Emperor of Constantinople, selecting the Iranian Gushtasp. With a view to procure a husband for one of his daughters, the Emperor determines to hold a grand assembly of illustrious and wise men for her to see and select from. She does not find a suitable husband in the first assembly and a second one is held, where she places the crown on Gushtap's head. Gushtasp, also known as Vishtaspa, returns to Iran with his bride and is crowned King.				
853: Daruk :  Sri Krishna was well aware of Jarasandh's might and bravery. He was also convinced that it would not be easy to defeat Jarasandh. So, he remembered Daruk, his eternal charioteer and sought his help. Daruk appeared with a divine chariot named Sugriva-pushpak.				
854: Dasaratha’s original name was Nemi .He undertook to fight with Shambara to help his friend Indra. Shambara took ten different forms all sitting on chariots and attacked him from ten different directions. With a single chariot, Nemi efficiently fought and killed him. Afterwards he was known as Dasaratha-The ten-chariot man.				
855: The promise was given to Kaikeyi. She was with him in the chariot when he fought Shambhara. While fighting was in progress,  the wheel axle got loose. Kaikeyi tightened it by using her thumb and as a result Dasaratha was able to kill Shambhara. Pleased with his wife’s daring, he gave her two boons. But she made him promise to give her those boons at any time she wants.)				
856: Kaikesi also gave birth to a daughter, Meenakshi although later she was dubbed the infamous Shoorpanakha "winnow-like nails				
857: TRIJATA.daughter of Vibbhisana.She is also called Dharmajna				
858: AiSiika missile is dried blade of grass, which by invoking with hymns will become a projectile weapon. Rama uses on Kakasura. In Mahaa Bharata Ashvadhaama also uses this at the final stage of war, which Krishna nullifies.				
859: At the stroke of the midnight hour when India was granted freedom on 15 August 1947, it was Pandit Govind Malaviya who blew the conch three times to herald the coming of the new age and freedom for India.				
860: JARATKARU The sister of the serpent-king Vasuki who was married to a sage also named Jaratkaru. His body was originally huge, but he had reduced it to almost nothing by means of severe penances, and that is how he got his name. They had a son named Ashtik, who rescued the serpents when their race was under threat of extinction by King Janamejaya’s snake-sacrifice. 				
861: Yamaraj's buffalo named Paundrak. 				
862: Parikshit entered the hut of a sage named Samika as he was thirsty. He found the sage in deep meditation. He bowed to him several times but as there was no response he took a dead snake and threw it around the sage's neck. Later when the sage's son, Sringin, heard of this incident he cursed the king to die of snake bite on the 7th day				
863: Pranava:The conch shell in Durga's hand symbolizes the 'Pranava' or the mystic word 'Om', which indicates her holding on to God in the form of sound.				
864: Mount Arishta :After bidding adieu to Seetha, he ascends Mount Arishta and enlarges his body making himself ready to leap across the ocean.				
865: Arjuna used a divine weapon called Anjalika and cut the head of Karna,				
which immediately, fell on the ground.				
865: Simhika(Angara): is also referred to as Chayagrahini--the shadow seizer--because she could hold on to the shadow of a  flying creature and swallow it. Note that Rahu and Ketu, apart from being called " Simhika Putras, " are also called chaya grahas because they are shadowy				
866: Tarakasur (brother of Simhika)was a powerful asura and the son of Vajranaka in Hindu belief.. Kartikeya killed Tarakasur and his brothers Simhamukhan and Surapadman, who eventually became the mounts of Durga and Kartikeya.				
867:Santurodha(Sindhuratha) > Dushyanta > Bharat				
868: Pratipa  had three sons: Devapi, Santanu and Balhika. Santanu was also called 				
Mahabhisak. Vicitravirya, son of Santanu married Ambika and Ambalika. The mother of this princess was Kausalya.				
869:Puru > Sindhuratha > Dushyant > Bharat(Vitatha) >Brhatakasatra > Hasti(Hastinapur) 				
> Ajamidha > Rksa > Samvarana > Kuru (from him originated Kuru dynasty) > Jahnu > Pratipa > Santanu				
870: Gemini were the twin brothers Castor and Pollux in Greek mythology, also sometimes known as Iabal and Ivbal. 				
871: Capricon:The constellation is usually depicted as a goat with a fish's tail .One myth says that when the goat-god Pan was attacked by Typhoon, he dove into the Nile; the parts above the water remained a goat, but those under the water transformed into a fish."The symbol of the goat rising from the body of a fish represents with greatest propriety the mountainous buildings of Babylon rising out of its low and damp situation; the two horns of the goat being emblematic of the two towns, Nineveh and Babylon, the former built on the Tigris, the latter on the Euphrates; but both subjected to one sovereignty. 				
872: Midas Touch:Dionysus offered Midas his choice of whatever reward he wished for. Midas asked that whatever he might touch should be changed into gold.Midas found that when he touched his daughter, she turned to gold as well.Now, Midas hated the gift he had coveted. He prayed to Dionysus, begging to be delivered from starvation. Dionysus heard his prayer, and consented; telling Midas to wash in the river Pactolus. Then, what ever he put into the water would be reversed of the touch.				
873:1952 olympics(Helsinki) wrestling:				
Bantamweight (52 – 57 kg) Gold;Shohachi Ishii Japan (JPN)				
                                            Silver: Rashid Mamedbekov Soviet Union (URS)  				
                                             Bronze: Khashaba Dadasaheb Jadhav India (IND)				
874: Double trap Olympic shooting(2004 Athens Olympics)				
Gold:  Ahmed Al Maktoum   United Arab Emirates 				
 Silver:  Rajyavardhan Singh Rathore   India 				
 Bronze: Wang Zheng   China				
875: Norman Gilbert Pritchard (also known as Norman Trevor)				
Pritchard was born in Calcutta to George Petersen Pritchard and Helen Maynard Pritchard				
Pritchard was the first Indian athlete to participate in the Olympic Games. He was also the first athlete from India and first athlete representing an Asian nation to win an Olympic medal.He won two silver medals in the 1900 Summer Olympics in Paris. He came second in the 200 metres behind Walter Tewksbury of the United States and second in the 200 metres hurdles behind the legendary Alvin Kraenzlein of the United States.				
876: General VK Singh On 11 March 2011, Singh was inducted into the United States Army War College (Class of 2001 graduate) International Fellows Hall of Fame. He is the 33rd International Fellow and the first Indian Armed Forces officer to be inducted.				
877:First AVSM : Brigadier Naveen Chandra Rawlley: "He organized and set up the Haile Selassie I Military Academy at Harar (Ethiopia) and was its first commandant." 				
878:Gen. BM KAUL:  He was also the first ever recipient of the Param Vishisht Seva Medal instituted by the Indian government in 1960. For successfully completing the project 'Amar' which entailed the construction of 1,450 quarters for troops in Ambala				
879: Operation Flowers are Blooming’: India’s first military intervention in the Indian Ocean, first with INS Vindhyagiri helping to abort a coup in the Seychelles in 1986				
880: Varshneya:. Krishna belonged to this Vrishni branch of the Lunar race from whom he got the name Varshneya.				
881: Vishnurata: The chief priest Dhaumya predicts to King Yudhisthira after Parikshit's birth that he will be a great devotee of the Supreme Lord Vishnu, and since he was saved by Krishna, he will be known as Vishnurata ("One who is always protected by the Lord").				
882: Trinity was the code name of the first detonation of a nuclear device. This test was conducted by the United States Army on July 16, 1945 in the Jornada del Muerto desert about 35 miles (56 km) southeast of Socorro, New Mexico, at the new White Sands Proving Ground,. (The site is now the White Sands Missile Range.The date of the test is usually considered to be the beginning of the Atomic Age.				
883: First Lightning." At a remote test site at Semipalatinsk in Kazakhstan, the USSR successfully detonates its first atomic bomb, code name "First Lightning."				
884:MIKE: On November 1, 1952, the United States successfully detonated "Mike," the world's first hydrogen bomb, on the Elugelab Atoll in the Pacific Marshall Islands				
885: The Arctic Tern (Sterna paradisaea) is a seabird of the tern family Sternidae. This bird has a circumpolar breeding distribution covering the Arctic and sub-Arctic regions of Europe, Asia, and North America (as far south as Brittany and Massachusetts). The species is strongly migratory, seeing two summers each year as it migrates from its northern breeding grounds along a winding route to the oceans around Antarctica and back, a round trip of about 70,900 km (c. 44,300 miles) each year. 				
886: A painting from Padshahnama depicts Prince Aurangzeb facing a maddened war elephant named Sudhakar On 28 May 1633 Aurangzeb escaped death when a powerful war elephant stampeded through the Mughal Imperial encampment.He rode against the elephant and struck its trunk with a lance,and successfully defended himself from being crushed. Aurnagzeb's valor was appreciated by his father who conferred him with the title Bahadur (Brave) and had him weighed in gold and presented gifts worth  2 lakhs.				
887: Ajmer (1613–1616): Derived from Sanskrit meaning "Invincible Spine				
888: Muscat : Possibly meaning "hidden."				
889: Agra (1501–1540): Derived from Sanskrit Agrevaṇa or 'the border of the forest'. The name was first mentioned in the epic Mahabharata.				
890: His Majesty Firdaus Ashvani, (Shah Jahan’s posthumous title) was buried beside the Empress, the only asymmetrical work at the Taj.				
891: Hum Honge Kaamyab / Ek Din" : In India, renowned poet Girija Kumar Mathur composed its literal translation in Hindi "Hum Honge Kaamyab / Ek Din" which became a popular patriotic/spiritual song during the 1980s, particularly in schools.				
892:Bhishma’s Conch: Shashanka the name of Bhishma's conch				
893: Dowry of Bombay: Negotiations for the marriage began during the reign of King Charles I(with Catherine Braganza), were renewed immediately after the Restoration, and on 23 June 1661, in spite of Spanish opposition, the marriage contract was signed, England securing Tangier (Moroco in North Africa) and the Seven islands of Bombay (in India), with trading privileges in Brazil and the East Indies, religious and commercial freedom in Portugal and two million Portuguese crowns (about £300,000); while Portugal obtained military and naval support against Spain and liberty of worship for Catherine.				
894: Arjuna killed Karna using the Anjalika weapon to decapitate him.				
895: Arjuna used his most powerful weapon, Pashupatastra to slaughter Jayadratha				
896: Silk Route:The German terms "Seidenstraße" and "Seidenstraßen"- 'the Silk Road(s)' or 'Silk Route(s)' were coined by Ferdinand von Richthofen, who made seven expeditions to China from 1868 to 1872.				
897: Cassini–Huygens is a Flagship-class NASA-ESA-ASI robotic spacecraft sent to the Saturn system.It has studied the planet and its many natural satellites since arriving there in 2004, also observing Jupiter, the heliosphere, and testing the theory of relativity. Launched in 1997				
It launched on October 15, 1997 on a Titan IVB/Centaur and entered into orbit around Saturn on July 1, 2004, after an interplanetary voyage which included flybys of Earth, Venus, and Jupiter. On December 25, 2004, It reached Saturn's moon Titan on January 14, 2005, when it entered Titan's atmosphere and descended to the surface. This was the first landing ever accomplished in the outer Solar System.Found propylene.				
898: The three wise men who visited Jesus:Traditions identify a variety of different names for the Magi. In the Western Christian church they have been commonly known as:				
Melchior   a Persian scholar;				
Caspar     an Indian scholar;				
Balthazar  an Arabian scholar				
899: Tendulkar 50000 runs:Needing 26 runs on the day to achieve the feat, Tendulkar tucked one towards mid-wicket for a single off left-arm spinner Yannick Ottley(Trininad Tobago), in the Champions League T20 match between Mumbai Indians and Trinidad and Tobago.				
900:Polyandry examples:However, when questioned by Kunti to give an example of polyandry, Yudhisthira cites Gautam-clan Jatila (married to seven Saptarishis) and Hiranyaksha's sister Pracheti (married to ten brothers).				
901: The Pamir Mountains(Mount Meru): are a mountain range in Central Asia formed by the junction of the Himalayas with Tian Shan, Karakoram, Kunlun, and Hindu Kush ranges. They are among the world’s highest mountains, and since Victorian times, they have been known as the "Roof of the World", presumably a translation from Persian.				
"Onion Range" (after the wild onions growing in the region.They lie mostly in Gorno-Badakhshan province, Tajikistan and Badakshan Province, Afghanistan.				
902: The Ganges begins at the confluence of the Bhagirathi and Alaknanda rivers. The headwaters of the Alakananda are formed by snowmelt from such peaks as Nanda Devi, Trisul, and Kamet. The Bhagirathi rises at the foot of Gangotri Glacier, at Gaumukh, at an elevation of 3,892 m (12,769 ft.Although many small streams comprise the headwaters of the Ganges, the six longest and their five confluences are considered sacred.				
The six headstreams are the Alaknanda, Dhauliganga, Nandakini, Pindar, Mandakini, and Bhagirathi rivers. The five confluences, known as the Panch Prayag, are all along the Alaknanda. They are, in downstream order, Vishnuprayag, where the Dhauliganga joins the Alaknanda; Nandprayag, where the Nandakini joins; Karnaprayag, where the Pindar joins, Rudraprayag, where the Mandakini joins; and finally, Devprayag, where the Bhagirathi joins the Alaknanda to form the Ganges River proper.				
903: "Dulcinea del Toboso" (real name Aldonza Lorenzo) is a fictional character who is referred to (but does not appear) in Miguel de Cervantes' novel Don Quixote. Seeking the traditions of the knights-errant of old, Don Quixote finds a true love whom he calls Dulcinea.				
904: Sacrifice of Bulls: Neptune is one of the only three Roman gods to whom it was appropriate to sacrifice bulls, the other two being Apollo and Mars.				
905: Pedestrian Crossing:In the United Kingdom and parts of the Commonwealth of Nations, animal names are often used to distinguish several types of such crossings:				
Zebra crossing: wide longitudinal stripes on road, often with belisha beacons; pedestrians may   cross at any time; drivers must give way to pedestrians who demonstrate intent to cross.				
Pelican crossing: traffic lights for pedestrians and vehicles; button-operated.				
Puffin crossing: pedestrian lights on near side of road; button-operated with curb-side detector.				
Toucan crossing: for bicycles as well as pedestrians.				
Pegasus crossing: an equestrian crossing.				
Belisha beacons are found at zebra crossings. The other types of crossing use coloured pictogram lights, depending on the intended users of the crossing this will be a man, a bicycle or a horse.				
906: Curiosity.: In keeping with a 40-year tradition, a plaque with the signatures of President Barack Obama and Vice President Joe Biden was also installed. Elsewhere on the rover is the autograph of Clara Ma, the 12-year-old girl from Kansas who gave Curiosity its name in an essay contest, writing in part that "curiosity is the passion that drives us through our everyday lives.On August 6, 2013, Curiosity audibly played the "Happy Birthday" song in honor of the one Earth year mark of its Martian landing. This was the first time that a song was played on a foreign planet; making "Happy Birthday" the first song and Curiosity the first device used to play music on a foreign planet. This was also the first time music was transmitted between two planets.				
907: K2 first ascent: An Italian expedition finally succeeded in ascending to the summit of K2 via the Abruzzi Spur on 31 July 1954. The expedition was led by Ardito Desio, and the two climbers who reached the summit were Lino Lacedelli and Achille Compagnoni. The team included a Pakistani Colonel Muhammad Ata-ullah, who had been a part of the 1953 American expedition.				
908. Rihla or "The Journey :After returning home from his travels in 1354, and at the instigation of the Marinid ruler of Morocco, Abu Inan Faris, Ibn Battuta dictated an account of his journeys to Ibn Juzayy, a scholar whom he had previously met in Granada. The account is the only source for Ibn Battuta's adventures. However, it is often simply referred to as the Rihla or "The Journey”.				
909: Mandip Singh Soin :His mountaineering ascents include the first Indian ascent of Mount Meru in 1986 in the Himalayas as well as several ascents in the French and Swiss Alps, Italian Dolomites, Wales and Scotland.He also led the first crossing on camel back of the Indian Thar desert from Jaisalmer to the Rann of Kutch in 1986, and the first Elephant expedition in the jungles of Kerala in 1990.				
910: The Galapagos Penguin (Spheniscus mendiculus) is a penguin endemic to the Galapagos Islands. It is the only penguin that lives north of the equator in the wild. It can survive due to the cool temperatures resulting from the Humboldt Current and cool waters from great depths brought up by the Cromwell Current..				
911: The largest living species is the Emperor Penguin (Aptenodytes forsteri): on average adults are about 1.1 m (3 ft 7 in) tall and weigh 35 kg (75 lb) or more. The smallest penguin species is the Little Blue Penguin (Eudyptula minor), also known as the Fairy Penguin, which stands around 40 cm tall (16 in) and weighs 1 kg (2.2 lb).				
912: Niladri Vijay :In the coastal city of Puri in Odisha, main deity the rasgulla has been the traditional offering to the Hindu goddess, Lakshmi, the consort of the Puri temple's, Jagannath. In fact, it is an age-old custom inside the temple to offer rasgullas to Lakshmi in order to appease her wrath for being ignored, on the last day of the nine day long Rath Yatra (chariot festival). Only after the goddess has savored rasgullas, do the trinity of deities re-enter the temple precincts after their sojourn. Niladri Vijay, has traditionally marked the concluding of the festival every year.				
913: Adi Shankar’s Parents: Shivaguru and Ayamba lived in the village of Kaladi, in Kerala,				
914: Operation Saiyam  : Lt. Col. Vinod Bhat, commanding officer of the 202 Bomb Disposal Unit (BDU), told IANS about Operation Saiyam.The operation, which began in Ludhiana district Nov 10, involves the disposal of around 17,000 pieces of scrap ammunition of unknown origin which were imported by Punjab-based steel companies in 2004.				
915: Guerilla warfare : Shivaji established a competent and progressive civil rule with the help of a disciplined military and well-structured administrative organisations. He innovated military tactics, pioneering the guerilla warfare methods (Shiva sutra or ganimi kava), which leveraged strategic factors like geography, speed, and surprise and focused pinpoint attacks to defeat his larger and more powerful enemies.				
916: Battle of Sharagarhi: Gurmukh Singh, who communicated the battle with Col. Haughton, was the last Sikh defender. He is stated to have killed 20 Afghans, the Pashtuns having to set fire to the post to kill him. As he was dying he was said to have yelled repeatedly the Sikh battle-cry "Bole So Nihal, Sat Sri Akal" (Shout Aloud in Ecstasy! True is the Great Timeless One). "Akal," meaning Immortal, beyond death, the Supreme Creator God unbound by time and non-temporal.				
917: Bantony Estate:, located in the heart of the town, was the summer palace of the erstwhile Maharaja of Sirmaur.   The architect is said to be T.E.G. Cooper.Before its construction in 1880, the place had a rickety cottage belonging to Capt A. Gordon and housing some army officers.				
918. There  are three golf balls on the Moon (left by Apollo 14 astronaut Alan Shepard in 1971.)				
919. Three moons have yet been found to have their own moons: Saturn’s moon Titan, Jupiter’s Lo, and Neptune’s Triton.				
919 A:Falcon Capital of the world:Nagaland. Amur Falcons named as Naga, Wokha and Pangti.				
920: Voter Verifiable Paper Audit Trail system (VVPAT)The Government of Indian, via notification, dated 14 August 2013, has amended the Conduct of Elections Rules, 1961, enabling the Election Commission of India to use Voter Verifiable Paper Audit Trail system (VVPAT) with the Electronic Voting Machines.The Election Commission of India has decided to use the VVPAT system at the By-election for 51 Noksen Assembly Constituency of Nagaland.				
921. Wally A. Schirral was the only astronaut one of the Mercury 7 astronauts to fly in all three of NASA's 'Moon Shot' programs (Mercury, Gemini and Apollo)?				
Wally A. Schirral was the only man to fly in all three projects. Alan Shepard flew in Mercury and Apollo, but not in Gemini. Gus Grissom was involved in all three project, flying in Mercury and Gemini, but he was killed during a pre-flight simulation in his Apollo 1 capsule, so he never actually flew in the Apollo program.				
922: The Bombardment of Madras was an engagement of World War I, at Madras (Chennai), British India. Captain Karl von Müller in command, on the night of 22 September 1914, SMS Emden quietly approached the city of Madras on the southeastern coast of the Indian peninsula. After entering the Madras harbor area and observing for a moment, Müller gave the order to engage at 9:30 pm, Emden opened fire at 3000 yards on the several large oil tanks within the harbor which belonged to the Burmah Oil Company.				
923: President Richard Nixon had speechwriter William Safire prepare a condolence speech for delivery in the event that Armstrong and Aldrin became marooned on the Moon's surface and could not be rescued.				
924:Pakistan’s Space Pogramme:  Finally, in 1988, India exploded its second nuclear test (see: Pokhran-II) which invited Pakistan to follow the latter's step and performed its own atomic tests Chagai-I and Chagai-II).Pakistan pursued its research and development in space and astrophysics in 1961 after giving commission to its space program led by Space Research Commission (SUPARCO). Its unmanned flight test program achieved a great feat after launching its first rocket in orbit, Rehbar-I. Finally in 1990, Pakistan followed India's suit, and put its own and first artificial satellite, Badr-1, in Earth orbit. With the technical assistance from China, Pakistan launched its first geostationary satellite, Paksat-1R in 2011.  				
925:Pluto:-				
The dwarf planet Pluto is named for the ancient Roman god of the underworld. In Roman mythology, Pluto was the son of Saturn who, with his three brothers, controlled the world: Jupiter controlled the sky, Neptune controlled the sea, and Pluto ruled the underworld.				
.Pluto takes the longest time of the eight planets (248 Earth years) to orbit around the sun. Because it’s the  nearest to the sun, Mercury has the fastest orbit, at 88 Earth days. Earth takes 365 days to orbit the sun.				
.Pluto is the only known dwarf planet with an atmosphere.				
.It takes Pluto 6 days, 9 hours, and 17 minutes to spin once, making it the planet with the second-slowest rotation in the solar system. Venus has the slowest rotation, taking 243 days to spin just once. Jupiter is the fastest-spinning planet, rotating on average once in just less than 10 hours.a				
.Pluto spins in the opposite direction as Earth, which means the sun rises in the west and sets in the east. Only Venus, Uranus, and Pluto have a retrograde rotation.				
.In astrology, Pluto is associated with powers of creation/rebirth as well as destruction/death.				
..The sky is so dark on Pluto that a person would be able to see stars during the day.				
Pluto has four known moons: Charon (ferryman of Hades), Nix (the Greek goddess of night and darkness), Hydra (the nine-headed serpent who guards Hades) and S/2011 P 1, which was discovered in 2011.				
Pluto is the second-largest dwarf planet in the solar system,ERIS which is 27% larger than Pluto, is the first..Officially, Pluto’s name is now asteroid number 134340 after being downgraded from a planet to a dwarf planet. (Dwarf planets are one type of astronomical object catalogued as an asteroid.)				
926:Alcohol in Universe:     Sagittarius B is a vast molecular cloud of gas and dust floating near the centre of the Milky Way, 26,000 light-years from Earth, 463,000,000,000 kilometres in diameter and, amazingly, it contains 10-billion-billion-billion litres of alcohol. The vinyl alcohol in the cloud is far from the most flavoursome tipple in the universe.				
927:There’s a planet-sized diamond in Centaurus named after a Beatles song.				
Astronomers have discovered the largest known diamond in our galaxy, it’s a massive lump of crystallised diamond called BPM 37093, otherwise known as Lucy after The Beatles’ song Lucy in the Sky with Diamonds. Found 50 light-years away in the constellation of Centaurus, Lucy is about 25,000 miles across, so much larger then planet Earth, and weighs in at a massive 10 billion-trillion-trillion carats.				
928: The Peterhoff is a building in Shimla which has housed at least seven Viceroys and Governors General of India during the British Raj.Its first occupant was James Bruce, 8th Earl of Elgin, who moved into the building in 1863.				
After India's independence from the British Empire, the building served as the Punjab High Court. It was at Peterhoff where the trial of Nathuram Godse, who assassinated Mahatma Gandhi, took place in 1948-49. In 1971, when Himachal Pradesh became a full-fledged state, Peterhoff served as the Raj Bhavan (the Governor's residence).				
929: Nirad C. Choudhury: Pen names :Balahak Nandi, Sonibarer Cithi,Outsider, Now.				
930:Foundation stone of Parliament house was laid on 12 Feb. 1921 by Prince Arthur,Duke of Cannaught,third son of Queen Victoria.				
931: Trihayani : Since she has taken birth in three yugas (ages; a cycle of four ages is believed to repeat) – Vedavati in Satya yuga, Maya Sita in Treta Yuga and Draupadi in Dwapara yuga, she is known as Trihayani, the one who appears in the three ages.				
932:The Voyager 1 spacecraft is the most distant human-made object from Earth.				
In 1990, as part of the spacecraft’s ongoing mission, Voyager 1 turned its camera back on our home planet and took a picture. This became known as The Pale Blue Dot. Seen from 6 billion kilometres away, the Earth appears as a tiny blue speck in the depths of space. Astronomer Carl Sagan, who first suggested the idea of the photograph, noted, “From this distant vantage point, the Earth might not seem of any particular interest. But for us, it’s different. Consider again that dot. That’s here. That’s home. That’s us				
933: Goldilocks Planets:Scientists searching for extraterrestrial life focus on “Goldilocks Planets“; these are planets which fall into a star’s habitable zone. Planet Earth seems to have exactly the right conditions for life to exist – its distance from the Sun means the temperature is right, water can exist as a liquid solid and a gas, and there are the right combination of chemical compounds available to build complex life forms. Other planets thought to have similar features are known as Goldilocks planets.				
934:Robert Falcon Scott, CVO (6 June 1868 – c. 29 March 1912) was a Royal Navy officer and explorer who led two expeditions to the Antarctic regions: the Discovery Expedition, 1901–04, and the ill-fated Terra Nova Expedition, 1910–13. During this second venture, Scott led a party of five which reached the South Pole on 17 January 1912, only to find that they had been preceded by Roald Amundsen's Norwegian expedition. On their return journey, Scott and his four comrades all died from a combination of exhaustion, starvation and extreme cold.				
935:First time the word 'penguin' is used to describe the southern bird. (1586-1588). Occurred on the third circumnavigation of the world by Thomas Cavendish in the Desire.				
936:First to cross the Antarctic Circle. (January 17, 1773). Captain James Cook on his second voyage in the Resolution and Discovery. Crossed a total of three times during that voyage. In doing so, Cook was the first to circumnavigate Antarctica.				
937:Possibly the first to die in Antarctica, the Spanish officers, soldiers and seamen on board the San Telmo which sank in September 1819. There is a cairn commemorating this at Half Moon Beach, Cape Shirreff, Livingston Island, South Shetland Islands  				
938:First scientist to work in Antarctica. William H.B. Webster sailed aboard the Chanticleer to South Shetlands to make pendulum and magnetic observations. Entered Deception Island on January 9, 1829.				
939:First dog known to have been in the Antarctic. (1839). 'Sydney,' a dog picked up in Australia by Lt. Charles Wilkes of the United States Exploring Expedition.				
940:First Antarctic expedition to include women. (1947-1948). Ronne Antarctic Research expedition under Finn Ronne. Jennie Darlington and Edith (Jackie) Ronne wintered over.				
941:First Head of State to visit the Antarctic, Gabriel Gonzales Videla of Chile, in 1950.				
942:First recorded birth of any species at the South Pole. (March 14, 1961). Pandora the hamster gave birth to twins at South Pole Station.				
943:First human birth on Antarctic continent, Emilio Marcos de Palma born at Esperanza Station. (January 7, 1978).				
 944:First recorded wedding at the South Pole. (February 11, 1985). Patricia Manglicmot and Randall Chambers were married at South Pole station. (Thanks to Bill-Ace Baker via John Splettstoesser.)				
945:First women to reach the South Pole by land, Victoria E. Murden and Shirley Metz. (January 17, 1989).				
946: First ever to enter the Ross Sea. (January 9, 1841). Sir James Clark Ross in the ships Erebus and Terror.				
947:First ever fancy dress ball in Antarctica. (December 31, 1841). New Years Eve during Sir James Clark Ross's expedition.				
948:First fish caught below the Antarctic Circle. (February 1842). Landed on the Terror during Ross's expedition. The ship's cat found it and made a meal of it.				
949:First expedition to the Antarctic whose aims were solely scientific. (1872-1876). Challenger expedition,under Captain Sir George Nares and Wyville Thomson, sponsored by the Royal Society.				
950:First human earth burial in the Antarctic.(October 14, 1899).Nicolai Hansen buried above Cape Adare;grave was "dug"with dynamite.Southern Cross expedition under Carsten Borchgrevink.				
951:First sledge journey on Ross Ice Shelf. (February 16, 1900). Party sledged 10 miles to new 'Furthest South'. Southern Cross expedition under Carsten Borchgrevink.				
952:First balloon ascent in Antarctica. (February 4, 1902). Eva was name of balloon. British National Antarctic (Discovery) expedition under Robert F. Scott.				
953:First crops (mustard and cress) grown in the Antarctic. (October 1902). British National Antarctic expedition under Robert F. Scott in the Discovery.				
954:First harvest of first crops grown in the Antarctic. (November 1, 1902). British National Antarctic expedition under Robert F. Scott in the Discovery.				
955:First surgical operation performed in Antarctica. (October 18, 1903).Dr.Koettlitz removes cyst fromLt.Royds' cheek.British National Antarctic expedition under Robert F.Scott in Discovery.				
956:First permanent scientific station to be established in the Antarctic, at Laurie Island, south Orkneys. Scottish National Antarctic expedition under William Speirs Bruce in the Scotia.				
957: First automobile in Antarctica lowered onto ice. (February 1, 1908). British Antarctic expedition under Ernest H. Shackleton in the Nimrod.				
958:First evidence of coal found in Antarctica, discovered by Frank Wild. (December 17, 1908). British Antarctic expedition under Ernest H. Shackleton in the Nimrod.				
959:First book--Aurora Australis--produced (writen, edited, illustrated, printed, bound and issued) in the Antarctic. (Issued July 1908). British Antarctic expedition under Ernest H. Shackleton in the Nimrod.				
960:First soldier to join a British polar expedition, Captain L. E. G. Oates. (1910-1913). British Antarctic expedition under Robert F. Scott in the Terra Nova.  				
961:First Antarctic meteorite found, by Francis Bickerton, Leslie Whetter and A.J. Hodegman. (December 5, 1912). Australasian Antarctic expedition under Douglas Mawson.  				
962:First woman to set foot on the Antarctic mainland, Caroline Mikkelsen.(February 20, 1935).				
963:First women to reach the South Pole by land,Victoria E.Murden and Shirley Metz ,1989.				
964: Lakshmibai's  horses included Sarangi, Pavan and Badal; according to tradition she rode Badal when escaping from the fort in 1858.				
According to one legendary narrative, when Alexander the Great invaded India in 326 BCE, Roxana (or Roshanak, his wife) sent a sacred thread to Porus, asking him not to harm her husband in battle. In accordance with tradition, Porus, a Katoch king, gave full respect to the rakhi. On the battlefield, when Porus was about to deliver a final blow to Alexander, he saw the rakhi on his own wrist and restrained himself from attacking				
966:When Ganesha's sister Manasa celebrates the festival with him, his sons ask Ganesha to grant them a sister. Although Ganesha initially refuses, upon the repeated pleas of his two wives Riddhi and Siddhi, sons, sister and the divine sage Narada, Ganesha creates Santoshi Mata through  two flames rising from his wives' breasts. Narada decreed that this mind-born daughter of Ganesha will always fulfil everyone’s desires and thus, would be called Santoshi Maa, the Mother of Satisfaction.				
967:Angel fall:-  Jimmie Angel's aircraft, El Rio Caroní, exhibited in front of Ciudad Bolívar airport.Angel Falls (Spanish: Salto Ángel; Pemon language: Kerepakupai Vená, meaning "waterfall of the deepest place", or Parakupá Vená, meaning "the fall from the highest point") is a waterfall in Venezuela. It is the world's highest uninterrupted waterfall, with a height of 979 m (3,212 ft) and a plunge of 807 m (2,648 ft). The waterfall drops over the edge of the Auyantepui mountain in the Canaima National Park (Spanish: Parque Nacional Canaima), a UNESCO World Heritage site in the Gran Sabana region of Bolívar State. The height figure 979 m (3,212 ft) mostly consists of the main plunge but also includes about 400 m (0.25 mi) of sloped cascades and rapids below the drop and a 30-metre (98 ft) high plunge downstream of the talus rapids.				
The falls are on the Gauja River (alternatively known as the Kerep River or Kerepacupai), which flows into the Churun River, a tributary of the Carrao River.				
The     High   Court   at  Calcutta, formerly    known  as   the High Court of Judicature at Fort William, was brought into existence by the Letters Patent dated 14th May, 1862, issued under the High Court's Act, 1861, which provided that the jurisdiction and powers of the High Court were to be defined by Letters Patent. The High Court of Judicature at Fort William was formally opened  on 1st July, 1862, with Sir Barnes Peacock as its first  Chief    Justice.  Appointed   on   2nd   February, 1863, Justice Sumboo Nath Pandit was the first Indian to assume office as a Judge of the Calcutta High Court, followed by legal luminaries  such..j as Justice Dwarka Nath Mitter, Justice Ramesh Chandra Mitter, Sir Chunder Madhab Ghosh, Sir Gooroodas Banerji, Sir Ashutosh Mookerjee and Justice P.B. Chakravartti who was the first Indian to become a permanent Chief Justice of the Calcutta High Court.				
971:According to tradition the bayonet was developed in Bayonne, France, in the 17th century.  				
972:Achilles was the son of the mortal Peleus and the Nereid Thetis. He was the mightiest of the Greeks who fought in the Trojan War, and was the hero of Homer's Iliad.				
 Thetis attempted unsuccessfully to make her son immortal. There are two versions of the story. In the earlier version, Thetis anointed the infant with ambrosia and then placed him upon a fire to burn away his mortal portions; she was interrupted by Peleus, whereupon she abandoned both father and son in a rage. Peleus placed the child in the care of the Centaur Chiron, who raised and educated the boy. In the later version, she held the young Achilles by the heel and dipped him in the river Styx; everything the sacred waters touched became invulnerable, but the heel remained dry and therefore unprotected.				
972:Priam's son Paris (or Alexander), aided by Apollo, wounded Achilles in the heel with an arrow; Achilles died of the wound. After his death, it was decided to award Achilles' divinely-wrought armor to the bravest of the Greeks. Odysseus and Ajax competed for the prize, with each man making a speech explaining why he deserved the honor; Odysseus won, and Ajax then went mad and committed suicide.				
973:June 9, the birthday (National Daughter’s day)of late Smt. Nandini Satpathy, has been installed as National Daughters' Day- Nandini Diwas. Nandini and Diwas are two Sanskrit words which mean daughter and day, respectively.				
974:According to Śvētāmbara traditions, the embryo of Mahavira was transferred from a Brahmin woman, Devananda, to a Kshatriya woman, Trisala. This is described in the Acaranga and Kalpa Sūtras. In the Vyākhyāprajñapti, Mahavira acknowledges Devananda as his real mother.				
975:The Anoma is a river in southern Nepal, near Kapilavastu, where Prince Siddhartha renounced the world before becoming Gautama Buddha by cutting off his hair, abandoning his royal dress and exchanging it for the robes of an ascetic.				
976:. Horses also represented the sun because the horse was the avatar of the sun God, Surya, who was a form of Vishnu. Surya is said to have been drawn in a chariot pulled by seven red mares called Harrits. The horses names were: Bronte (thunder), Eos (day break), Ethiops (flashing), Ethon (fiery), Erythreios (red producer), Philogen (earth loving), and Pyrois (fiery).				
977: Vidura was the half-brother to the kings Dhritarashtra and Pandu of Hastinapura, born the son of the sage Vyasa and Sûdri, a lady-in-waiting to the queens Ambika and Ambalika of the city. By some accounts, he was an incarnation of the god of death and justice Yama Dharma Raja, who had been cursed by the sage Mandavoya .				
978:Yuyutsu (Sanskrit: युयुत्सू) in the Hindu epic Mahabharata was a son of Dhritrashtra with a Vaishya woman named Sukhada. The Mahabharatha cites the following other names for Yuyutsu: Dhartarstra, Dhrtarastraja, Dhrtarastraputra, Karana, Kauravya, and Vaisyaputra.				
979:Dhuljanah (Arabic: ذو الجناح‎) was the horse of Husayn ibn Ali. The original name of Dhuljanah was Murtajiz and Maymoon and the reason for it being named that way was because of its sound of neighing being sweet, furious and high making it different from other horses. It was purchased by the Prophet Muhammad from an Arab called Haris. It features prominently in the traditional narrating of the story of the Battle of Karbala and it is thought to have been a white stallion.				
 980:Adolph Hitler’s horse, Nordlicht, is buried in USA..				
 981:. Neptune is the coldest planet in the Solar System				
At the top of its clouds, temperatures on Neptune can dip down to 51.7 Kelvin, or -221.4 degrees Celsius. That’s cold! Pluto gets colder, but then, Pluto isn’t a planet any more.				
982:Neptune’s moon Triton is even colder				
There are many cold places in the Solar System, but one of the coldest is the surface of Neptune’s moon Triton. This is the largest of Neptune’s 13 moons, and the only one with enough mass and gravity to pull itself into a sphere. In fact, it’s the 7th largest moon in the Solar System. Temperatures on the surface of Triton can dip down to only 38 Kelvin or – 235 degrees Celsius. But even though it’s incredibly cold, the surface of Triton is very active.        				
983:. A day on Venus lasts longer than a year:				
It takes 243 Earth days to make rotate once on its axis. The planet’s orbit around the Sun takes 225 Earth days, compared to the Earth’s 365.				
984:Venus is the second brightest object in the night sky:				
Only the Moon is brighter. With a magnitude of between -3.8 to -4.6 Venus is so bright it can be seen during daytime on a clear day.				
Venus is also known as the Morning Star and the Evening Star:				
Early civilisations thought Venus was two different bodies, called Phosphorus and Hesperus by the Greeks, and Lucifer and Vesper by the Romans. This is because when its orbit around the Sun overtakes Earth’s orbit, it changes from being visible after sunset to being visible before sunrise. Mayan astronomers made detailed observations of Venus as early as 650 AD.				
Venus is the hottest planet in our solar system:				
The average surface temperature is 462 °C, and because Venus does not tilt on its axis, there is no seasonal variation. The dense atmosphere of around 96.5 percent carbon dioxide traps heat and causes a greenhouse effect.  				
985:Mars is home to the tallest mountain in the solar system.				
Olympus Mons, a shield volcano, is 21km high and 600km in diameter. Despite having formed over billions of years, evidence from volcanic lava flows is so recent many scientists believe it could still be active.				
986:First on Mars:, USSR’s Marsnik 1, was launched in1960. Europe’s Exobiology on Mars program (scheduled launch 2016) plans to: search for possible traces of Martian life; study the surface environment; map potential hazards to manned missions in the future and begin preparations for an eventual return flight.				
987:Mars has the largest dust storms in the solar system:				
They can last for months and cover the entire planet on.				
988:Mercury is the second densest planet:				
Even though the planet is small, Mercury is very dense. Each cubic centimetre has a density of 5.4 grams, with only the Earth having a higher density. This is largely due to Mercury being composed mainly of heavy metals and rock.				
989:Mercury has wrinkles:				
As the iron core of the planet cooled and contracted, the surface of the planet became wrinkled. Scientist have named these wrinkles, Lobate Scarps.				
990: Mercury is the most cratered planet in the Solar System:				
Unlike many other planets which “self-heal” through natural geological processes, the surface of Mercury is covered in craters. These are caused by numerous encounters with asteroids and comets. Most Mercurian craters are named after famous writers and artists. Any crater larger than 250 kilometres in diameter is referred to as a Basin. The Caloris Basin is the largest impact crater on Mercury covering approximately 1,550 km in diameter and discovered in 1974 by the Mariner 10 .				
991:Only two spacecraft have ever visited Mercury:				
 During 1974 and 1975 Mariner 10 flew by Mercury three times, during this time they mapped just under half of the planet’s surface. On August 3rd 2004, the Messenger probe was launched from Cape Canaveral Air Force Station, this was the first spacecraft to visit since the mid 1970s.				
Mercury is named for the Roman messenger to the gods.				
992: Kamsa’s wives   Asti and Prapti. Daughters of Jarasandha.				
993:The cardigan was named after James Brudenell, 7th Earl of Cardigan, a British Army Major General who led the Charge of the Light Brigade at the Battle of Balaclava during the Crimean War. It is modelled after the knitted wool waistcoat that British officers supposedly wore during the war. The legend of the event and the fame that Brudenell achieved after the war led to the rise of the garment's popularity..  				
994:The very first Muslim attack on India in Sindh in the year 715 A.D was by Arabs led by Mohammad Bin Qasim. They displaced Raja Dahir who ruled Sindh from his capital Deval (near modern Karachi).				
995:Samadhisthal:-				
Abhay Ghat : Morarji Desai  				
Samata Sthal:  Dr Shankar Dayal Sharma.Jagajivan Ram.				
Mahaprayan Ghat:  Dr Rajendra Prasad				
Ekta Sthal:  Giani Zail Singh, Chandra Shekhar  				
Uday Bhoomi:  K.R. Narayanan				
Ambedkar — Chaithrabhoomi  , Gulzarilal Nanda — Narayangha				
996:Archimedes According to Vitruvius, a votive crown for a temple had been made for King Hiero II, who had supplied the pure gold to be used, and Archimedes was asked to determine whether some silver had been substituted by the dishonest goldsmith.Archimedes had to solve the problem without damaging the crown, so he could not melt it down into a regularly shaped body in order to calculate its density.				
997:Mahmud conquered and destroyed thousands of Hindu temples during his raids including the famous Somnath Temple, which he destroyed in 1025 AD, killing over 50,000 people who tried to defend it. The defenders included the 90-year-old clan leader Ghogha Rana. Mahmud had the gilded lingam broken into pieces and had them made into steps for his mosque and palace.				
998:Hiranyakashipu's wife Kayadhu gave birth to Prahlad in the Ashrama of Narada.				
999: The Bombardment of Madras was an engagement of World War I, at Madras (Chennai), British India. The bombardment was initiated by the German light cruiser Emden at the start of the war in 1914.With Captain Karl von Müller in command, on the night of 22 September 1914, SMS Emden quietly approached the city of Madras on the southeastern coast of the Indian peninsula. After entering the Madras harbor area and observing for a moment, Müller gave the order to engage at 9:30 pm, Emden opened fire at 3000 yards on the several large oil tanks within the harbor which belonged to the Burmah Oil Company				
1000: Olympics:				
Athens, 1896 - The first Modern Olympic Games were held in the place of birth of the Olympics.				
Paris, 1900 - Women took part for the first time in the history of modern Olympics.				
St Louis, 1904 - These were the first modern Olympic Games, where gold, silver and bronze medals were awarded for first, second and third prize respectively.				
London, 1908 - Athletes from 22 nations represented their respective countries at the Olympic				
Stockholm, 1912 - At these games, for the first time competitors came from all five continents symbolized in the Olympic rings.				
Antwerp, 1920 - The Olympic Games at Antwerp, Belgium had several firsts. For the first time the Olympic oath was uttered, the Olympic flag hoisted and doves released to symbolize peace.				
 Paris,1924:The VIII Olympiad were the last ones to be organized under the presidency of Pierre de Coubertin, the founder of modern Olympics. It was this Olympics that became fictionalized in the Academy Award winning film Chariots of Fire in 1981				
Amsterdam, 1928 - These games were the first to bear the name Summer Olympic Games and the Olympic torch was also lit for the first time.				
1001:Lord Wellesley, who is reputed to have said that 'India should be governed from a palace, not from a country house', constructed a grand mansion, known as Government House, between 1799 and 1803. The mansion remained in use until the capital moved from Calcutta to Delhi in 1912.				
1002:Born Edith Ellen Gray, she was the daughter of Frederick and Edith Henrietta Gray. She was born and brought up in Cambridge, where her father worked at a club. As a young girl, she fell in love with Jatindra Mohan Sengupta, a young Bengali student at Downing College who lodged at her parental home.				
1003:Lord Linlithgow (1936-44)  Longest reign as viceroy of India.				
1004:Lord Wellesley, (1798-1805) He opened college to train the Company's servants in Calcutta. That is why he is also called the  Father of the Civil Services in India .				
1005:Marquess of Hasting (1813-1823)He was the first to appoint Indians to the highest Ops of responsibility.The first vernacular newspaper Samachar darpan  published during his time.				
1006:Lord canning:  Penal code was prepared by incorporating the suggestions earlier made by the First Law Commission headed by Lord Macaulay. High courts were set up at Calcutta, Bombay and Madras under the provisions of the Indian High Courts act.Following the Queen's recommendation in 1858, transferring the Government from the company to the British Crown, Lord Canning was made the first Viceroy of India.				
1007:Lord Dalhousie (1848-1856) He was the youngest to hold the office of the Governor General. He is famous for the  the Doctrine of Lapse . Separate Lieutenant Governor appointed for Bengal; Shimla made the summer capital.  				
Arillery Headquarters moved from Calcutta to Merrut; Army headquarters shifted to Shimla; formation of Gurkha regiments.  				
Railways  First railway line was led from Bombay to Thana, in 1853.  				
Linking all the important towns Telegraphically.  				
Woods despatch on Education (1854) recommended the setting up of universities in Calcutta, Bombay and Madras. In 1853, competitive examination for the Indian Civil Services began.				
1008:Foundation of the Mohammedan Anglo-Oriental College was laid by  Lytton in  Aligarh.				
1009:Lord John Lawrence (1864-1869) An important event of this time was war against Bhutan in 1865. The Punjab and Oudh Tenancy Act, 1860, was enacted. Two famines hit India; first in 1866 in Orrisa and second in 1868-69 in Bundelkhand and Rajputana. A Famine Commission was set up under the chairmanship of Sir Henry Campbell .  				
1010:Lord Hardinge II (1910-1916) In the honour of King George V and Queen Mary of England, Coronation Darbar was held at Delhi. In 1911 the capital of country was announced to be shifted from Calcutta to Delhi. In 1912, Delhi became the new capital.. The First World War broke out in 1914. In 1916, Lord Hardinge laid the foundation of the Benaras Hindu University. Madan Mohan Malaviya was the Founder-Chancellor of this university.  				
1011:Viceregal Lodge (now the Institute of Advanced Studies), Obervatory Hill, Shimla, India, by Henry Irwin. Completed 1888; tower height increased later by Lord Curzon.  above it naming the architect (Irwin), the executive and assistant engineers (F. B. Hebbert and others)and the Earl of Dufferin as the current Viceroy. Dufferin was the first to occupy the new Lodge.				
1012: Charlot Canning was so fond of the Bengali sweet that a well-known local confectioner local confection in Calcutta, called Bhim Nag prepared special types of Pantua and called them as Ledikeni.Ledikeni is a corruption of the English name Lady Canning .				
1013:Kripalani moved the first-ever No confidence motion on the floor of the Lok Sabha in August 1963, immediately after the disastrous India-China War.				
1014: Lata composed music for following Marathi movies under the pseudonym of Anand Ghan. 1960 - Ram Ram Pavhanae.				
1015:The game of snakes & ladders was created by the 13th century poet saint Gyandev. It was originally called  'Mokshapat.				
1016:T.E.Lawrence: Lawrence was fatally injured in an accident on his Brough Superior SS100 motorcycle in Dorset, close to his cottage, Clouds Hill, near Wareham.One of the doctors attending him was the neurosurgeon Hugh Cairns, who consequently began a long study of what he saw as the unnecessary loss of life by motorcycle dispatch riders through head injuries. His research led to he use of crash helmets by both military and civilian motorcyclists.				
1017:Yudhisthira spent his last year of exile in the kingdom of Virata. He disguised himself as a Brahmin named Kanku bhattu (within themselves Pandavas called him Jaya) and taught the game of dice to the king.				
1018:Bhima spent his last year of exile in the kingdom of Virata. He disguised himself as a cook named Vallabh (within themselves Pandavas called him Jayanta).				
1019:Arjuna spent his last year of exile in the kingdom of Virata, Hastinapura. This is the place where Urvashi's curse is implemented and Arjuna becomes a eunuch called Brihannala (within themselves Pandavas called him Vijaya).				
1020:In the 13th year, Nakula disguised himself as an ostler and assumed the name of Granthika (within themselves Pandavas called him Jayasena) at the Kingdom of Virata. He worked as a horse-trainer who looked after horses in the royal stable.				
1021:In the 13th year, Sahadeva disguised himself as a Vaishya and assumed the name of Arishtanemi (within themselves Pandavas called him Jayadbala) at the Kingdom of Virata. He worked as a cowherd who supervised the maintenance and upkeep of all cows in Virata's kingdom.				
1022:Ayed, female elephant favoured by Tipoo Sultan the Tiger of Mysore. She was killed in 1799: the British cut her heels to make her kneel even though suspected to be pregnant but the dignity of the elephant was such that she died on foot.				
1023:Jumbo, P. T. Barnum's elephant whose name is the origin of the word jumbo (meaning "very large" or "over-sized"). The African elephant was given the name Jumbo by zookeepers at the London Zoo.				
1024:Iskander Mirza grew up in Bombay, receiving his early education at Elphinstone College, of the then University of Bombay. He then joined the British Army and was educated at the Royal Military Academy Sandhurst, becoming the first Indian graduate of the academy, and was commissioned into the British Indian Army in 1920.				
1025:Operation Polo Following preparations, Patel ordered the Indian Army to integrate Hyderabad (in his capacity as Acting Prime Minister) when Nehru was touring Europe.[51] The action was termed Operation Polo, in which thousands of Razakar forces had been killed, but Hyderabad was comfortably secured into the Indian Union.				
1026:Dhu al-Fiqar "bifurcated" (Arabic: ذو الفقار‎ Ḍū al-Fiqār) is the sword of the Islamic leader Ali. In Arabic the name is commonly transliterated as Zulfiqar, Thulfeqar, Dhulfiqar, Zoulfikar, Zulfeqhar etc. "Zulfiqar" and its phonetic variations have been popular given names, as with former Pakistani Prime Minister Zulfikar Ali Bhutto. This two-blade or bifurcated sword in Arabic is called: kilij.				
1027:Poland’s President and Prime Minister Lech and Jaroslaw Kaczynski (identical twins).				
1028:Burma oil company:The company derives its name from the centuries-old oil works in Myanmar(Burma) – spelled with an “h” in the Victorian era – which in 1886 became a province of the Indian empire. Founded that year in Glasgow by David Cargill, a Scottish-born merchant with lucrative trading interests in Ceylon, The Burmah [Myanmar] Oil Company Ltd. introduced new technology into the Burmese operations, such as mechanical drilling at the oilfields and continuous distillation in the Yangon refinery.				
1029:Watergate scandal: Post reporters Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein uncovered information suggesting that knowledge of the break-in, and attempts to cover it up, led deeply into the Justice Department, the FBI, the CIA,   and the White House.				
1030:Lakshagriha: Before the start of the journey, Vidura tactfully in presence of the Kaurava's, warned the Pandavas about the imminent danger in Mleccha language. These advise warnings from Vidura to Yudhisthira are specifically described in the Mahabharata Adi Parva.114 in a form of well versed poems.				
1031:J&K constitution: (The Constitution of Jammu and Kashmir, 1956 				
Legal Document No 140) In November 1951 the State Assembly set up a constitution drafting committee with M. A. Beg as its Chairman and M.A. Shahmari as Constitutional advisor.				
1032: UN Resolution 47 of April 21, 1948 In January 1948 India moved the U.N. which led to United Nations Security Council Resolution 47 of April 21, 1948. This resolution required among other things that Pakistan withdraw from the areas of Jammu and Kashmir which it had occupied in 1947 immediately and for a free and impartial plebiscite to decide the future of the state.				
1033: UPSC:Royal Commission on the Superior Civil Services in India under the Chairmanship of Lord Lee, which submitted its Report in 1924,recommended the setting up of the Public Service Commission. This led to the establishment of the first Public Service Commission on October 1, 1926 under the Chairmanship of Sir Ross Barker.Sh. H.K. Kripalani 01/04/47 13/1/1949  first Indian.				
1034:Devaki’s Sons:"Formerly an asura named Kalanemi had six sons, named Hamsa, Suvikrama, Kratha, Damana, Ripurmardana and Krodhahanta. They were known as the sad-garbhas, or six garbhas, and they were all equally powerful and expert in military affairs. These sad-garbhas gave up the association of Hiranyakasipu, their grandfather, and underwent great austerities to satisfy Lord Brahma, who, upon being satisfied, agreed to give them whatever benediction they might desire. When asked by Lord Brahma to state what they wanted, the sad-garbhas replied, "Dear Lord Brahma, if you want to give us a benediction, give us the blessing that we will not be killed by any demigod, maha-roga, Yaksa, Gandharva-pati, Siddha, Carana or human being, nor by great sages who are perfect in their penances and austerities." Brahma understood their purpose and fulfilled their desire. But when Hiranyakasipu came to know of these events, he was very angry at his grandsons. "You have given up my association and have gone to worship Lord Brahma," he said, "and therefore I no longer have any affection for you. You have tried to save yourselves from the hands of the demigods, but I curse you in this way: Your father will take birth as Kamsa and kill all of you because you will take birth as sons of Devaki." Because of this curse, the grandsons of Hiranyakasipu had to take birth from the womb of Devaki and be killed by Kamsa, although he was previously their father..				
1035:Last man On the moon:Regarding "the last man to walk on the Moon", Schmitt is the last person to step onto the Moon (as Cernan got out of the Apollo Lunar Module first), but Cernan is the last person to step off of the Moon (after final EVA (extra-vehicular activity), Schmitt went inside the module first). Duke was the youngest, at age 36); Shepard was the oldest(47).				
1036:More than one mission to moon:James A. Lovell, John W. Young and Eugene Cernan are the only three astronauts to fly more than one lunar mission (two each). Of these three, only Lovell did not walk on the lunar surface. Lovell and Fred Haise were prevented from walking on the Moon by the malfunction on Apollo 13 that resulted in the mission being aborted.				
1037:Three wise men:Popular tradition also holds that three kings or wise men (named Melchior, Caspar, and Balthazar) visited the infant Jesus in the manger, though this does not strictly follow the biblical account..				
1038: Clock Tower.Charles Barry and Augustus Welby Pugin.Edmund Beckett Denison. He worked with Edward Dent on the design. Edward Dent had proposed a clock design, and Edmund Beckett Denison made lots of modifications, so he deserves the credit as designer. And here's the best part -- he was a LAWYER not  clockmaker.  				
1039:Early liver transplants were often performed on infants and children born with diseased or damaged livers. The first human to receive a liver transplant was a three-year-old boy named Bennie Solis. Solis was born with an underdeveloped liver and received the transplant on March 1, 1963, in Denver, Colorado. He died from uncontrolled bleeding during the operation. The operation was performed by Dr. Thomas Starzl. Starzl took a four-year hiatus to do research and resumed liver transplants in 1967 with a greater degree of success.				
1040:first kidney transplants between living patients were undertaken in 1954 in Boston and Paris. The Boston transplantation, performed on December 23, 1954, at Brigham Hospital was performed by Joseph Murray, J. Hartwell Harrison, John P. Merrill and others. The procedure was done between identical twins Ronald and Richard Herrick to eliminate any problems of an immune reaction. For this and later work, Dr. Murray received the Nobel Prize for Medicine in 1990. The recipient, Richard Herrick, died eight years after the transplantation.				
1041: First Lung transplant:. James Hardy of the University of Mississippi performed the first human lung transplant on June 11, 1963.  Following a single-lung transplantation, the patient, identified later as convicted murderer John Richard Russell, survived for 18 days.,				
1042:First heart Transplant:On December 3, 1967, South African surgeon Christiaan Barnard conducted the first heart transplant on 53-year-old Lewis Washkansky.				
1043:Devaki’s Sons:Besides his principal wife, Devaki, and her sisters, Vasudeva had many other wives and begot many, many sons. By his wife, Rohini, Vasudeva begot Bala, Gada and others- and through Devaki, he begot Kirtiman, Sushena, Bhadrasena, Riju, Sammardana, Bhadra, Sankarshana the serpent incarnation, and Krishna the Supreme Personality of Godhead. Vasudeva and Rohini also had a daughter named Subhadra.				
1044: Fastest ODI century Corey Anderson, New Zealand (36) New Zealand all-rounder Corey Anderson scored the quickest century ever in international cricket on Wednesday, taking just 36 balls against West Indies, to break the record long held by Pakistan's Shahid Afridi.				
1045:1912 Stockholm Olympics: It was the last Olympics to issue solid gold medals and, with Japan's debut, the first time an Asian nation participated.				
1046:The first death of an athlete at the modern Olympic Games was in Stockholm 1912. Portuguese runner Francisco Lazaro collapsed from sunstroke and heart trouble at the 29 km mark of the marathon, and died the next day.				
1047:George Patton, who went on to become US General George C Patton, was 5th in the modern pentathlon in 1912 olympics. His shooting let him down.				
1048:Austrian Otto Herschmann won the silver in the team sabre fencing event. At the time he was the president of the Austrian Olympic Committee, becoming the only sitting national Olympic committee president to win a medal in the Olympics. Herschmann died in 1942 .				
1049: A wrestling bout in 1912 between Estonia's Martin Klein and Finland's Alfred Asikainen lasted 11 hours and 40 minutes before Klein finally won.				
1050:The M48 Patton is a main battle tank that was designed in the United States. It was the third tank to be officially named after General George S. Patton, commander of the U.S. Third Army.Used in Indo-Pak war.				
1051: Olympic facts:				
i.London is the only city to host the summer Games three times: 1908, 1948 and 2012. The Games have been held in the USA four times (1904, 1932, 1984, 1996) but in three different cities)				
ii .In the ancient Olympics, the philosopher Plato (427-347 BC) was a double winner of the Pankration. (see more about the Ancient Olympics).				
iii.Five countries have been represented at all Summer Olympic Games – Greece, Great Britain, France, Switzerland, and Australia, though not always all as part of official teams. Switzerland is on this list even though they boycotted the 1956 Olympics - they had competed in the equestrian events several months earlier in Stockholm. France did did not send a team to the 1904 Games but a lone Frenchman did compete for the US and a mixed team. Also in 1896 Great Britain competed as part of the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland, while Australia participated in 1908 and 1912 as part of a combined Australasia team with New Zealand. Therefore, iv.Greece is the only nation to have participated under its own flag in all modern summer Olympics. 				
v.The only Olympian ever to be awarded the Nobel Prize was Philip Noel-Baker of Great Britain. He won the silver in the 1500-meter run in 1920, and was awarded the Nobel prize for Peace in 1959 for his support of multilateral nuclear disarmament.				
vi.The first black athlete to compete at the Olympics was Constantin Henriquez de Zubiera, competing for France in 1900. (more Olympic Firsts)				
vii.At the first modern Olympic Games in Athens in 1896, silver medals were awarded to the winners and bronze to the second place getters. (see more about Olympic Medals)				
viii.More athletes than spectators attended the 1900 Paris Olympic Games.				
ix.The oldest man to compete in the Summer Olympic Games was Oscar Swahn of Sweden in shooting (1908, 1912, and 1920). Oscar Swahn became the oldest gold medalist when he won gold at 64 years and 280 days old in 1912, and the oldest medalist when he won silver in 1920 aged 72 years, 281 days old.				
x.The oldest woman to compete in the Olympics was British rider Lorna Johnstone, who participated in Equestrian at the 1972 Olympic Games at 70 years old and 5 days. (see more on the oldest and youngest)				
xi.12-year-old Inge Sorensen from Denmark won a bronze medal in the 200-meter breaststroke in 1936, making her the youngest medalist ever in an individual event.				
xii.East German Christa Luding-Rothenburger is the only person to win medals at the Winter and Summer Games in the same year (1988), winning gold in speed skating at Calgary and a silver in track cycling in Seoul. (This feat is no longer possible due to the staggering of the Winter and Summer Olympic years)				
xiii.American Eddie Eagan is the only person to have won gold medals in both the Summer and Winter Games. He was a boxing champion in the 1920 Antwerp Games, and also won gold at the 1932 Lake Placid Games in the team bobsled event.				
xiv.Great Britain,the only nation to have won at least one gold medal at every summer games.				
xv.Three athletes have won gold medals competing for two different nations: 				
Australian Rugby player Daniel Carroll won gold representing Australia in 1908, then repeated this feat competing for USA in 1920.				
Gymnast Svetlana Boginskaya won two gold medals for the Soviet Union and one for the Unified Team. She actually competed at the Olympic Games for three different countries, Soviet Union (1988), Unified Team (1992) and Belarus (1996).				
Georgian weight lifter Akakide Kakhiashvili who won his first gold medal at Barcelona 1992 competing with the Unified Team, and later as a citizen of Greece at Atlanta 1996 and in Sydney .				
xvi The only female competitor not to have to submit to a sex test at the 1976 Summer Olympics was Princess Anne of the UK, who was competing as a member of the UK equestrian team. As the daughter Queen Elizabeth II, such a test was seen as inappropriate.				
xvii.The record for the longest name for an Olympic champion is by female Thai weightlifter Prapawadee Jaroenrattanatarakoon, with a name comprising 31 letters. She won the gold medal in the 53 kilograms category at Beijing 2008. Her name was so long that it did not fit onto the scoreboard, which listed her as "J".				
1052: Female Nobel Laureates in Physiology or Medicine				
Of the 204 individuals awarded the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, only ten are women. Of these eight, Barabara McClintock is the only one who has received an unshared Nobel Prize.				
1947 - Gerty Cori 				
1977 - Rosalyn Yalow				
1983 - Barbara McClintock				
1986 - Rita Levi-Montalcini				
1988 - Gertrude B. Elion				
1995 - Christiane Nüsslein-Volhard				
2004 - Linda B. Buck				
1053: The Teen Murti Bhavan (Teen Murti House) It was designed by Robert Tor Russell, the British architect of Connaught Place and of the Eastern and Western Courts on Janpath .				
1054: The house is named after the Teen Murti (literally "three statues") Memorial by British sculptor, Leonard Jennings, which stands on the road junction in front of its extensive grounds. The memorial comprises life-size statues of three soldiers, and was built in 1922 in the memory of the Indian soldiers from three Indian princely states, namely; Jodhpur State, Hyderabad State and Mysore State who served present day Gaza Strip, Israel, Palestine during the World War I under British India Army.				
1055: Aksai Chin is a region which lies at the juncture of China and India. It consists of about one fifth of Kashmir.It is ruled by China but claimed by the Republic of India. Aksai Chin is one of the two main border disputes between India and China, the other being the dispute over Arunachal Pradesh. Aksai Chin (the name literally means "Chin's desert of white stones") is a very large high-altitude desert of salt that reaches heights up to 5,000 metres. It covers an area of 42,685 km² (16,481 sq mi) of the disputed territory. Geographically part of the Tibetan Plateau, Aksai Chin is often called the Soda Plain.				
1056:  The first scale RPV (Remote Piloted Vehicle) was developed by the film star and model airplane enthusiast Reginald Denny in 1935.Predator,Global Hawk,Raven  types oof drones.				
1057: Wimbledon facts:				
The winner of first Wimbledon Gentlemen's Single was Spencer Gore, an old Harrovian rackets player.				
•The first winner of Ladies Single Championship was Maud Watson, who defeated her opponent L. Watson, in straight sets of 6-8, 6-3, 6-3.				
•The winners of first Wimbledon Gentlemen's Double were J.E. Renshaw and W.C. Renshaw.				
•Except for the Gentlemen's Single and Gentlemen's Double, all the other Wimbledon events are played on the rule of best of three sets. These two events are played as per best of five sets.				
•The Ladies' Double and Mixed Double Tournament was introduced in Wimbledon in 1913.				
•The winners of first Wimbledon Ladies' Double were Winifred McNair and Dora Boothby.				
•The winners of first Wimbledon Mixed Double were Hope Crisp and Agnes Tuckey.				
1058:Famous dextrocardiac people with that condition would be American basketball player Randy Foye, James Bond villain Dr. No, and Canadian comedic actress Catherine O'Hara.		
1059:The insecticide DDT in high regard — the “atomic bomb of pesticides” they called it. The chemical was discovered long before, back in the 1870s, but Paul Muller of the J. R. Geigy Dye Factory (now Novartis) was the first to discover it as an effective insecticide. His invention came not a moment too soon, as his native Switzerland was suffering from pest-induced crop shortages and nearby Russia was suffering from a typhus outbreak.				
On this day, October 28, in 1948, in recognition for his discovery of DDT’s effective insect-control properties, Paul Muller was awarded the Nobel Prize. Notably, he was the first non-doctor to ever receive a prize in that field, as well as the first recipient whose research was aimed for profit.				
1060:The first transplant in the modern sense – the implantation of organ tissue in order to replace an organ function – was a thyroid transplant in 1883. It was performed by the Swiss surgeon and later Nobel laureate Theodor Kocher.				
1061:Scotland v England (1872) was the first ever official international association football match to be played. It was contested by the national teams of Scotland and England. The match took place on 30 November 1872 at West of Scotland Cricket Club's ground at Hamilton Crescent in Partick, Scotland. The match finished in a 0–0 draw and was watched by 4,000 spectators.				
1062:Elements:				
 Sulphur :Either from the Sanskrit 'sulvere', or the Latin 'sulfurium', both names for sulfur.				
 Tellurium  : Earth, the third planet on solar system (with the Latin word tellu).				
 Tantalum : King Tantalus, father of Niobe from Greek.				
 Niobium : Niobe, daughter of king Tantalus from Greek mythology .  				
  Technetium : the Greek 'tekhnetos' meaning artificial .				
  Ruthenium: Russia (with the Latin name Ruthenia)   				
 Indium: the Latin 'indicium', meaning violet or indigo .				
 1063:In 1844, the first international cricket match took place between the United States and Canada (although neither has ever been ranked as a Test-playing nation).				
1064:Lord Lytton : When Lytton was twenty-five years old, he published in London a volume of poems under the name of Owen Meredith. He went on to publish several other volumes under the same name. The most popular one is "Lucile", a story in verse published in 1860				
											
				

				
								

				

				
				
				
				
				
				
   				
				
 				
				
				
				
   				
				
 				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
 				
.				
				
				
				
 				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
				
 				
				
				
				
				
                                                                                                                                                                   				
.				
				
				
				
     				
				
				
				
     				
